I'll try not to let you down, sir.
What could they be talking about?
Have you ever considered learning to lip read?
You think Worf's chewing her out?
No, he always looks like that.
Maybe he's giving her pointers on how to land the Ops position.
Hi, Will.
Ben.  How you doing?
You call him Will?
Why not?
He's second in command of this ship, that's why not.
I'm not Starfleet, I'm a civilian. When he's in here, he wants to be treated like a civilian.
Riker? I bet he sleeps in his uniform.
You only think that because he's your CO. If you got to know him.
Right.
He's convinced Commander Riker doesn't like him.
Why? Did you crash the ship into something?
No. He just doesn't like me.
He doesn't even know you.
That's right. You should go talk to him.
About what?
Perhaps something you have in common.
He likes Jazz, poker. He's Canadian.
Yeah? My grandfather was from Canada.
There you go.
Hi.
Excuse me, I've got to go talk to somebody.
Good evening, sir.
Lavelle. Something I can do for you?
No, sir. I just came to get another drink.
Is there something wrong with that one?
No, actually, I, er. What are you having?
Trakian Ale.
Good choice. I'll have one, too. My grandfather was Canadian, you know.
Really?
Aren't you one, too?
A grandfather?
No, Canadian, sir. Canadian.
No, I grew up in Alaska.
Oh. Well, they both get a lot of snow.
Yeah.
It was good talking to you, sir.
Your ale, Ensign.
We're holding position in the Argaya System.
Anything?
No, sir. I detect no vessels in the vicinity.
How close to the Cardassian border are we?
Less than five thousand kilometres, sir.
Sir, I am detecting an object five metres in length. It appears to be an escape pod.
They must have been forced to abandon the ship.
How far inside Cardassian space is it?
Fifty thousand kilometres.
How the hell are we going to get it out of there?
Sir, the pod's life support system is failing.
Notify Doctor Crusher.
Can we get within transporter range without crossing into Cardassian territory?
We would need to boost the gain on the confinement beam by at least seven percent.
Mister La Forge?
I'm on it, Captain. There, try that.
The pod is still too far away.
I'm going to try augmenting the frequency spread.
Bio readings indicate that passenger's humanoid. Attempting life form identification.
No one told you to do that, Ensign. Let's just get him aboard safely. There, that should do it.
Confinement beam's at one hundred nine percent of normal.
Transporter room, you should be able to get a lock now.
Aye, sir.
Doctor Crusher, are you ready?
Stand by. Alyssa, I'm afraid I'm going to have to ask you to leave now.
All right, Doctor.
Transporter room. go ahead.
Aye, sir.
What are you doing here?
I'm not supposed to let anyone but the senior officers inside Sickbay.
Do you have any idea what's going on?
No, do you?
I'd better go.
Ensign.
Sir.
Twelve hundred hours. Alpha shift is relieved.
Excuse me, sir. If you don't mind, I'd like to stay on for another shift. I could use the training.
Now's not the best time.
Yes, sir.
Ensign, you're with me.
Bridge. You are a certified pilot, Ensign?
Yes, sir.
How long have you served on board the Enterprise, Ensign?
Seven months, sir.
I see I understand that you've been recommended for the Ops position. Do you think you're up to it?
I do, sir.
I'm not so sure. I'm concerned about your record.
Sir?
The incident that you were involved in at the Academy.
With all due respect that was three years ago. My record since then
It doesn't matter how long ago it was, Ensign. Would you do something like that again?
I can assure you, sir, that I would never, never jeopardise lives by participating in
A dare devil stunt? I would certainly hope not. What concerns me is that you participated in a cover-up that impeded an official investigation into the death of a cadet.
Sir, I know I should have told the truth right from the start
Yes you should, but you didn't. Instead you joined with the others to pretended that was simply an accident. Now, what do you think that tells me about your character?
Sir, if you had any idea what it was like after that incident. I didn't have any friends. I didn't have anyone to talk to. I had to take my flight test with the instructor because no one else would be my partner. In a lot of ways it would have been easier to just walk away, but I didn't. I stuck with it. Doesn't that say something about my character, too?
Well I'm really very sorry you didn't enjoy your time at the Academy, Ensign. As far as I'm concerned, you should have been expelled for what you did. Quite frankly, I don't know how you made it on board this ship. You're dismissed.
Another two seconds. Okay, that's enough.
Sir, I'm a little puzzled. Why are we intentionally damaging the shuttlecraft?
We're evaluating hull resiliency. Starfleet requires periodic testing.
I see. I don't believe I'm familiar with that requirement.
Probably because you're not a senior officer.
If you wish, I could reconfigure the phaser to fire a low intensity burst that would not harm the shuttle's hull. The test procedure would not be affected.
It's fine the way it is. Now, give me another burst, about four seconds, right here.
Do you want me to fire from this position?
Actually, why don't you do it from over here.
That would be consistent.
Consistent with what?
With making it appear that this shuttle had fled an attack.
What makes you think that's what we're doing?
The pattern of fire you have asked for is similar to what might result if the shuttle had fled an attacker while engaging in evasive manoeuvres.
It's an amazing coincidence.
Yes, sir. It is indeed. Shall we proceed with the testing?
Yes, Ensign. Thank you.
Alyssa, thank you for coming so quickly. We have to prepare for surgery. We have a comatose patient with a subdural hematoma.
Yes, sir.
I want to make it clear that you are not to discuss what you see here with anyone.
I understand.
We'll need to synthesise at least a litre of Cardassian blood.
It's your bet, Taurik. What I can't understand is why we're just sitting here so close to the Cardassian border.
It must have something to do with that escape pod we picked up. Don't you think, Sito?
Maybe.
I wonder who was in it?
You know what I heard? It was Ambassador Spock.
That is most unlikely.
That's what I was told.
By whom?
I can't say.
They beamed whoever was in it right to Sickbay. Did you see anything when you went down there?
No. Doctor Crusher just asked me to help her with the laboratory schedule.
I thought Lieutenant Powell was going to join us tonight?
He had to do a double shift.
That's too bad. He must be the worst poker player I've ever met.
It's your bet, Sam.
Twenty.
The thing is, I saw Powell in Ten Forward with another woman, and the way they were talking it made me wonder.
Well, if he's seeing someone else he should tell Alyssa. I mean, it might hurt her now, but it would be better in the long run.
I've been meaning to talk to you about something, Mister Worf. I don't think Ensign Sito's prepared for the Ops position.
Well, I must say I disagree, sir.
Counsellor. Pair of fours bets.
I'm listening.
The bet is fifty.
It would be illogical for the Captain to deny you a promotion for something you did as a cadet.
He said it shows I don't have character.
What did you say?
What could I say? Maybe he's right.
Hey, you're a damn fine officer and you deserve that post as much as anyone. One thing's for sure, I won't be getting it. Not if it's up to Riker.
It is your decision, sir, but I am certain if you give Ensign Sito a chance to prove herself, she will not disappoint you.
Very well, I'll take her under consideration. Besides, I'm not convinced about Lavelle.
Really? Why?
He's too eager to please. He's always trying to ingratiate himself to me.
Why assume he's doing it that to get the job?
Fifty.
There's your fifty, and one hundred more.
I don't know. It seems to me that you and Lavelle are a lot alike.
What? We're not at all alike.
You're bluffing.
You think so?
Yes, and I'm not going to let you get away with it.
You know, Sam, maybe you shouldn't try so hard with Riker. It doesn't matter whether he likes you as long as he respects you.
He must, otherwise he would not be considering you for the Ops position.
You're probably right. Maybe I'm just telling myself he hates me so that if I don't get promoted, I'll have an excuse.
You in or not?
At this juncture, the odds of my winning this hand are less than thirty nine to one. I fold.
The Commander's flush is still working. No help, Worf. Tens and deuces for the Doctor. And Jacks and fours for the Counsellor. Ah, three sixes.
Fold.
Looks like it's just you and me. You going to go another fifty?
I'm thinking. Give me a second, here.
Didn't you tell me that you took up poker so you could be the officer's game at the Potemkin?
I happen to like poker.
But your senior officers might have thought you were trying to ingratiate yourself. I guess it's lucky that they realised you were young and inexperienced, and decided not to hold it against you.
Maybe I have been a little hard on Lavelle.
I do not believe he is bluffing.
I do. There you go. What've you got?
Flush.
I can't believe this.
I am your worst nightmare.
I knew it.
How could you tell I was bluffing?
You don't really expect me to answer that, do you?
Look, it's getting late. Maybe we should all get some sleep.
One more hand.
Come on, Geordi. You don't have to quit just because I'm unbeatable?
Nah, there's something I need to do down in Engineering. I'll get you next time.
I'll be there.
Goodnight, everybody.
TROI + CRUSHER:Goodnight.
Bye.
Goodnight.
See you later.
What I find curious is that when Commander La Forge saw that the technique I was using was actually more efficient, he seemed annoyed.
Of course he was.
He didn't like the fact that you knew something he didn't.
Do you think I have irreparably damaged my relationship with him?
It depends on what kind of a guy he is.
Ante up, gentlemen.
Come in.
Commander.
As you were. I just dropped by to see Taurik.
What can I do for you, sir?
Well, I'm headed for Engineering to run those tests on the nacelles. Since you've already put in some work on the technique, I thought you might like to give me a hand.
I'd be pleased to, sir.
Great. Let's go.
How about some blackjack?
I've got to get some sleep so I can be sharp tomorrow.
Why? So you can get promoted, have more responsibility, and have to get to sleep even earlier?
Goodnight.
Come in.
Ben. What are you doing here?
I just cleaned out some junior officers and I thought I'd do the same here.
You're welcome to give it a try.
Pull up a chair.
Thanks.
Dismissed. Ensign Sito.
Yes, sir.
I also teach an advanced class. I believe you may be ready to participate. However, before you can join the group, you must pass the gik'tal.
Gik'tal?
Yes. It is a very ancient Klingon ritual. It tests your knowledge of the forms of the mok'bara.
I should practice first.
No. No practise. That is part of the ritual. The test must be unannounced.
Can you see?
No.
Good. The gik'tal has begun. Defend yourself.
You must anticipate my attack.
Yes, sir.
Defend yourself.
Are you listening, Ensign?
Yes, but
Defend yourself.
You did not anticipate.
How am I supposed to defend myself when I can't see a thing?
Stop making excuses. Replace the blindfold.
No. It's not a fair test.
Very good, Ensign. You have passed the challenge.
What? By taking off the blindfold?
It takes courage to say the test is unfair.
One thing I don't understand. Doesn't gik'tal mean to the death?
You speak Klingon.
Sir, is there really such a thing as a gik'tal challenge?
No, there is not. But perhaps next time you are judged unfairly, it will not take so many bruises for you protest.
All I've ever wanted is to make a career for myself in Starfleet. I can't change what happened at the Academy. No one can. All I can do is work hard and try to earn the respect of the people I serve with. If you're not going to give me that chance, then I respectfully request that you transfer me to another ship.
If you're looking for a more lenient commander, I don't think you'll find one.
Permission to speak freely, sir?
Please do.
If you didn't want me on your ship you should have said so when I was assigned to it. It's not your place to punish me for what I did at the Academy. I've worked hard here. My record is exemplary. If you're going to judge me, judge me for what I am now.
Very well, Ensign. I will. It took courage to come here and face me after what I said to you the other day. I didn't ask you here because I was assessing your qualifications for the Ops position.
I don't understand, sir.
I was harsh with you because I wanted to assess you for a very important mission. A mission that could put you in a situation that would be far more unnerving than a dressing-down by your commanding officer.
Can I ask what that mission is, sir?
Join the senior officers in the Observation lounge at oh nine hundred hours. We'll discuss it then.
Yes, sir.
And, Ensign. I do know why you ended up on the Enterprise. I asked for you. I wanted to make sure that you got a fair chance to redeem yourself.
Thank you, sir.
You wanted to see me, Doctor?
Yes. Alyssa, I think you know how much I've come to depend upon you here. I've recommended your promotion because your performance here has been exemplary.
Thank you, Doctor. I appreciate that.
But more than that, I've come to think of you as a friend. Someone I really care about.
That's nice of you to say. I feel the same way.
So, you and Andrew Powell?
Someone told you.
Told me what?
We were going to keep it a secret until the promotions are announced.
Secret?
He asked me to marry him.
Alyssa, that's wonderful! I'm so relieved. I mean happy.
Please, take a seat, Ensign.
This is Joret Dal. He was in the escape pod that we retrieved. He is a member of the Cardassian military, and a Federation operative. He has risked his life to bring us invaluable information about Cardassian strategic intentions. Information that could very well enhance the security of Bajor, as well as other planets in this sector. Now, it is absolutely imperative that we return him safely back to Cardassian space.
It will not be easy. The border is heavily guarded.
As his ship was destroyed, he'll be using one of our shuttles.
If a patrol stops me, I will claim to have stolen it.
We have distressed the shuttle so that it appears to have been fired upon.
Joret will attempt to talk his way past the patrol.
If I were alone, the chances of my succeeding would be slim. But if I had a prisoner with me, a Bajoran terrorist, I would appear to be a bounty hunter. Border crossings of that nature are not uncommon, and for a price the patrol can be convinced to look the other way.
Once the shuttle is safely past the patrol, Joret will put you into an escape pod and return you back across the border.
Since the pod is so small, it will be difficult to detect.
We'll be waiting here to pick you up.
I understand, sir.
Ensign, this is obviously a very dangerous mission. I'm not ordering you to take part in it.
Then I volunteer, sir.
Be certain you understand the risk you are taking. If you are captured
I'm Bajoran. No one knows better than I do what Cardassians do to their prisoners. I've made my decision.
Very well, Ensign. Will you report to Sickbay. Doctor Crusher will explain. And Ensign Sito, I must ask you not to discuss this mission with anyone.
Yes, sir.
I didn't realise she would be so young.
The Captain asked Doctor Crusher to make it look like Joret had mistreated me.
We're all set here.
Sir. I want you to know that I really appreciate the fact that you've always had confidence in me.
Good luck.
I'll see you soon.
We are approaching the border. It won't be long before we're detected by the patrol ships.
When they stop us, do you want me to say anything?
No. It should seem that I've broken your will. If you're asked any questions, look at me as though you're afraid to answer.
Can I ask you something? Why are you doing this, risking your life to help Starfleet?
I don't consider myself a traitor, if that's what you're asking. All my life I've served in the military. Once it was an institution dedicated to the security of Cardassia, now it's little more than a platform for ambitious Guls hoping to make their reputations in battle. If the information I provided helps Starfleet deter even one pointless skirmish, I've served my purpose. I'm sick of war. My people need peace.
I never thought I'd hear a Cardassian say something like that.
And I never thought a Bajoran would risk her life to help a Cardassian get home.
Patrol ships moving in on our position.
We don't have much time.
She must have left on that shuttle. There's no other explanation.
Do you have any idea where it went?
Toward Cardassian space. That's what I'm worried about. Oh, there's one other thing, I noticed the shuttle was damaged.
Sam, can we talk about something else?
Well don't you care what's happened to her?
Of course.
But we have to accept the fact that we're not always told about everything that happens aboard ship.
Well, we can at least tell each other what we know. Do you two know something?
Sam, please.
I can't believe this. We're friends.
We're also Starfleet Officers.
I'm not allowed to talk about it.
Okay. I understand. I'd better get going. I've got duty in half an hour.
Captain's log, stardate 47566.7. We have reached the coordinates in Federation space where Ensign Sito's escape pod was to have rendezvoused with us. However, we have been waiting for over thirty hours and as yet there is no sign of her.
Report.
We completed a long range scan of the area, sir. The escape pod doesn't seem to be out there.
It is possible that at this distance we are unable to distinguish the pod from the inorganic matter normally present in space.
Try narrowing the scan field. See if you can pick up any biosigns.
Sir, it would help if I knew what kind of life signs to look for.
You're scanning for Bajoran lifesigns.
Yes, sir.
Nothing yet. The pod is thirty two hours overdue.
Sir, I recommend we launch a probe to increase the range of our sensor sweeps.
Launching a probe into Cardassian space would be a treaty violation.
Mister Worf, prepare a probe and launch when ready.
Aye, sir. Probe launched, sir.
Sir, I am detecting signs of debris two hundred thousand kilometres inside Cardassian space. Its mass and composition indicate it could be the remains of a Federation escape pod.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have intercepted a Cardassian report stating that a Bajoran prisoner escaped her captor and was killed in an evacuation pod as she tried to leave Cardassian space.
To all Starfleet personnel, this is the Captain. It is my sad duty to inform you that a member of the crew, Ensign Sito Jaxa
Has been lost
In the line of duty. She was the finest example of a Starfleet
Officer, and a young woman of remarkable courage
And strength of character. Her loss will be deeply felt by all who knew her. Picard out.
You okay?
I just got promoted.
Congratulations.
Thanks. It just don't feel right. For all I know, she was going to get the promotion instead of me.
You shouldn't feel that way, Sam.
She would have been happy for you, Sam.
The best way to remember her would be to excel in your new position.
We're proud of you, Sam.
Excuse me, sir, but I need to move this table.
What?
There's an empty seat over there.
I appreciate what you are trying to do, but it is not appropriate. You were her friends. I was only her commanding officer.
Sir, I happen to know that she considered you a friend.
Captain's log, Stardate 43510.7. The Enterprise has put in at Rutia Four to deliver medical supplies following an outbreak of violent protests. Although non-aligned, the planet has enjoyed a long trading relationship with the Federation. Now, a generation of peace has ended with terrorist attacks by Ansata separatists, who are demanding autonomy and self-determination for their homeland on the western continent. Recreational shore leave has been prohibited and all away teams have been beam down armed.
We have only a few minutes before our next meeting, Doctor.
It's all right. We're finished. Waiter?
Doctor!
Keep back!
Put that away. I'm a doctor.  Just lie still. Try not to move.
Lieutenant Worf, I need some bandages, disinfectant, something with alcohol in it.
Doctor, it is not safe.
That's an order, Lieutenant.
Don't be afraid. There's a lot of bleeding, but it's not as bad as it looks.
The Klingon's right. These Ansata, they're madmen. There could be another bomb.  Clear this area. Everyone out of the plaza.
Doctor, I believe it would be prudent to return to the Enterprise. There are physicians on this planet.
Who are not here. I am.
Doctor.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Not at all, Doctor.
Captain, there has been an incident.
A bomb has been detonated by Ansata terrorists.
Your security status?
Vulnerable, sir.
Transporter room three, lock onto the away team, prepare to beam them back.
Yes, Captain.
Sir, I've recommended such a course, but there are several wounded people and Doctor Crusher
Is insisting on attending to
I understand. Picard to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead.
Doctor, Commander Data has informed me of your situation.
I already know what you're going to say.
Doctor, will you at least allow me to
The longer we argue, the longer
It's going to take me to save
Doctor, you are endangering yourself and the away team.
Captain, I am trying to put life back into a wounded body with sleight of hand. I'm not going anywhere. Data and Worf
Don't have to stay. Crusher out.
Transporter room, do you have lock on the away team?
Aye, sir. Shall I transport them?
I don't want to be in the transporter room to greet her.
Commander Data.
Hold your position until the Rutian medics arrive.
Aye, sir.
The tricorder is not reading any other explosive devices in this vicinity.
Get out of the way!
You don't understand. I'm a
A transporter would leave residual ionization in the air. Our tricorder readings found no trace after the incident.
People don't just appear and disappear. There must be some way to track her.
We have been unable to detect a signal from her communicator. Either it has been deactivated or she is being held in a shielded location.
Why her?
Sir, I believe she was the intended target of the abduction.
Why would they want to take a Federation hostage? Their fight doesn't involve us.
It does now.
You hungry? You want something to eat?
I doesn't matter to me. You want to be hungry, be hungry. What's your name? You're a doctor on a Federation starship. I always wondered what it would be like to travel across the galaxy. It's not something I've exactly had time for. This isn't the best way to meet new people, is it? If you need anything, ask for me. My name is Kyril Finn. They know me.
We have no reason to believe she's been hurt in any way.
In fact, it's more than likely that they will take good care of her, if they want to use her as a bargaining chip.
Bargaining chip?
The innocent often become the pawns in conflicts of this type, Wes.
You see, the Ansata separatists have been trying for generations to freed themselves from the rule of the eastern continent. If they can get the government just to acknowledge their demands, then kidnapping your mother will have served its purpose. I think that may be what they're after, but it may not. Frankly, Wesley, I don't care. My only concern is to get your mother back. Very shortly, we shall be leaving to have a meeting with the authorities.
Request permission to be on the away team, sir.
No. You have an important job to do here. If we are to free your mother, then we have to be able to trace the movements of the terrorists. I want you to work with the team that are investigating this new technology of theirs.
I understand.
Report to Mister Data. Dismissed.
He needs your strength right now.
History has shown us that strength may be useless when faced with terrorism.
And what exactly is Ansata policy with regard to hostages?
I doubt they have one. They don't usually take hostages. These are not people we're dealing with here. They're animals. Fanatics who kill without remorse or conscience. Who think nothing of murdering innocent people.
But they could just as easily have shot her where she stood.
Don't ask me to explain them. I can't. The atrocities that I've seen. And now they have this new device that makes them even more deadly. How do I combat an enemy who fails to register on any scanner until they're literally standing in front of you, pointing a phaser at your head?
What can you tell us about this device?
Not much, really. They first started using it two months ago. We've taken several of these off dead terrorists. Our people have looked at them Nothing they can explain
Do you mind if we take one of these with us and have our people study it?
Not at all. And I'll put you in touch with our research people, if you wish.
I appreciate your help.
Perhaps if we found ourselves in possession of some of that advanced Federation weaponry of yours, it would shift the balance of power back to our favour.
Of course you know that is out of the question.
Yes, of course.
I would like to leave Commander Riker to assist in your search for Doctor Crusher.
If you like.
You don't sound very optimistic.
I know my enemy, Commander. They don't leave much room for optimism.
You hungry? You want something to eat? Relax, relax. I'm just going to
Now eat something. What's the point of not eating? You're the only one who suffers. Do I look like it's bothering me? Okay, it's bothering me. Come on.
No forks. Sorry. Did I mention my name is Finn? And you're?
Why have you brought me here?
I need a doctor.
There are doctors on Rutia.
I need someone better. I heard you were with the Federation flagship and I knew you had to be.
Who told you that?
I heard. Now you'll help me, just like you helped them.
What are you talking about?
Your ship carries medical supplies for them, for the other side. Why does the Federation ally itself with the Rutians?
We don't. All we did was bring
Medical supplies.
People were hurt.
I know. I hurt them. You're finished eating. Get up. Get up!
I have a son.
You'll be with him again, Doctor. I see no reason to kill you.
I need some instruments from my ship in order to diagnose this.
You think if I allow you to contact your ship, they will transport the instruments?
When I inform the Captain how serious the situation is, I'm sure he'll agree. I've told you, Finn, the Federation is not allied with Rutians. We're here on an errand of mercy.
And since the Federation does not wish to take sides, they will send the supplies that you need.
Absolutely.
I've anticipated your needs.
These are Federation supplies. The ones we had delivered to the medical dispensary.
I heard.
You mean to tell me all these people belong to the Ansata?
No, not really. We suspect the organisation itself only to consist of some two hundred members. There are over five thousand names on this list, citizens we know to be sympathetic to their cause. They pass along weaponry and information, march in pro-Ansata demonstrations, participate in general strikes or the occasional riot.
How did this ever get started?
Seventy years ago we denied them independence. That gave them a noble cause. Now it's just an excuse for more violence.
You hate them as much as they hate you.
Believe it or not, I always considered myself moderate.
What changed your mind?
Being stationed here for six months, watching the body count grow. The three assassination attempts on my life.
Well, that'll change your point of view.
The event that really opened my eyes took place only a few days after my arrival. A terrorist bomb destroyed a shuttlebus. Sixty schoolchildren. There were no survivors. The Ansata claimed that it was a mistake, that their intended target was a police transport. As if that made everything all right. That day I vowed that I would put an end to terrorism in this city. And I will.
Thank you. You're very helpful. You could learn to do this when you grow up. If you grow up.
They're dying. I'm seeing a complicated set of conditions. Their DNA is warped somehow, and it's distorting their entire cellular chemistry.
You can't do anything?
I can make them more comfortable. That's all. The damage is too extensive.
If I could detect their condition earlier
You could reverse the damage?
Perhaps. I don't know. What happened to them?
It's the inverter. It's given our cause a new life, but it asks for our lives in return.
What does it do?
We transport through a dimensional shift that the Rutian sensors can't trace.
Dimensional shifting? You can't do that with humanoid tissue.
There are risks, the designers told us, But it works.
You're showing the same distorted readings. Not as severe as the others, but
It doesn't matter.
It does if it kills you.
Don't you know? A dead martyr's worth ten posturing leaders.
A subspace field coil with an isolated power source. Curious.
Hey, guys. Come here. Look at this. The Rutian team picked up a faint nuclear vibration during the terrorist movements.
Nuclear vibration?
That could possibly indicate subspace transition rebound during transport.
Wait a minute, wait a minute. May I? Computer, call up the files on. What was his name? We spent two hours on him in astral physics last year. Folded-space transport.
Adaptive transport.
Yes.
Are you referring to the Elway Theorem?
Yes. Computer, call up the files on the Elway Theorem. What if they're using inter-dimensional travel?
But the Elway Theorem proved to be entirely inaccurate. All research was abandoned by the mid-twenty third century.
But Data, look, the nuclear vibrations are the same, and Elway used a model similar to this.
It would certainly be untraceable by any standard method of detection.
But it was proven to be fatal. To use this technology would be an irrational act.
We may be dealing with irrational people, Data. Is there a way to trace this?
With an adaptive subspace echogram, maybe?
Captain, anyone who is willing to transport in this manner, would suffer significant internal damage that could be detected.
It sounds as though they may require the services of a doctor.
This is no way to live.
For us or them?
For both of you.
I know it's not pretty, Riker, but this is what terrorism has done to this city.
There's got to be a better way to deal with it than this.
My methods may seem harsh but believe me, they're gentle compared to my predecessors. Suspects would be brought into police headquarters and mysteriously vanish. I put a stop to that.
What happened to your predecessors?
They were murdered.
Are you going to tell me that little boy's a threat?
It's possible. That shuttlebus I told you about? The bomb was set by a teenager. In a world where children blow up children, everyone's a threat.
It's okay. Over there.
You should be drawing, not killing people.
I can do both.
How can you have such a casual attitude toward killing?
I take my killing very seriously, Doctor. You are an idealist.
I live in an ideal culture. There's no need for your kind of violence. We've proven that.
Your origins on Earth are from the American continent, are they not?
North America.
Yes, I've read your history books. This is a war for independence, and I am no different than your own George Washington
Washington was a military general, not a terrorist.
The difference between generals and terrorists, Doctor, is only the difference between winners and losers. You win, you're called a general. You lose
You are killing innocent people! Can't you see the immorality of what you're doing or have you killed so much you've become blind to it?
How much innocent blood has been spilled for the cause of freedom in the history of your Federation, Doctor? How many good and noble societies have bombed civilians in war, have wiped out whole cities. And now that you enjoy the comfort that has come from their battles, their killing, you frown on my immorality? I am willing to die for my freedom, Doctor. And in the finest tradition of your own great civilisation, I'm willing to kill for it, too.
All right. You can go.
Next man.
If you want, I could become more persuasive.
No.
You're Katik Shaw, the waiter from the Lumar Cafe. You witnessed both the explosion and the kidnapping.
I saw nothing.
We're aware of your ties with the Ansata. For all we know you planted the bomb yourself. Where have they taken her?
I don't know what you're talking about.
I've had enough of this. I want you to take a message back to your people. You tell them the Federation is willing to negotiate for the release of Doctor Crusher.
Riker!
She's a Starfleet officer. She's my responsibility. Your people have terms. We're willing to listen. We want her back. It's as simple as that. I don't think it's necessary to detain this gentleman any longer.
Get out.
I should have him followed, but we'll try it your way.
Is that what you want?
What I want is to go home. Back to my own country. To leave behind the roundups, the interrogations, the bodies lying in the street. To be able to walk without bodyguards, and to not have to jump at every unexpected noise. That's what I want, Riker!
A dimensional jump can create subspace pressure modulation, Captain. By setting up a magnetosphere echogram that can monitor each of their movements, we may be able to collect enough data to trace their power source.
Can you estimate the number of jumps it will take?
Dimensional shifting is such an unstable procedure, sir, that I cannot say. Sir, I am finding it difficult to understand many aspects of Ansata conduct. Much of their behavioral norm would be defined by my programme as unnecessary and unacceptable.
By my programme as well, Data.
But if that is so, Captain, why are their methods so often successful? I have been reviewing the history of armed rebellion and it appears that terrorism is an effective way to promote political change.
Yes, it can be, but I have never subscribed to the theory that political power flows from the barrel of a gun.
Yet there are numerous examples where it was successful. The independence of the Mexican State from Spain, the Irish Unification of 2024, and the Kensey Rebellion.
Yes, I am aware of them.
Then would it be accurate to say that terrorism is acceptable when all options for peaceful settlement have been foreclosed?
Data, these are questions that mankind has been struggling with throughout history. Your confusion is only human.
Finn, everyone is being rounded up.
Because of her?
The Federation wants to negotiate her release.
While they arrange for the Rutian police to fill up the detention cells.
A Starfleet officer is working with the director. He wants a meeting with you.
I'm sure he does. Your Federation colleagues have engineered mass arrests to pressure me into releasing you.
I'm sure you've misunderstood.
They're working with the police. He's seen it with his own eyes.
All they want is to get me back safely.
I'm not releasing you. I need you here.
To find a way to reverse the effects of the dimensional shift? I can do that right now. Stop using it! I have a life, Finn. I have a son who needs me.
Is your son on the ship?
Yes.
I'm sorry he's on the ship.
No.
They have joined forces with the Rutians against us.
We are not your enemy.
They are more valuable to me than an enemy. For seventy years we have shouted, and no one's heard us. Destroy the Federation flagship, someone will listen.
Please.
They are the ones who interfered. They are the ones who sent medical supplies. They are the ones who organised mass arrests. They are killing your son, not me.
Please, Finn, don't do this. I will do anything you ask.
I had a son, too. He was thirteen when he died in detention.
What?
Intruder alert, deck twelve.
Another subspace reflection. Dimensional shift, sir.
Go to Red alert. Sound general quarters.
Security to Engineering.
Intruders in Engineering
Casualties reported on deck twelve. Sickbay responding.
Seal off all decks. Lock on transporters to the intruder signals.
Intruder signals unstable, Captain, I cannot lock on.
They are moving inter-dimensionally. Neither transporters nor forcefields will contain them, sir.
Explosive charge on the main warp chamber.
Transporter room three, lock on the explosive device and energise.
It's scrambling the sensors, Captain. I can't pinpoint it.
Begin emergency evacuation. Stand by for saucer separation, Mister La Forge, can you remove the charge from the engine core?
I'm trying. Hold on.
They've got it locked on somehow. Stand by.
Transporter room, lock on my signal and stand by to transport two kilometres off the starboard nacelle.
His signal?
Transporter Room, now!
Mister La Forge, report.
Transport complete, Captain. I have a man down.
More dimensional shifts, sir.
Can you calibrate their destination?
No, sir, the readings are
Security. Code one emergency. Security!
Lieutenant Worf is recovering in Sickbay. The wound was not severe.
Dead? Injured?
Three dead, four wounded.
Another millisecond, there'd have been a big dust cloud orbiting Rutia instead of the Enterprise.
Why? I just asked if they would talk.
You have your answer, Riker.
Sir, the next time the Ansata use their dimensional jump we should be able to get a fix on the power source.
Worf went down. I don't know if he's alive or dead. And there were other casualties.
Was Wes on the Bridge?
Yes. He took cover. I didn't see any more than that. But you all right though?
Yes, they needed a doctor.
The side effects of the transport?
Yes.
We're getting closer to tracing their movements. Actually, it was Wesley who put us onto this dimensional jump of theirs. He has been extraordinary, Beverly. He's going to make a very fine officer.
He's had good role models. I'm sorry. If I'd only gone back to the ship.
I should have beamed you up.
You wouldn't dare.
Oh yes I would, and should.
Without my permission?
If you don't follow orders.
If you'd give reasonable orders, I'd obey.
Doctor, I will be the judge of reasonable.
There aren't any exits to the surface.
So the only way out is by the transporter. Or the dimensional jump.
A mode of travel I'd encourage you to avoid. It's killing them.
They're mad.
I don't know any more. The difference between a madman and a committed man willing to die for a cause. It's all become blurred over the last few days.
Beverly, I don't have to remind you of the psychological impact of being a hostage.
I know. I understand that. But their leader, Finn, he's not what you'd expect.
No, he's certainly not what I would expect. Without cause or reason, he and his little band of outlaws has attacked my ship!
But he did have reasons. The medical supplies, the arrests. Jean-Luc, if we really examined our role in all this
Beverly, you are arguing for a man who may have murdered your son.
I didn't kill your son, Beverly. We weren't able to destroy the ship. We had to settle for him. She wouldn't even tell me her name. I call her Doctor.
You have made a grave miscalculation.
Oh?
You have assaulted a Federation starship, killed and wounded several members of her crew, kidnapped two of her officers, and you don't expect a response?
On the contrary, I'm counting on it.
You want Federation involvement?
Captain, the Federation has a lot to admire in it, but there's a hint of moral cowardice in your dealings with non-aligned planets. You're doing business with a government that is crushing us and you say you're not involved. You're very, very much involved. You just don't want to get dirty.
You accuse us of cowardice while you plant bombs in shadows?
I am been fighting the only war that I can against an intractable enemy. Now, I'm fighting a big war against a more powerful adversary. Can't you see how that helps me?
I'm afraid I can't.
He's added another chair to the negotiating table.
You added the chair, Captain. I am simply forcing you to sit in it. The Federation will quickly tire of our little war. They'll want you back. They will want to get as far away from Rutia as they can. And I will not make it easy. Eventually, the Federation will force the government into make concessions. And then a few more, and then a few more. Until we can finally reach an honourable agreement that saves face for all sides. Except we win.
You understand I will not cooperate with you in any way.
You've already cooperated, Captain, just by coming here.
I am not here to hurt you. Just hear what I have to say. Your people are safe. How long they stay that way depends on you. We demand an embargo and trade sanctions levied against Rutia. The Federation will blockade the planet. No ships will be allowed in or out. This will continue until the government of Rutia consents to talks mediated by a Federation council. You have twelve hours to make your decision.
Got it. We've pinpointed the Ansata base to some three hundred kilometres from the city, on the southern tip of the continent.
Sensors indicate it is located thirty metres below the ground, implying a cavern-like dwelling.
Any passages leading to the surface?
Our readings show no evidence of any, Commander.
Any light they have must be artificially generated.
If we could shut that down, you could use the confusion to find your people.
Request permission to join the rescue party, sir. I owe it to the Captain.
Permission granted. You have the bridge, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Commander? Good luck.
We'll bring her home, Wes.
You're glad to see your Captain.
Yes.
I may have to kill him. I just wanted to warn you.
He can help you, Finn. He is very influential.
He will not help us.
If you could just convince him that your cause is
You may be able to convince him, perhaps. Not I.
I've talked to him. I'll try.
If our places were reversed, I would expect to die.
Your places would never be reversed. He would never forcibly abduct you or play games with your life. He would treat you with respect.
I've treated you with respect.
You've scared the hell out of me, Finn. You've controlled me through fear just like you've tried to control this whole continent.
You haven't tasted real fear yet, Doctor.
Is that the best you can do? Is fear the only weapon you have?
No, but it's a good one.
You know what scares me the most, Finn? It scares me to think that you might win this fight and gain real power.
Doctor. I don't want you to fear me.
Generator's right over there.
Beverly, how dangerous would another ride through the inverter be to us?
I don't know. But I don't want you to start thinking about
Beverly, it is our obligation to think of escape.
He's prepared to kill you.
An excellent reason to escape. Do you think you've gained his confidence?
Indeed you have. And more. This might prove to be an advantage to us.
Jean-Luc, there are some things I want to tell you in case we don't get out of this.
Have they found us?
Turn those circuits on. Sandor, come with me. Do we have any emergency power?
Freeze! Hold it right there. Hands up. Hands up, let's go.
Finn!
He's dead.
You didn't have to kill him.
As a prisoner he would have been a focus for violence as his followers tried to free him. Now, he's a martyr. But the death toll might go down, at least in the short term. It's an imperfect solution for an imperfect world.
Riker!
No more killing.
Already another one to take his place. It never ends.
He could have killed you. He didn't. Maybe the end begins with one boy putting down his gun.
I hear I owe my rescue to you.
I was just part of the team. It's good to have you back. Both of you, sir.
Take us out of orbit, Mister Crusher. At your convenience.
The initial dispersal pattern should not be more than seven kilometres in diameter. Jenna?
Oh, er, six point eight kilometres.
That should suffice. Is there something occupying your thoughts, Jenna? You seem somewhat subdued today.
I bumped into Jeff again in the turbolift this morning. He asked me to dinner.
What was your response?
I told him I'd think about it.
As you requested, I will now remind you of the reasons you decided to end your relationship with Jeff.
I guess I asked for this. Go ahead.
You objected to the fact that he seemed unwilling to set aside sufficient time for you. You said he was unresponsive, that he never did the little things. You disliked the sound he made when he ate his soup.
Okay, okay. I remember.
This is the third time I have refreshed your memory. Do you wish to rescind our agreement?
No. No, it's for my own good. It's just so easy to forget. Hand me the sequencer.
Throughout history, many lovers have suffered the same difficulty. Anne Boleyn was quite distressed that Henry the Eighth preferred the company of his huntsmen over that of his wife.
Since when did you develop an interest in romantic historical figures?
Six weeks ago, when you and Jeff dissolved your relationship, I saw an excellent opportunity to study that aspect of human intimacy. As your friend, it is my responsibility to be supportive in times of need.
That's very sweet, Data.
Data to Bridge. We are ready
To begin the first illumination test.
Acknowledged. All science stations, stand by. We're about to light up the nebula. Mister Worf?
Launch bay one shows ready, Commander.
Fire torpedo.
It's beautiful. Like watching fireworks when I was a little girl.
O'BRIEN:That was wonderful.
Thank you.
Really wonderful.
Is anything wrong?
My tempo was way off. I felt like I was rushing through the whole piece.
I do not believe that is so. Your rhythmic control has improved markedly. I heard no fluctuations during the performance.
Well, maybe, but I ruined the coda. I got confused with the phrasing again. I kept breathing at the wrong times.
The contrapuntal nature of the composition is most demanding. We will give more attention to the rhythmic patterns at our next rehearsal. However, I am quite certain the audience was oblivious to such nuances. They seemed to enjoy the performance thoroughly.
Thank you, Data. You're very generous.
Every night, Miles leaves his socks on the floor. When we got married, I made the mistake of picking them up a few times. Then I realised, if I kept it up I'd be doing it the rest of my life. So I stopped, figuring he'd get the point and do it himself. One night goes by, two, a week, ten days. By now there's a pile of socks half a metre high.
O'BRIEN:Come on, it wasn't half a metre.
After two weeks I couldn't stand it any more. I bundled them up and put them in the cleaning processor. And I'm still doing it.
O'BRIEN:And a very good job she does of it, too.
Keiko, you sound just like Data. He came over to my quarters the other day to give me a music lesson, and he said the funniest thing. How did you put it, about the mess?
I believe I observed that you seem to have an aversion to orderliness. But it was not intended as a humourous remark.
So, before we started, he gallantly offered to help me straighten up.
And a very good job of it I did of it, too.
Report, Mister Data.
I am nearly finished compiling readings from our most recent illuminatory burst. Dark matter density is nearly one order of magnitude higher than in similar nebulae. Life forms here may have developed in ways never before observed.
Interesting hypothesis. Are there any M-class planets we could check out?
Several, sir. The nearest is approximately three light hours from our present position.
It's worth a look. We'll continue our survey along the way.
Let's increase the flow rate and see if that helps.
Sometimes in the summer we'd go on cookouts. Just my little brother and me, and mother. She was hopeless without a replicator. We didn't care.
Children often do not develop discerning palettes until well beyond adolescence.
It's wasn't that. It's just that we felt so good being together, you know, as a family. We didn't have much of that after my father died. so those times were really special. I wish we were back there now, you and I.
The unidirectional nature of the time continuum makes that an unlikely possibility.
That what I love about you, Data. You make me laugh. I don't know why I keep falling for the wrong man. Why can't I fall for somebody like you. You're perfect.
That is not true. I have no human feelings.
But you give me so much. You spend time with me when I was lonely, you encouraged me when I'm down. No man has ever been kinder to me. Those are the things that matter. I'd better be going. With your permission, Commander.
Permission granted.
I don't know if you're aware of this, but you're very handsome.
I'll see you tomorrow.
Hello, Data. Would you like to try something new? It's a concoction I heard about on Prakal Two. I think it's wonderful but I need a second opinion.
Eighty seven percent Saurian Brandy. Targ milk and Danisian mead comprise the rest. There is an unusually high concentration of fructose compounds and monosaccharides.
Too sweet? Data, if I didn't know you better, I would say you were a little preoccupied.
Lieutenant D'Sora just gave me what could be considered a very passionate kiss in the torpedo bay.
Really? And?
I was intrigued. Jenna seemed to be displaying genuine affection for me.
Well, what do you think of her, Data?
I find her to be a competent officer. Highly motivated, though somewhat lacking in her understanding of the theory underlying the dilithium matrix application.
I meant personally?
I look forward to the time we spend together.
Well, then it seems the next move is yours. What are you going to do?
I do not know. I have no experience in such matters. I require advice.
Don't look at me. No, no, Data, I simply mean that I can't give you any advice here. It's not good to advise people about their first love affairs. That's kind of something they have to figure out for themselves.
But I am not capable of love.
Then it's going to be a very unique experience.
Data. Missing someone? I found Spot wandering through the corridor two sections away.
Thank you.
Forget to secure the door when you left?
The door sensor is programmed to recognise only humanoid forms for entry and egress. Spot could not have triggered the mechanism.
Maybe someone came in while you were away, let him out by accident. Has anything been disturbed?
It does not appear so. Computer, has anyone been in my quarters in the last twelve hours other than Commander La Forge and myself?
Negative.
That's really strange. You know, to be on the safe side maybe I should report a possible unauthorised entry to Security.
Geordi, may I ask your advice in a personal matter?
Sure, Data.
Should I pursue a relationship with Lieutenant D'Sora?
I thought she and Jeff Arton
They have discontinued their association. She has made the first move in initiating a relationship with me. What should I do?
She's just coming out of a bad situation. You know, sometimes it takes people a while, Data, but then, if they jump right into another relationship, you see, that can be trouble, unless, of course, she's really ready, and then I guess it depends on whether or not you're really serious. This can be a little complicated. Listen, my advice is ask somebody else for advice. At least someone who's got more experience at giving advice.
I think you should be careful. This isn't just some experiment you're running, Data. Jenna is a living, breathing person with needs and feelings that have to be considered.
Then you do not believe I should pursue this any further.
I didn't say that. I just want you to be aware that this is unlike any other more casual relationship that you've attempted.
I have studied much human literature on the subject of love and romantic liaisons. There are many role models for me to emulate.
Ultimately, Jenna will care for you for what you are, not what you imitate out of a book.
My programming may be inadequate to the task.
We're all more than the sum of our parts, Data. You'll have to be more than the sum of your programming.
Klingons do not pursue relationships. They conquer that which they desire. However, Lieutenant D'Sora serves under my command. If she were mistreated, I would be very displeased, sir.
I understand.
I think you should pursue it. First of all, she's a beautiful woman. She seems to be crazy about you.
Jenna has clearly demonstrated how she feels about me, but I am not capable of returning those feelings.
Data, when you get involved with another person, there are always risks of disappointment, of getting hurt.
I cannot be hurt. But she can.
Jenna knows that and she has obviously decided to take the chance. Data, when it really works between two people, it's not like anything you've ever experienced. The rewards are far beyond simple friendship.
How far, sir?
That's what I'm hoping you're going to find out.
Thank you, Commander.
Captain, I am seeking advice in how
Yes, I've heard, Data, and I would be delighted to offer any advice I can on understanding women. When as I have some, I'll let you know.
Second Officer:Second Officer's personal log, stardate 44935.6. After conferring with my colleagues regarding the nature of romantic love in general, and my own situation in particular, I have reached a decision.
They're lovely. Come in. What are they?
A variety of crystilia. Their fragrance is an evolutionary response to the acrid nature of the atmosphere on Telemarius Four.
You silver-tongued devil. Why don't I find a place to put these. Which won't be that easy. Ah.
It seems your quarters have reverted to their earlier state of disorder.
I know. I'm hopeless. There.  They're beautiful, Data. It's really sweet of you.
Commander Riker suggested this particular flower. He said it had worked for him in the past.
You didn't talk to the entire ship about us.
No. In actuality, less than one percent of the Enterprise crew was involved. It was necessary to balance theory with experiential referents. Both are required for a programme of this nature. Computer, decrease illumination level by one third standard lux.
This is all part of a programme?
Yes. One which I have just created for romantic relationships.
So I'm just a small variable in one of your new computational environments?
You are much more than that, Jenna. I have written a subroutine specifically for you. A programme within the programme. I have devoted a considerable share of my internal resources to its development.
Data, that's the nicest thing anybody's ever said to me.
Estimated time of arrival, Mister Data?
We will reach the class M planet in approximately eleven hours, sir.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Yes, Captain.
Would you step into my Ready room, please. And bring a tricorder with you.
Aye, Captain.
Captain?
What do you make of this?
I am puzzled, sir.
So am I, Mister Worf.
Captain, the only detectable bioelectric residuals are your own. You did not
No. I did not. Perhaps we have a poltergeist.
Sir?
A mischievous spirit.
Sir.
Perhaps not.
I cannot explain how an intruder entered this room, but I recommend we go to Red Alert.
Not yet.
Then I will order one of my officers to stand watch. Worf to Ensign
That's alright, Mister Worf. I think, for now, circumstances warrant caution, nothing more.
As you wish, Captain.
Enter.
I know it's a little unexpected.
You are correct. I did not anticipate your arrival until nineteen hundred hours.
I couldn't wait. I wanted you to have this.
You have often expressed dissatisfaction with the spartan nature of my quarters. Is this an attempt at embellishment?
The cat's out of the bag.
Spot?
No, I mean you've caught me in the act. I'm just trying to brighten things up around here. It's Tyrinean. What do you think?
Its line is both fluid and formal, yet retains an unpremeditated quality. The tactility of its surface embellishment is evocative of the neo-primitive period in Tyrinean blade carving.
I hadn't thought of it that way. I'm sorry. Don't let me interrupt.
As you wish.
Data?
Yes?
The Book of Love, chapter four, paragraph seventeen When your girlfriend arrives with a gift, stop whatever it is you're doing, and give her your undivided attention.
I should not have resumed my painting?
No.
Despite your suggestion that I continue?
Exactly.
I have much to learn.
Why don't we start with this. A critical analysis isn't necessarily the best response to a gift.
Perhaps if I looked for a suitable place to display it?
Much better.
The ambient light in this location accentuates its contours. However, a gift should not necessarily be placed according to aesthetic criteria. A more central location will carry added meaning.
Data, what's important is that you're trying. You don't know how much that means to me. Why don't you go back to your painting? Oh, I really mean it this time. I'll see you tonight.
Riker to Captain Picard. I think you'd better come out here, sir.
Acknowledged.
We've reached the designated coordinates, but the M-class planet, it's gone.
Are you sure there was no malfunction in the sensors?
The lateral EM scanners register radiation levels indicative of a class-M planet. Sir.
Mister Data, run a full systems diagnostic.
Warning. Atmospheric decompression in Bridge Observation Lounge. Environmental compensation sequence has been initiated.
I am not registering a hull breach.
Scan for lifeforms.
None, sir.
Captain. Standard air pressure has been reestablished in the Observation lounge.
Let's have a look. Mister Data?
Captain.
I do not understand.
Are you picking anything up, Data?
I detect no unusual readings along standard parameters. Curious. The transparent aluminum alloy of this window is exhibiting a pattern of transient electrical currents.
Explanation?
I have none. The rate is characteristic of a subspace distortion, but I am picking up no evidence of a subspace field.
We'll hold position while we seek an explanation for these anomalies. Let's divert all our resources to that end.
Honey? I'm home.
Hi.
Hi.
Any luck with your diagnostic?
Negative. We found no malfunctions.
We did a full security sweep. Nothing.
May I get you a drink, dear?
Well, yes. I'll have a Calaman Sherry.
Excellent choice. I'll join you. Computer, two Calaman sherries. Would you care for some dinner as well?
I'm too tired to think about what I want. Maybe later.
Whatever you wish, dear. There we are.
Darling, you remain as aesthetically pleasing as the first day we met. I believe I am the most fortunate sentient in this sector of the galaxy. Now, you relax. Put your feet up and I will take care of everything.
I could organise your closets for you. I have found that by grouping apparel first by function, and then by colour from light to dark, one can more easily find one's desired choice.
Data, that's all right. You don't have to do that.
But I am happy to do it.
Please, just put them down.
What do you wish me to do, dear? Am I not paying enough attention to you?
Oh, no, that's not it.
Perhaps I am not giving you enough compliments? Your hair is looking particularly silky tonight.
Data, there's just something strange about the way you're acting.
Am I not behaving as a solicitous mate?
Well, yes, but.
Tending to your every need?
What's wrong with you tonight?
My most recent self-diagnostic revealed no malfunctions. Perhaps there is something wrong with you.
I've never seen you behave so foolishly. Why are you doing this?
You don't tell me how to behave. You're not my mother.
What?
You are not my mother. That is the appropriate response for your statement that I am behaving foolishly.
Data, I think you should just leave.
You do not wish to continue our lovers quarrel?
Is that what this is?
In my study of interpersonal dynamics, I have found that conflict followed by emotional release often strengthens the connection between two people.
But there's something so forced and artificial about the way you're doing it, Data. It's just not the real you.
With regard to romantic relationships, there is no real me. I am drawing upon various cultural and literary sources to help define my role.
Kiss me.
What were you just thinking?
In that particular moment, I was reconfiguring the warp field parameters, analysing the collected works of Charles Dickens, calculating the maximum pressure I could safely apply to your lips, considering a new food supplement for Spot.
I'm glad I was in there somewhere.
A complete sensor scan of the planet and three survey probes turned up no surprises. No signs of life, nothing out of the ordinary.
Seven more unusual incidents have been reported. No casualties or damage.
We can only state that a subspace effect seems to exist within this nebula. After I have made further analysis, I may be able to adjust the ship's sensors to locate and identify the anomaly.
The ship is at risk as long as we're sitting here. We could continue the investigation outside the nebula.
Agreed. Ensign McKnight, plot the most direct course, ahead warp one.
Aye, air.
Engage.
Captain.
Captain! Explosive decompression on deck thirty seven.
Bridge to La Forge. Damage report.
We're showing damage between decks. We haven't localised it yet.
Thorne, are you all right?
Yes, sir.
La Forge to Bridge. A cryogenic control conduit just blew out on us.
I almost lost a man.
Ensign, full stop.
Aye, sir.
La Forge to Bridge
Go ahead, Commander.
I think we have some structural damage between decks thirty six and thirty seven. I'd better go check it out.
Van Mayter, you take access tube twenty three M and look at the bridge connectors. Thorne, I'll cover the aft section. You go down
Captain's log, supplemental. This series of unexplained events has now resulted in the death of a crewmember, but it appears that Mister Data may have an explanation.
During the last occurrence, I was able to confirm one of my hypotheses. The unusual preponderance of dark matter in this nebula is causing small gaps in the fabric of normal space. As the Enterprise moves through this nebula, it is colliding with these deformations.
So every time we hit one, part of the ship momentarily phases out of normal space.
Or when one of them hits us. My readings suggest that the deformations themselves are in motion.
It's a good thing one of these pockets didn't pass through a photon torpedo casing or the matter-antimatter containment pods.
The question is, how do we get out? Mister Data, could you reconfigure the sensors to detect these anomalies?
Yes, sir, but only at extremely close range. Even at minimal speed, it would be almost impossible to manoeuvre the Enterprise quickly enough to avoid them.
A shuttlecraft is more manoeuvrable.
He's right. If we could position the shuttlecraft far enough in front of the Enterprise, it could detect the pockets and allow us enough time to manoeuvre out of the way.
We could give the shuttle control of our navigational systems. That way, the corresponding manoeuvres would be virtually instantaneous.
Make it so.
I'll do my pre-flight once I'm on board.
Not this time, Will. I want you on the Bridge.
Sir?
I'm going to pilot the shuttle.
Captain, it's my duty as First Officer to safeguard the lives on this ship, including yours. The Enterprise can't afford to lose you, sir. Certainly not in this situation.
I believe our best chance of escaping this situation is for me to pilot the shuttle. It's my ship, Will. I've got to do this.
Sir.
Shuttle three to Enterprise. Telemetry link enabled.
Ship's computer is accepting navigational inputs from the shuttle.
Forward sensors are online. Ensign McKnight, plot a course for the shortest distance out of the nebula.
Plot laid in, sir.
Outer perimeter at thirty two million kilometres.
Point one impulse, Number One.
Acknowledged, Captain. We're right behind you. Riker to O'Brien, lock on to the Captain's communicator.
I want to be able to pull him out of there in case we have to.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Changing course new heading two nine nine mark zero two nine.
Main coupling is matching navigational inputs, Captain.
New heading confirmed.
I missed it by less than a thousand metres, Enterprise. Advise your status.
Sensors indicate deformation passing five hundred metres off the starboard bow.
One down, Captain
Resuming previous course.
Confirmed. Outer perimeter now at thirty point one million kilometres.
Changing course. Heading zero seven three, mark two eight eight.
New heading. two eight four mark zero one three.
Enterprise, I'm losing manoeuvrability.
Sensors indicate
Damage to the shuttle's starboard impulse nacelle, Captain.
I'm re-routing the secondary deuterium supply. Switching to manual control.
Transceiver signal is down forty two percent. Navigational inputs are not registering.
We've lost our link, Captain.
You'll have to make course changes manually until we re-establish the connection.
Understood. Mister Data, get us back online. Geordi, try boosting the power to the LU bands. McKnight, increase the distance between the Enterprise and the shuttle. We're going to need some more room to make manual adjustments.
New heading two nine nine mark one eight.
Yes, sir, I've got it. Course corrected.
Enterprise, hard starboard!
Aye, sir.
Deformation impact on deck fifteen, science section.
Damage?
Reports coming in. Minimal damage.
Mister La Forge, I am still having difficulty controlling the shuttlecraft.
Aye, sir.
Your krellide storage cells are losing their charge. Maintaining manual control is going to become increasingly difficult.
Estimated distance to the nebula's perimeter?
Four point seven million kilometres, sir.
Is there a way to transfer the microfusion thrusters so I can get a power boost?
Possibly. If you augment the thruster sequencing so that the inertial dampening fields
Bearing two seven, make that two eight five, mark two five five!
Commander, the shuttle is out of control.
Mister O'Brien do you have the Captain's signal?
O'BRIEN:I'm having trouble locking on, sir.
Sir, the shuttle's inertial dampeners have failed. It is breaking up.
Let's get him out of there.
Now would be a good time, Mister O'Brien.
Did we get him back?
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir, we got him.
I'm a little dizzy, Number One, but none the worse. I'm on my way.
Acknowledged, sir.
Commander, we are nearing the perimeter. One million kilometres away.
All right, let's make a run for it.
Aye, sir.
We're clear of the nebula, sir.
Ensign, plot a course for Starbase two sixty, warp two.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Enter.
Hi.
Hi.
The place looks great.
Thank you. It is much less Spartan, is it not?
Much less. It looks great, it really does. It looks great.
Jenna, you are repeating yourself. I have often found this to be indicative of mental distraction. Is that a correct assumption in this instance?
I'm afraid it is.
Then perhaps we should begin our meal. Among humans, a low serum glucose level is often responsible for
Data, I think we should talk. Could you sit down? I'm not sure how to begin.
What is the subject?
You and I. Our relationship.
Yes?
Data, sometimes people blindly make the same mistake again and again.
Are you currently experiencing this phenomenon?
I didn't see it until today. I got out of a relationship with an unemotional man, and I got right back into another, with a man who is absolutely incapable of emotion.
There does appear to be a recurring motif.
You were so kind and attentive. I thought that would be enough.
It is not?
No, it's not. Because as close as we are, I don't really matter to you. Not really. Nothing I can say or do will ever make you happy or sad, or touch you in any way.
That is a valid projection. It is apparent that my reach has exceeded my grasp in this particular area. I am perhaps not nearly so human as I aspire to become. If you are ready to eat, I will bring our meal.
No, that's alright, Data. I'd better go now.
As you wish. Jenna. Are we no longer a couple?
No, we're not.
Then I will delete the appropriate programme.
I'll see you later.
Hello, Spot.
That was an incredible programme.
I am glad you approve. I have always found the Black Sea at night to be a most stimulating experience.
Worf, we were walking barefoot on the beach with balalaika music in the air, ocean breeze washing over us, stars in the sky, a full moon rising, and the most you can say is stimulating?
It was very stimulating.
What?
You know, I don't spend nearly enough time on the holodeck. I should take my own advice and go there to relax. Next time I'll choose the programme. If you like the Black Sea, you're going to love Lake Cataria on Betazed.
Deanna, perhaps before there is a next time, we should discuss Commander Riker.
Why, is he coming along?
No, but I do not wish. I mean, it would be unfortunate if he. If you and I are going to continue, I do not wish to hurt his feelings.
Worf, I think it's all right to concentrate on our feelings, yours and mine.
Counsellor! What's today's date? The date!
Stardate 47988.
47988.
Captain, what's wrong?
47988. I'm not sure. I don't know how or why, but I'm moving back and forth through time.
I had this feeling I had physically left the Enterprise. I was in another time, another place. I was somewhere in the past.
Can you describe where you were, what it looked like?
You see, it's all slipping away so fast. It's like waking up from a nightmare. It was years ago. It was before I took command of the Enterprise. I was talking to someone, I can't remember who. And then it all changed. I was no longer in the past. I was now an old man in the future, and I was outside and I was doing something. I can't remember what it was. I'm sorry, it's all gone. I just can't remember.
It's all right. Have you considered the possibility that this was just a dream?
No, no, it was much more than a dream. The smells, the sounds, the very touch of things, much more real than a dream.
How long did you spend in each time period? Did it seem like minutes, hours?
You see, I can't say. At first I had a sense of confusion, disorientation. I wasn't sure where I was. And then all that passed and it all seemed perfectly natural, as though I belonged in that time. But I can't
Captain Picard to the Bridge! Captain, we've got a problem with the warp core, or the phase inducers, or some other damn thing.
Geordi.
Hello, Captain or should I call you Ambassador?
Oh, I haven't been called that for some time either.
How about Mister Picard?
How about Jean-Luc?
I don't think I could get used to that.
Good Lord, Geordi. Well, how long has it been?
Nine years.
No, no, no. Since you last called me Captain, since we were all together on the Enterprise?
Close to twenty five years.
Twenty five years. Well, time has been good to you.
IA little too good to me in some places. Can I give you a hand here?
Oh, well, I'm just tying up some vines.
You've got leaf miners. You might want to use a bacillus spray. My wife is quite a gardener. I've picked up a little bit of it.
How is Leah?
Just wonderful. Busy as ever. She's just been made director of the Daystrom Institute.
What about the little ones, Brett, Alandra and er?
Sidney.
Sidney.
Well, they're not so little any more. Brett is applying to Starfleet Academy next year.
So what brings you here?
Oh I just thought I'd stop by. Been thinking about the old days on the Enterprise. I was in the neighbourhood.
Geordi, you don't make the trip from Rigel Three to Earth just to drop by.
No.
So, you've heard?
Leah's got a few friends at Starfleet Medical. Word gets around.
I'm not an invalid. Irumodic Syndrome can take years to run its course.
I know. Once I heard, well, I just wanted to stop by just the same.
Well now that you're here, you can help me carry those tools. Well, my cooking may not be up to Leah's standards, but I can still make a decent cup of tea. Oh, I read your last novel. I thought that the protagonist a little too flamboyant, but for the rest I
Captain, are you all right? Captain!
Captain?
Will this be your first time on a Galaxy class starship? Are you all right, sir? Sir?
I'm sorry, Lieutenant. My mind must have wandered. What were you saying?
I was asking if you'd ever been aboard a Galaxy class starship before.
No. Of course, I'm familiar with the blueprints and specifications, but this will be my first time aboard.
Well then, if I may be so bold, sir, you're in for a treat. The Enterprise is quite a ship.
I'm sure she is.
Have I done something wrong, sir?
No. It's just that you look very familiar.
Enterprise to shuttlecraft Galileo. You are cleared for arrival in shuttlebay two.
Acknowledged, Enterprise. And there she is.
Captain? Captain?
Tasha. I was just with Tasha in the shuttle.
I've finished the neurographic scan. I don't see anything that might cause hallucinations or a psychogenic reaction.
Is there any indication of temporal displacement?
No. Usually a temporal shift would leave some kind of triptamine residue in the cerebral cortex, but the scan didn't show any. Personally, I think you just enjoy waking everybody up in the middle of the night.
Actually, I really like running around the ship in my bare feet.
The biospectral test results, Doctor.
Your blood gas analysis is consistent with someone who's been breathing the ship's air for weeks. If you'd been somewhere else, there would be an indication of change in the oxygen isotope ratios. Thanks. Deanna, would you excuse us please?
Of course.
Jean-Luc, I scanned for evidence of Irumodic Syndrome, as you suggested. There wasn't any. But I did find a small structural defect in the parietal lobe.
A defect that you hadn't noticed before?
It's the kind of defect that would only show up on a level four neurographic scan. It could cause you to be susceptible to several kinds of neurological disorders including Irumodic Syndrome. Now, it's possible for you to live with this defect for the rest of your life without developing a problem. Or even if you do, many people continue to live normal lives for a long time after the onset of Irumodic Syndrome.
If that's so, why do you look like you've just signed my death sentence?
I'm sorry. I guess it caught me off guard.
I wouldn't worry about it. Something tells me that you're going to have to put up with me for a long time to come.
Well, it won't be easy, but I'll manage.
Captain.
Has Worf found anything?
No, sir. His security scans came up negative. They're still checking the sensor logs but there is no indication that you ever left the ship.
I wasn't dreaming. Something happened.
Worf to Captain.
Go ahead, Mister Worf.
Sir, there is an incoming transmission from Admiral Nakamura. It is a priority one message.
Beverly? Mister Worf, will you route the call through to Doctor Crusher's office.
Aye, sir.
Captain.
Admiral.
I am initiating a fleet-wide Yellow Alert. Starfleet intelligence has picked up some alarming reports from the Romulan Empire. It appears that at least thirty Warbirds have been pulled from other assignments and are headed for the Neutral Zone.
Is there any explanation why they would make such a blatantly aggressive move?
Our operatives on Romulus have indicated that there appears to be something happening in the Neutral Zone, specifically in the Devron System. Our own long range scans have picked up some kind of spatial anomaly in the area. We can't tell what it is.
What are our orders?
This is a very delicate situation. I am deploying fifteen starships along our side of the Neutral Zone. I want you to go there as well. See if you can find out what is going on in the Devron System.
Am I authorised to enter the Neutral Zone?
Not yet. Wait and see what the Romulans do. You can conduct long range scans, send probes if necessary, but do not cross the border unless they do.
Understood.
Starfleet out.
Captain. What's wrong?
This is not my time. I don't belong here.
What?
I was somewhere else a few moments ago.
What do you mean? You've been right here with me.
No, no, no! I was somewhere else. I was, it was a long time ago. There was someone talking. I was talking to someone. Beverly. I was talking to Beverly.
It's okay, Captain. Everything's going to be all right.
I'm not senile, you know. This did happen. I was here, I was talking to you, and then I was somewhere else. I was on the Enterprise. I was back on the Enterprise. At least, I think that's where it was. I was in Sickbay. Well, it might have been a hospital.
Captain, I think we should go back to the house and call your doctor
Yes, yes, I know what you're thinking. It's the Irumodic Syndrome. He's beginning to lose his mind, the old man. Well, it's not that. And I'm not daydreaming either.
Well, all right. All right. So, what do you want do about it?
Data. I want to see Data.
Data? Why?
Because I think he can help.
Help how?
I don't know! I don't know! I want to see Data!
Okay, then, all right, let's go see Data. He's still at Cambridge, isn't he?
Yes, I think he is.
You see them, don't you?
See who?
They're everywhere. They're laughing at me. Why are they laughing?
Come on, Captain. Let's go see Data.
Yes, Data. We'll go see Data.
I know how it sounds but it happened. It was real. I was there, back on board the Enterprise.
How do you like your tea?
Tea? Earl Grey. Hot.
Course it's hot. What do you want in it?
Nothing. Well, Data, I must say, this is a fine place you have here. They certainly treat professors pretty well at Cambridge
Holding the Lucasian Chair does have its perquisites. This house originally belonged to Sir Isaac Newton when he held the position. It's become the traditional residence.
Here you go.
Thank you.
If you're really his friend, you'll get him to take that grey out of his hair. Looks like a bloody skunk.
Jessel. She can be frightfully trying at times, but she does make me laugh.
Data, what is it with the hair anyway?
I found that a touch of grey adds an air of distinction.
You say this is Earl Grey? I'd swear that it was Darjeeling.
Captain, how long has it been since you've seen a physician about your Irumodic Syndrome?
A week. They've prescribed peridaxon.
But sir, peridaxon
Yes, I know, it's not a cure, There's nothing that can prevent the deterioration of the synaptic pathways. You think that I'm senile, that all this is just a delusion.
Now come on, Captain, no one said anything of the kind.
In all honesty, Captain, the thought has occurred to me. However, there's nothing to disprove what you're saying. So it's possible something is happening to you. The first thing we should do is run a complete series of neurographic scans. We can use the equipment at the biometrics lab here on the campus. Jessel, ask Professor Ripper to take over my lecture for tomorrow. Possibly for the rest of the week. Captain, we'll get to the bottom of this.
That's the Data that I remember. I knew I could count on you.
Commanding officer Enterprise arriving.
To Captain Jean-Luc Picard, stardate 41148
You are hereby requested and required to take command
to take command of the USS Enterprise as of this date. Signed Rear Admiral Norah Satie, Starfleet Command.
Red Alert! All crew to battle stations.
You heard him. Move!
Personal log, stardate 41153.7. Recorded under security lockout Omega three two seven. I have decided not to inform this crew of my experiences. If it's true that I've travelled to the past, I cannot risk giving them foreknowledge of what's to come.
Report.
We've completed a full subspace scan of the ship and surrounding space. We've detected no unusual readings or anomalies.
With all due respect, sir, it would be helpful if we knew exactly what we were looking for.
Noted. Counsellor, do you sense anything unusual on board the Enterprise? Perhaps an alien presence that doesn't belong here, maybe one operating on a level of intelligence far superior to our own?
No, sir. I'm only aware of the crew and the families on board the ship.
Mister Worf, initiate a level two security alert on all decks until further notice.
With all due respect, sir, I'm the Security Chief on this ship. Unless you're planning to make a change.
No, of course not. Lieutenant, security alert two.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:Captain Picard to the Bridge, please.
We're on our way, Chief.
O'BRIEN:Sir, Starfleet has just issued an alert. It appears a number of vessels are moving toward the Neutral Zone between Romulan and Federation space.
What kind of vessels?
O'BRIEN:Freighters, transports, all civilians. None of them Starfleet ships.
This tells me that a large spatial anomaly has appeared in the Neutral Zone, in the Devron System.
Captain, it could be a Romulan trick to lure our ships into the Neutral Zone as an excuse for a military strike.
O'BRIEN:Starfleet's cancelling our mission to Farpoint Station and ordering us to the Neutral Zone as soon as we leave the Spacedock.
No, we'll proceed to Farpoint.
Sir?
You heard me.
Captain, the security of the Federation could be at stake.
Mister Worf, will you man your station.
Aye, sir.
Captain, perhaps if we understood your thinking, if you could explain
I've no intention of explaining to anyone. We will proceed with our mission to Farpoint as planned. Chief O'Brien, am I right in thinking that you're having a problem with the warp plasma inducers.
O'BRIEN:That's right, sir.
Well I know how to get them back online. You're with me. We'll be in main Engineering.
Mister O'Brien, will you use these specifications to bypass the secondary plasma inducer.
O'BRIEN:You have to realise sir, this isn't exactly my area of expertise. The Chief Engineer should be making these modifications.
But the Chief Engineer isn't on board. Mister O'Brien, trust me. I know you can do it. All those years you spent as a child building those model starship engines. They were well worth it.
O'BRIEN:How did you know that, sir?
From your Starfleet records.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir. I'll get right to these modifications. Fletcher, tell Munoz and Lee to get up here right away.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:We have to realign the entire power grid. We'll all be burning the midnight oil on this one.
That would be inadvisable.
O'BRIEN:Excuse me?
If you attempt to ignite a petroleum product on this ship at zero hundred hours, it will activate the fire suppression system, which would seal off this entire compartment.
O'BRIEN:That was just an expression.
Expression of what?
O'BRIEN:A figure of speech. I was trying to tell him that we'd be working late.
Ah. Then to burn the midnight oil implies late work?
O'BRIEN:That's right.
I am curious. What is the etymology of that idiom? How did it come to be used in contemporary language?
O'BRIEN:I don't know, sir.
Commander Data, welcome on board. It's so very good to see you.
It is good to see you, too, sir.
I could use your help with the infuser array.
Certainly.
As you can see, we're having difficulty with the plasma conduits.
This will need a completely new field induction subprocessor. It appears that we will be required to ignite the midnight petroleum, sir.
Jean-Luc, what's going on?
It happened again.
A time shift?
Yes.
What happened?
It's still a little vague, but I can remember more this time. It seems that every time I shift periods, I can retain more memory. At first, it appeared that I was in the future, years from now, and then I was in the past just before our first mission.
What is it?
I just scanned his temporal lobe and compared it to the scan I performed just a few minutes before. There's a thirteen percent increase in the acetylcholine of the hippocampus. Within a matter of minutes, you have accumulated over two days worth of memories.
Counsellor, do you remember when I first came on board the Enterprise?
Yes.
What happened after the welcoming ceremony?
There was a reception in Ten Forward. I introduced you to Worf and the other senior officers.
Do you have any memory of my calling Red Alert in Spacedock? Do you remember Starfleet diverting us from Farpoint to the Neutral Zone to investigate a spatial anomaly?
No.
It would appear there is a discontinuity between the time periods you described. Events in one time period would seem to have no effect on the other two.
And yet in both the past and the present there's a report of the same anomaly in the Devron System. I find it hard to believe that that's a coincidence.
For all I know, I may find the same thing in the future.
Perhaps the anomaly is a temporal disturbance of some kind.
How is all this related to your time shifting?
These are all very important questions, and perhaps I will find answers to them in the past, but now we have a potentially dangerous threat from the Romulans. I want all departments to present a battle readiness report to me at oh eight hundred hours tomorrow morning. Dismissed.
Deanna, it's going to be a late night. Would you like to have some dinner first?
Actually I, we have plans.
Oh. I see. I'm sorry. I'll see you in the morning.
Goodnight, sir.
Worf.
I want continuous subspace sweeps. We may be able to detect a temporal disturbance.
Aye, sir.
Will, this time shifting. When it happens I experience a momentary disorientation. If that should happen during a crisis, I want you to take command immediately. Number One?
I'm sorry. Be prepared to take command. Aye, sir.
Speaking of disorientation, are you all right?
I'm just a little distracted. I'm fine.
You have the Bridge, Number One. I'll be in my Ready room.
Come.
Milk, warm, a dash of nutmeg.
What's this?
A prescription. A glass of warm milk and eight hours uninterrupted sleep.
Beverly.
Doctor's orders. You're exhausted. Look, I don't know whether you've slept in the past or in the future, but I'm sure you haven't slept in the present. Now get some rest, or I'll have you relieved and sedated.
Yes, sir. What? Hey, Beverly?
As a physician, it's often my job to give people unpleasant news. To tell them that they need surgery or that they can't have children or that they might be facing a difficult illness.
But you said yourself that this is only a possibility.
But you've been to the future. You know it's going to happen.
I prefer to look on the future as something which is not written in stone. A lot of things can happen in twenty five years.
A lot of things can happen.
Captain?
Captain, wake up.
Yes. What is it? Have we reached the Neutral Zone?
The Neutral Zone?
Sorry. I was in the past again. What's going on?
Data's arranged for us to run those tests on you in the biometrics lab. We're ready to go if you are.
No, no, no. No, we have to get to the Neutral Zone.
The Neutral Zone? Why?
In the other two time periods, Starfleet reported a sort of a spatial anomaly in, in, in the Devron system. In Devron system in the Neutral Zone.
Captain.
If the anomaly appeared there in the past, then it might be here too and we have to find out.
Just because you've seen it in two other time frames, doesn't mean that it's going to be here.
But if it is here, then it means something. Damn it, Geordi, I know what we have to do!
All right. Okay. But first, there is no Neutral Zone, remember?
Right. Right. Klingons. In this time period, the Klingons have taken over the Romulan Empire.
Right now relations between us and the Klingons aren't too cosy.
I know that. I haven't completely lost my mind, you know.
Well, if we're going to the Devron system, we're going to need a ship.
Right. Now, I think it's time to call in some old favours. Contact Admiral Riker, Starbase two four seven.
Jean-Luc, you know I'd like to help, but frankly, what you're asking for is impossible. The Klingons have closed their borders to all Federation starships.
Will, if this spatial anomaly really is in the Devron System.
I saw a report from Starfleet Intelligence this morning on that sector. There is no activity. There is nothing unusual going on in the Devron system.
Well I don't believe it! What if their long range scanners are faulty? We have to go there and see for ourselves.
Look, I've got the Yorktown out near the border. I'll have her run some long range scans in the Devron System. If she finds out anything, I'll let you know.
Will, that is just not good enough.
It's going to have to be. I'm sorry. It's all I can do. Riker out.
Computer, restore holographic image.
Damn him, anyway. After all we've been through together. He's been sitting behind that desk too long.
Captain, I'm sorry. I guess all we can do now is wait and see if the Yorktown finds anything.
There is another option. We could arrange passage aboard a medical ship.
Medical ship?
Yes, sir. There was an outbreak of Terrellian plague on Romulus. The Klingons have been allowing Federation medical ships to cross the border.
Yes. Yes!
So, What we need is a medical ship.
I think I can arrange that. Data, find the USS Pasteur. I have some pull with the Captain. At least, I used to have.
Well, this is a page from the past. I never thought I'd see either of you on a starship again.
Hello, Doctor.
Geordi.
Doctor.
Data.
Let's just choose one.
All right.
So, did you get my message?
Yes. Jean-Luc, crossing into Klingon territory. It's absurd. But then I never could say no to you.
Oh. So that's why you married me.
Well now, the first order of business is to get clearance to cross the Klingon border.
Agreed. What about Worf?
Yes, that's it. Worf. Yes, that's the answer. Worf will help us.
Data, isn't Worf still a member of the Klingon High Council?
I'm not sure. Information on the Klingon political structure is hard to come by these days. However, at last report Worf was governor of H'atoria, a small Klingon colony near the border.
Captain Picard?
PICARD + CRUSHER:Yes?
Captain, McKinley Station is signalling. They want to know when we'll be docking.
Tell McKinley we've been called away on a priority mission.
Aye, sir.
So, you kept the name.
I've prepared quarters for you on deck five. You might want to get some rest.
No, I'm fine. I don't need rest.
Nell, please escort the Ambassador to his quarters.
Look, you are treating me as if I am an invalid. I do have a few years left in me yet. I do not want to be led around, and I do not want to be patronised.
You're right. I'm sorry.
Now, I'll go and get some rest.
How long since his last neurological scan?
I'm not sure, but I wouldn't try suggesting it. He says he's not taking any more damn tests.
Do you really think he's moving through time?  I'm not sure I do either. But he's Jean-Luc Picard and if he wants to go on one more mission, that's what we're going to do.
We'll find the anomaly. I know we will.
Report.
O'BRIEN:We're nearing the coordinates you gave me, sir.
Is there anything unusual in the vicinity, Mister Data?
How would you define unusual, sir? Every region of space has its own unique properties that cannot be found anywhere else.
There should be a barrier of some sort nearby. A large plasma field, highly disruptive.
Nothing, sir.
This is the right time, the right place. He should be here now.
O'BRIEN:Who, sir?
Q! We're here! This has gone on long enough! Counsellor, do you sense an alien presence?
No, sir.
What is a Q?
It's a letter of the alphabet, as far as I know.
I don't understand. This is not the way it's supposed to happen. Maintain this position. I'll be in my Ready room.
Mon capitane. I thought you'd never get here.
Q. I knew it. What's going on?
It's Judge Q to you. And isn't it obvious what's going on?
The last time that I stood here was seven years ago.
Seven years ago. How little do you mortals understand time. Must you be so linear, Jean-Luc?
You accused me of being the representative of a barbarous species.
I believe my exact words were a dangerous, savage, child race.
We demonstrated to you that mankind had become peaceful and benevolent. You agreed and you let us go on our way. Now why am I standing here again?
Oh, you'd like me to connect the dots for you, lead you from A to B to C so your puny mind can comprehend. How boring. They'd be so much more entertained if you tried to figure it out. I'll answer any ten questions that call for a yes or a no. Well?
Are you putting mankind on trial again?
No.
Is there any connection between the trial seven years ago and whatever's going on now?
I'd have to say yes.
The spatial anomaly in the Neutral Zone, is it related to what's happening?
Most definitely yes.
Is it part of a Romulan plot, a ploy to start a war?
No and no. Five down.
That's only four.
Is it a Romulan plot? Is it a ploy to start a war? Those are separate questions.
Did you create the anomaly?
No, no, no. You're going to be so surprised when you realise where it came from, if you ever figure it out.
Are you responsible for my shifting through time?
I'll answer that question if you promise you won't tell anyone.  Yes.
Why?
Sorry. That's not a yes or no question. You forfeit the rest of your questions. I expected as much. You're such a limited creature. A perfect example of why we made our decision. The trial never ended, Captain. We never reached a verdict. But now we have. You're guilty.
Guilty of what?
Of being inferior. Seven years ago I said we'd be watching you, and we have been, hoping that your ape-like race would demonstrate some growth, give some indication that your minds have room for expansion. But what have we seen instead? You worrying about Commander Riker's career, listening to Counsellor Troi's pedantic psychobabble, indulging Data in his witless exploration of humanity.
We've journeyed to countless new worlds, we've contacted new species, we have expanded our understanding of the universe.
In your own paltry, limited way. You have no idea how far you still have to go. But instead of using the last seven years to change and to grow, you have squandered them.
We are what we are, and we're doing the best we can. It is not for you to set the standards by which we should be judged.
Oh, but it is, and we have. Time may be eternal, Captain, but our patience is not. It's time to put an end to your trek through the stars, make room for other more worthy species.
You're going to deny us travel through space?
You obtuse piece of flotsam. You are to be denied existence. Humanity's fate has been sealed. You will be destroyed.
Q, I do not believe that even you are capable of such an act.
I? There you go again, always blaming me for everything. Well this time I'm not your enemy. I'm not the one that causes the annihilation of mankind. You are.
Me?
That's right. You're doing it right now. You did it before and you'll do it again.
What sort of meaningless doubletalk is this?
He doesn't understand. I have only myself to blame, I suppose. I believed in you. I thought you had potential. But apparently I was wrong. May whatever god you believe in have mercy on your soul. This court stands adjourned.
Commander, assemble the senior staff and go to Red alert. We have a bigger problem than I thought.
Red alert!
I don't believe him. This has to be another one of Q's games. He's probably listening to us right now, getting a big laugh out of watching us jump through his hoops.
Normally I would agree with you, but this time I feel that somehow it is different. There was a deadly earnestness about him. I think he's serious. Which means that in some fashion, I am going to be the cause of the destruction of humanity.
But didn't Q say you already had caused it?
And that you were causing it now?
Given the fact that there is an apparent discontinuity between the three time periods the Captain has visited, Q's statement may be accurate, if confusing.
So what am I going to do? Lock myself in a room in all three different time periods?
Captain, maybe not acting is what causes the destruction of mankind. What if you were needed on the Bridge at a key moment, and you weren't there?
I don't think we can start second guessing ourselves. I think we have to proceed normally and deal with each situation as it occurs.
Agreed. I've been thinking about my conversation with Q. He admitted that he was responsible for my shifting through time. Now it occurred to me that he might be giving me a chance somehow to save humanity.
What makes you say that?
Well, he's always had a certain fascination with humanity, with myself in particular. I think he has more than a passing interest in what happens to me.
That is true. Q's interest in you has always been very similar to that of a master and his beloved pet. That was only an analogy, Captain.
If I weren't travelling through time I would never have realized that the anomaly in the Neutral Zone appeared there in the past as well. Assuming that's an important piece of a larger puzzle, my ability to shift through time may be the key to understanding what's going on.
Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
We're approaching the Neutral Zone, Captain.
We're on our way.
All stop. Initiate long range scans.
Captain, there are four warbirds holding position on the Romulan side of the Neutral Zone.
The Federation Starships Concord and Bozeman are holding position on our side.
A face off. The question is, who's going to move first?
We are. Mister Worf, hail the Romulan flagship.
The warbird Terix is responding.
On screen.
Captain Picard.
Hello, Worf. It's been a long time.
It is good to see you again.
Have you had a chance to read our request?
Yes. But you must realise I am no longer a member of the High Council.
But surely, Worf, you must still have some influence. We have to get into the Neutral Zone. Can't you just get us permission to cross the border?
I must refuse. It is for your own safety. The Neutral Zone is extremely volatile. If Admiral Riker had given you a starship with a cloak, you would have been safe. It is hard to believe that even he would refuse to help you.
I don't care what kind of ship we go in. We have to get to the Devron System.
I am sorry. My first duty is to the Empire. I must adhere to regulations.
I know that I'm an old man and I'm out of touch, but the Worf that I remember was more concerned with things like honour and loyalty than rules and regulations. But that was a long time ago. Maybe you're not the Worf once I knew.
Dor sHo GHA! You have always used your knowledge of Klingon honour and tradition to get what you want from me.
Because it always works, Worf. Your problem is that you really do have a sense of honour and you really do care about trust and loyalty. Don't blame me for knowing you so well.
Very well. You may cross the border. But only if I come with you. I am familiar with the Neutral Zone.
Terms accepted.
Inform transporter room two to beam the Governor aboard. I must make one thing very clear, Jean-Luc. If we run into any serious opposition, I'm taking us back into Federation territory. We aren't well armed and wouldn't last long in a fight.
Governor Worf is aboard, Captain.
All right. Set course for the Devron system, warp thirteen.  Once more, for old time's sake?
Engage.
O'BRIEN:Engage to where, sir?
Set a course for the Devron system, and engage at warp nine.
The Devron System is inside the Neutral Zone, sir.
I'm aware of that, Lieutenant. Carry out my orders, Chief.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Captain, may I have a word with you in private?
Yes of course, Counsellor. Contact Farpoint Station. I wish to speak with Commander Riker.
Aye, sir.
Captain, I just wanted to voice my concerns about the way the crew is responding to your unexpected orders.
They don't trust me. They think that I'm behaving erratically.
Some do. Others are confused. It takes some time for a new crew to get to know their Captain, and for him to know them.
I understand, but I also know what this crew is capable of, even if they don't.
It would also help if they knew what was going on.
I know it's difficult operating in the dark, but right now I don't think I have any other choice.
Yar to Captain Picard. I have Commander Riker for you, sir.
Excuse me. Put him through here. Commander Riker. I wanted to inform you that we'll be delayed in picking you up at Farpoint Station.
I see. May I ask how long?
I can't say. I'll keep you updated. Will you inform Doctor Crusher and Lieutenant La Forge of our delay?
Understood.
Riker out.
Is there anything else, Counsellor?
Actually, sir, there is. I was debating whether to mention it, and perhaps. It's about Commander Riker.
What about him?
I think you should know he and I have had a prior relationship.
I see. Do you think this will interfere with your duties?
Not at all. It happened several years ago and it's well behind both of us now. I just thought you should know.
I appreciate your telling me, but I'm quite sure that the two of you will find some way to deal with the situation.
Thank you, sir.
Tea, Earl Grey, hot.
That beverage has not been programmed into the replication system.
So, Captain how long shall we stare at each other across the Neutral Zone?
There is an alternative, Tomolak. We each know why we're here. We could each send one ship into the Neutral Zone to investigate the anomaly in the Devron System.
Has Starfleet Command approved this arrangement?
No.
I like it already. Agreed. One ship from each side. But I warn you, if another Federation starship tries to enter the Zone.
There is no need to make threats. We each know the consequences.
Very well. I'll see you in the Devron system.
Helm, set course for the Devron system, warp five.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Sensors are picking up a large subspace anomaly directly ahead.
All stop. On screen. Full scan, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
We have to get as much information as possible about that anomaly.
We are approaching the Devron system, Captain. Sensors are picking up a large subspace anomaly directly ahead.
All stop. On screen. Then it is larger in the past.
Sir?
Nothing. Full scan, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
On screen! On screen! Let's see it!
As you can see, sir, there's nothing there.
Still nothing, Captain. I've conducted a full sensor sweep out to one light year from the Pasteur. No temporal anomalies, no particle fluctuations, nothing.
I don't understand. It was here in the other two time periods. Why isn't it here now?
Captain. I have been monitoring Klingon communication channels. Several warships have been dispatched to this sector to search for a renegade Federation vessel.
You're not thinking about leaving?
There's nothing here, Jean-Luc.
There should be! There has to be! Data, is there some other way to scan for a temporal disturbance? Something that isn't covered in a normal sensor sweep.
There are several methods of detecting temporal disturbances, but we're limited by the equipment on the Pasteur.
We should head back to Federation territory.
However, it may be possible to modify the main deflector to emit an inverse tachyon pulse, which could scan beyond the subspace barrier.
That's it. Make it so.
Wait a minute. Data, how long would this take?
To make the modifications and search the entire Devron system will take approximately fourteen hours.
All right. Data, begin to modify the tachyon pulse. Ensign Chilton, lay in a course back to the Federation. We'll stay here for six more hours, and if we haven't found anything we're heading back, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
But six more hours may not be enough. We have to stay here until we find it, no matter how long it takes.
Carry out my orders. May I see you a moment?
Beverly, I cannot believe that you are not willing to stay here until we
Don't you ever question my orders on the Bridge of my ship again!
Damn it, I was just trying to. Look, there are larger concerns here. What you don't understand is that
I understand that you would never have tolerated that kind of behaviour back on the Enterprise and I won't here. I don't care if you're my ex-Captain or my ex-husband.
You're right. I was out of line. It won't happen again. But what you have to understand is what is at stake here. Q has said that all of humanity will be destroyed.
I know. That's why I've allowed us to stay here longer and keep looking. But I also want you to allow for the possibility that none of what you're saying is real.
What?
Jean-Luc, I care for you too much not to tell you the truth. You have advanced Irumodic Syndrome. It's possible that all of this is in your mind. I'll stay here six hours longer and then we're heading home. I want you to remember, if it were anyone but you, we wouldn't even be here.
Eh? What was that she said, sonny? I couldn't quite hear her.
Q? What is going on here? Where is the anomaly?
Where's your mommy? Well, I don't know.
Answer me.
There is an answer, Jean-Luc, but I can't hand it to you. Although you do have help.
What help?
You're not alone, you know. What you were and what you are to become will always with you.
My time shifting. The answer does lie there, doesn't it. Now, tell me one thing. This anomaly we're looking for, will that destroy humanity?
You're forgetting, Jean-Luc. You destroy humanity.
By doing what? When? How can
Report, Mister Data.
The anomaly is two hundred million kilometres in diameter. It is a highly focused temporal energy source which is emitting approximately the same energy output as ten G type stars.
What is the source of this energy?
I am uncertain, sir. Sensors are unable to penetrate the anomaly.
What if we modified the main deflector to emit an inverse tachyon pulse. That might be able to scan beyond the subspace barrier. That might give us some idea of what the interior of this thing looks like.
That is a most intriguing idea, sir. I do not believe a tachyon beam was ever used in such a way. I had no idea you were so versed in the intricacies of temporal theory, sir.
I have some friends who are quite well versed in it. Make it so.
I believe we can make the necessary modifications in main Engineering, sir.
We can get more power if we reroute the primary EPS taps to the deflector array.
Agreed. Initiating tachyon pulse.
Okay. the pulse is holding steady. We're starting to receive data from the scan.
It will take the computer some time to give us a complete picture of the anomaly's interior. I suggest we
Geordi? What is wrong?
I don't know. It's like somebody's sticking an ice pick in my temples. My visor's picking up all kinds of electromagnetic fluctuations.
Data to Sickbay. Medical emergency in main Engineering.
This is amazing. The DNA in his optic nerves is regenerating. Geordi, it's as if you're growing new eyes.
How is this possible?
It shouldn't be possible at all. There's no medical explanation for spontaneous regeneration of an organ.
Doctor we've just gotten reports from two crewmembers who say they have old scars which are healing themselves.
Captain, I believe I have a partial explanation. I have completed my analysis of the anomaly. It appears to be a multi-phasic temporal convergence in the space-time continuum.
In English, Data.
It is, in essence, an eruption of anti-time.
Anti-time?
A relatively new concept in temporal mechanics. The relationship between anti-time and normal time is analogous to the relationship between antimatter and normal matter.
So if time and anti-time were to collide
They would annihilate one other, causing a rupture in space. I believe this is what happened in the Devron system. The rupture may be sending out waves of temporal energy which are disrupting the normal flow of time.
Data, what could have caused this collision of time and anti-time?
Anti-time, sir?
I believe that if you modify the deflectors to send out an inverse tachyon pulse, then you'll find that the anomaly is a rupture between time and anti-time.
That is a fascinating hypothesis. How did you formulate
I don't have time to discuss it now, Mister Data. Do the modifications and send out the pulse. Then try working on a theory as to what caused this rupture. Mister O'Brien, how large is this anomaly?
O'BRIEN:Approximately four hundred million kilometres in diameter, sir.
I don't understand why it's bigger in the past.
Lieutenant, you have the Bridge. I'll be in my Ready room.
Aye, sir.
What's going on?
We're under attack.
Shield strength down to fifty two percent. Minor damage to the port nacelle.
Two Klingon attack cruisers decloaking to port and starboard.
Warp speed. Get us out of here.
Warp power's offline, sir.
Heading one four eight, mark two one five. Full impulse.
Impulse power's fluctuating. Shields down to thirty percent.
Weapons status?
These weapons are no match for their shields.
Geordi, we need more warp power, now.
I'm trying, Captain. They're too much for us. I can't keep the phase inducers online.
Shields down to nine percent. One more hit and they'll collapse.
Open a channel.
Open.
This is Captain Beverly Picard. We are a medical ship on a mission of mercy. Please break off all  Worf, signal our surrender.
Tos Vah'cha Worf, do'lo jegh!
Our shields have collapsed. We are defenceless.
Captain, another ship decloaking bearing two one five mark three one oh. It's the Enterprise.
They're hailing us.
On screen.
I had a feeling you weren't going to listen to me. Stand by. I'll see if I can get the Klingons' attention.
The Enterprise is drawing their fire.
Damage report.
The warp core has been badly damaged. There's a breach in progress.
We have to stop it!
The Klingon ship is disengaging. Admiral Riker is hailing us.
Our sensors indicate your ship has a warp core breach in progress. Prepare for emergency beam out.
All the Pasteur's crew are safely on board, Admiral.
Raise the shields. Where are the Klingons?
They're still moving off, sir. Half a light year away.
They'll be back. As I said, I figured you wouldn't take no for answer.  But I thought you had more sense than to send a defenceless ship across the border into hostile territory with no escort.
If you had not turned down the Captain when he came to you for help, none of this would have happened. Unlike you, I still have a sense of honour and loyalty.
We don't have time for this. The Pasteur's core is going to breach.
Take us out of here. Full impulse.
All right, let's get out of here.
No, Will, we can't! We have to save humanity.
Engage cloak.
Admiral, we took a direct hit to the starboard plasma coil. Our cloak isn't functioning. Engineering reports it'll be seven hours before we can cloak again.
All right, we'll do it the old-fashioned way. Set a course for the Federation, warp thirteen.
Will, don't leave! We have to stay here and find what is causing the temporal anomaly.
We can't stay, Captain.
We have to! Everything depends on it! We can't leave now! Please, listen to me!
Your visual acuity's improving by the hour, Geordi.
I'm sorry, Alyssa. May I take another look? You'll have a little tenderness for a few days. That's to be expected.
Jean-Luc. I'll be right back, Alyssa.
Alyssa lost the baby. I think it's the same phenomenon that affected Geordi. Somehow, the temporal energy from the anomaly caused the foetal tissue to revert to an earlier stage of development. It's as if the unborn child began to grow younger, until finally the DNA itself began to break down.
How is she?
Physically, she's fine for now. But if this temporal reversion continues, I don't think any of us are going to be fine for much longer.
So this is affecting the entire crew.
Our cellular structures appear to be coalescing, reverting to earlier forms. In some cases, this has caused old injuries to be healed, but the effect is only temporary. Eventually, may kill all of us.
We have to find out how widespread this effect is. Contact Starbase Twenty three, that's the nearest outpost. Have them check their personnel to see if there are any signs of temporal reversion.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, how close are you to completing the tachyon scan?
Approximately one hour forty five minutes, sir.
Good. When it's done I want you to find some way of collapsing this anomaly without making things worse. Give me a risk analysis of whatever solution you come up with.
Aye, sir.
Dismissed.
It's a pretty big decision, Jean-Luc. Tinkering with an anomaly you know nothing about, trying to collapse it. Isn't that risky?
Why? Will that cause the destruction of mankind?
Maybe. On the other hand, maybe leaving it alone would be the wrong thing to do. It's a pretty big decision, all right. Would it help to have a different perspective?
Welcome home.
Home?
Don't you recognise your old stomping grounds? This is Earth, France, about, oh, three and a half billion years ago, give or take an eon or two. Smells awful, doesn't it? All that sulphur and volcanic ash. I really must speak to the maid.
Q, is there any point to all this?
Look.
So the anomaly is here too, at Earth.
At this point in history the anomaly fills your entire quadrant of the galaxy.
The further back in time, the larger the anomaly.
Come here. There's something I want to show you. You see this?
This is you. I'm serious. Right here, life is about to form on this planet for the very first time. A group of amino acids are about to combine and form the first protein, the building blocks of what you call life. Strange, isn't it? Everything you know, your entire civilisation, it all begins right here in this little pond of goo. Appropriate, somehow, isn't it? Too bad you didn't bring your microscope. It's really quite fascinating. Oh, look, there they go. The amino acids are moving closer and closer, and closer. Oh! Nothing happened. See what you've done?
Are you saying that I caused the anomaly, and that the anomaly somehow disrupted the beginnings of life on Earth?
Congratulations.
Let's concentrate on how this anomaly was initially formed. Speculation?
Our tachyon pulse has been unable to completely penetrate the anomaly. If we had information on the centre of the phenomenon, we might have a basis for speculation.
Is there any way that we can scan the interior?
O'BRIEN:I've tried everything I know. There's just too much interference. There's nothing on board that'll do the job.
Do you know what could?
In theory, a tomographic imaging scanner capable of multiphasic resolution would be able to penetrate this much interference. The Daystrom Institute has been working on such a device, but it is still only theoretical.
Data do we have a tomographic imaging scanner on board?
Yes, sir.
Can you use it to scan the interior of the anomaly?
Possibly.  There is a great deal of interference, but I am getting some readings. This is very unusual.
What is it?
It appears that our tachyon pulse is converging with two other tachyon pulses at the centre of the anomaly. The other two pulses have the exact same amplitude modulation as our own pulse. It is as if all three originated from the Enterprise.
Three pulses, from three time periods, converging at one point in space.
Captain, what are you suggesting?
Computer, where is Admiral Riker?
Admiral Riker is in Ten Forward.
The ship has held up pretty well over the years.
They tried to decommission her about five years ago. One of the advantages of being an Admiral is you get to choose your own ship.
Will, how long is this thing between you and Worf going to go on?
It's been going on for over twenty years. Doesn't look like it's going to end any time soon.
I suspect the last thing Counsellor Troi would have wanted is for the two of you to be alienated.
I agree. I think it's time to put it behind you.
I tried at Deanna's funeral. He wouldn't even talk to me.
Might have been tough for him then. He took her death pretty hard.
Oh, yeah? Well he wasn't the only one.
I know, but I think in his mind you were the reason that he and Deanna never got together.
I never did anything to stand in his way.
Didn't you, Will?
Did I? I didn't want to admit that it was over. I always thought that we'd get together again. And then she was gone. You think you have all the time in the world, until. Yeah.
Ensign. How do I get to Ten Forward?
It's four decks down, sir. Section zero zero five.
Thank you.
Oh, my god.
Will! Will, I know why it's happening. I know what's causing the anomaly. We have to go back.
The only place we're going back to, sir, is bed.
Damn it Will, I know why it's happening. We caused the anomaly with the tachyon pulse. It happened three times, Will. We did it in three different time periods!
I think you'd better come with me.
Will you leave me alone? Damn it, I'm not stupid. Will, the tachyon pulses, they were used in the same spot in three different time periods. Don't you see? When the tachyon pulse used. I mean, I mean when the Pasteur used the tachyon pulse, then, then, we I mean everything started, Will. We set everything in motion. It's like the chicken and the egg, Will, the chicken and the egg! We think it started in the past but it didn't. It started right here, in the future. That's why it's getting larger in the past.
I think I know what the Captain's talking about. If I'm not mistaken, he's describing a paradox.
Yes! Right. That's it.
Intriguing. It is possible we could've caused the very anomaly we've been looking for. Let us assume for a moment that the Captain has been travelling through time. Let us also assume he has initiated an tachyon pulse at the same coordinates in space in all three time periods. In that case, it is possible that the convergence of three tachyon pulses could've ruptured the subspace barrier and created an anti-time reaction.
I see where you're going, Data. And because anti-time operates opposite the way normal time does, the effects would travel backwards through the space-time continuum.
Yes. That's why it gets larger in the past. It grows as it travels backwards in time.
All right. Just for the moment lets say that you're right. What do we do?
Go back, Will. We go back to the Devron System.
He may be right.
If we go back to the Devron system now, we might be able to see the initial formation of the anomaly.
Riker to Bridge. Set course for the Devron system, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
Worf, we could use a hand.
Entering the Devron system, sir.
Full stop.
Sensors are picking up a small temporal anomaly off the port bow.
On screen.
I was right.
It's an anti-time eruption. It seems to have been formed within the last six hours.
We must stop it here so it can't travel back through time.
Mister Data, we need a solution and we need it now.
The anomaly is being sustained by the continuing tachyon pulses in the other two time periods. I suggest shutting them down.
The next time I'm there, it's the first thing I'll do.
Isn't there something more we can do here to seal the rupture somehow?
I will investigate the options.
Data, disengage the tachyon pulse.
Sir?
Do it. The convergence of the tachyon pulses from the three time periods is what is causing the anomaly.
Aye, sir.
Is there any change in the anomaly?
No, sir.
Disengage the tachyon pulse.
O'BRIEN:but e haven't finished the scan, sir.
I know that. But it is imperative that you disengage the tachyon pulse immediately.
Aye, sir. Disengaging.
Why isn't the anomaly being affected?
O'BRIEN:Why would it be, sir?
I've shut off the tachyon pulses in the other time periods but it hasn't changed the anomaly.
It remains unaffected here as well, sir.
What do we do?
The only way to stop this thing's to repair the rupture at the focal point where time and anti-time are converging.
How do we do that?
It would require taking the ship into the anomaly itself. Once inside, we may be able to use the engines to create a static warp shell.
Yeah, Data, that's right. And the shell would act as an artificial subspace barrier separating time and anti-time.
Collapsing the anomaly and restoring the normal flow of time. But this would have to be done in the other two time periods as well.
That could be a problem. The anomaly's so much larger in the other two time periods
It may be dangerous to take the ship in.
O'BRIEN:Take the ship in where, sir?
Into the anomaly, Chief. Lay in a course for the exact centre and transfer all available power to the shields.
Sir? Can you give us some explanation?
No, Lieutenant, I cannot.
Captain, so far we've obeyed every order, no matter how far fetched it might have seemed. But if we're to risk the safety of the ship and crew I think we have to ask you for an explanation.
I understand your concerns, Lieutenant, and I know if I were in your position I would be doing the same thing. Looking for answers. But you're not going to find any because I don't have any to give you. I know it is difficult for you to understand, but we have to take the ship into the very centre of the phenomenon and create a static warp shell. Now, this will put the ship at risk. Quite frankly, we may not survive. But I want you to believe that I am doing this for a greater purpose, and that what is at stake here is more than any of you can possibly imagine. I know you have your doubts about me, about each other, about the ship. All I can say is that although we have only been together for a short time, I know that you are the finest crew in the fleet and I would trust each of you with my life. So, I am asking you for a leap of faith, and to trust me.
Shields up, maximum strength.
Boosting field integrity to the warp nacelles. We may encounter shearing forces once we enter the anomaly.
I am preparing to initiate a static warp shell.
O'BRIEN:Course laid in, sir.
All decks report ready, sir.
Take us in, Chief.
Captain, I have an idea. If we take the ship to the centre of the anomaly and create a static warp shell
A static warp shell. It could repair the barrier and collapse the anomaly.
Yes, sir.
Mister Data, you're a clever man in any time period. Helm, lay in a course for the centre of the anomaly and prepare to initiate a static warp shell.
Aye, sir.
The other two Enterprises, they're on their way.
Very well. Ensign, take us in.
O'BRIEN:We're entering the anomaly, sir.
All hands, brace for impact!
The temporal energy's interfering with main power. Switching to
Auxiliary power. I'm having trouble keeping the impulse engines online. I've got power fluctuations all across the board.
Maintain course and speed. Mister Data, how long until we reach the centre?
At least thirty seconds, sir.
We've entered the anomaly.
We have reached the centre, sir.
Initiate warp shell!
Initiating static warp shell now.
Is it having any effect?
Something is happening. A new subspace barrier appears to be forming,
Captain, the sensors are picking up two other ships.
Captain, it appears to be working. The anomaly is beginning to collapse. I think that
Temporal energy is rupturing our warp containment system!
We must eject the core!
No, we have to maintain the static warp shell as long as possible!
We're losing containment, Captain! I can't stop it, it's going to
Transfer emergency power to the antimatter containment system!
I'm trying, but there's a lot of interference.
The warp shell is definitely having an effect, sir. The anomaly is collapsing.
I can't hold it. The containment system is going.
Maintain position! Mister La
Both of the other ships have been destroyed.
Two down, one to go.
Data, report!
The anomaly is nearly collapsed.
We're losing containment.
Goodbye, Jean-Luc. I'm going to miss you. You had such potential. But then again, all good things must come to an end.
Containment field is at critical. I'm losing it!
The Continuum didn't think you had it in you, Jean-Luc, but I knew you did.
Are you saying that it worked? We collapsed the anomaly?
Is that all this meant to you? Just another spatial anomaly? Just another day at the office?
Did it work?
Well, you're here, aren't you? You're talking to me, aren't you?
What about my crew?
The anomaly. My crew. My ship. I suppose you're worried about your fish, too. Well, if it puts your mind at ease, you've saved humanity once again.
Thank you.
For what?
You had a hand in helping me get out of this.
I was the one that got you into it. A directive from the Continuum. The part about the helping hand, thought, was my idea.
I sincerely hope that this is the last time that I find myself here.
You just don't get it, do you, Jean-Luc? The trial never ends. We wanted to see if you had the ability to expand your mind and your horizons. And for one brief moment, you did.
When I realised the paradox.
Exactly. For that one fraction of a second, you were open to options you had never considered. That is the exploration that awaits you. Not mapping stars and studying nebulae, but charting the unknowable possibilities of existence.
Q, what is it that you're trying to tell me?
You'll find out. In any case, I'll be watching. And if you're very lucky, I'll drop by to say hello from time to time. See you out there.
Captain, are you all right?
Mister Worf, what's the date?
Stardate 47988.
Is something wrong, sir?
No. No. No. I think I'll get back to bed. I could use some sleep.
Captain's log, supplemental. Starfleet Command reports no unusual activity along the Neutral Zone, and there is no sign of a temporal anomaly. It would appear that I am the only member of the crew to retain any knowledge of the events I experienced.
Take it.
Any time, Doctor.
Four hands in a row. How does he do it?
I cheat. I'm kidding.
You know, I was thinking about what the Captain told us about the future. About how we all changed and drifted apart. Why would he want to tell us what's to come?
Sure goes against everything we've heard about not polluting the time line, doesn't it.
I believe, however, this situation is unique. Since the anomaly did not occur, there have already been changes in the way this time line is unfolding. The future we experience will undoubtedly be different from the one the Captain encountered.
Maybe that's why he told us. Knowing what happens in that future allows us to change things now, so that some things never happen.
Agreed.
Come in.
Am I too late?
Of course not. Pull up a chair.
What's the game?
Five card draw, deuces wild.
Come.
Is there a problem, sir?
No. I, er, I just thought that I might, erm, I might join you this evening. If there's room.
Of course. Have a seat.
Would you care to deal, sir?
Oh, er, thank you, Mister Data. Actually, I used to be quite a card player in my youth, you know. I should have done this a long time ago.
You were always welcome.
So. Five card stud, nothing wild, and the sky's the limit.
What do you think of my followers, Picard? Impressive, aren't they?
I'm not particularly impressed. All you've done is teach them to enjoy killing.
You are wrong, Captain. My brother and I serve a much higher purpose.
Data, I can sense feelings in you.
Yes. My brother has made that possible.
He gave you the chip. The one Doctor Soong made for you.
No, no, no, no, no. I still have the emotional programme my father designed. I wouldn't want to give it up. It's what has given me such a strong sense of family, an intense desire to reunite with my dear brother.
How did he do it, Data? What made you decide to come here?
I am talking to you, Picard. I will tell you all you need to know.
You're controlling him, and you've corrupted the Borg.
You simply don't understand, do you? You have no idea what has happened here. How I found my true calling. How the Borg found something to believe in.
I would like to learn about that, but I want Data to tell us.
I told you. I will tell you what you need to know.
How about that, Data? He won't even let you talk.
Do not try to drive a wedge between us, Captain. I am loyal to my brother.
You see, Picard? He's not your pawn anymore. I've helped him to break free, just as I've helped them. Look at them. Look at what I've helped them become. They're no longer simply mindless automatons. They're passionate. Alive.
Are you saying that you caused them to become individuals?
No, you did that. You and your friends. All I did was clean up the mess you made when that Borg you befriended returned to his ship.
Hugh interfaced with the others and transferred his sense of individuality to them. It nearly destroyed them.
Data, do you remember when Hugh was on the Enterprise? Do you remember what you were like then?
That doesn't matter.
It does to me. I want to know what has happened to Data.
What's important is what I've done here. How I found my calling. I know now why I was created. No one can ever take that away from me. Without me, they would have perished. When I stumbled on their ship, they were lost, disoriented, they had no idea how to function as individuals. They couldn't even navigate their own vessel. They had lost their sense of purpose. I gave them their purpose. And they gave me mine.
The Borg aspire to the perfection my Brother and I represent. Fully artificial life forms. We are their future.
The reign of biological life forms is coming to an end. You, Picard, and those like you are obsolete. Take them, brother.
Acting Captain:Acting Captain's log, supplemental. The skeleton crew left on board the Enterprise is unable to help in the search for Commander Data. The planet's unusual EM field is interfering with the ship's sensors, severely limiting their effectiveness.
Ensign, we need to modify the sensor array to filter out these EM pulses. Can you do that?
Yes, sir. I think so.
What's your name?
Taitt, sir.
I don't think I've seen you before.
I was just posted here six weeks ago.
Well, Taitt, I'll bet you never thought you'd be serving as Tactical Officer after only six weeks.
No, sir, I sure didn't. I think I've filtered out some of the sensor noise. I'll bring the modifications online.
Good work.
Riker to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Will.
I can't contact the Captain. It could just be interference, but I'd like to be sure.
Understood.
Enterprise to Captain Picard. Crusher to Picard.
I'm not getting a comm. signal from anyone on the Captain's team.
The last time they checked in they were investigating a structure in section gamma two five.
Sir, I'm picking up a vessel closing in on our location.
Is it a Borg ship?
It seems to match the configuration of a ship the Enterprise encountered at Ohniaka Three.
Red alert. How long before they're in weapons range?
Er, about ninety seconds. No, make that seventy seconds.
Crusher to Transporter room three.
Salazar here, sir.
Start transporting the away teams off of the surface.
Aye, sir.
Use the transporters in the cargo bay
If you have to. I want those teams up here as fast as possible.
Armstrong, you and the others prepare to beam up.
Aye, sir.
Beverly, Worf and I will stay here and look for
The Captain's team.
I'm not going to leave you down there.
You pull as many people off the surface as you can and get back to the transwarp conduit. The Captain's orders were to get the Enterprise back to Federation space.
Acknowledged.
Riker out.
Prepare to leave orbit.
Sir, the Borg ship is powering up its forward weapons array. They'll be in firing range in, in twenty seconds.
Salazar, how many people do we still have down there?
Seventy three, sir.
Put the Borg ship onscreen.
Should I raise shields, sir?
Not yet. I want to keep bringing people up until the last possible second.
Ten seconds.
Stand by to raise shields and break orbit on my mark.
Five seconds.
Mark.
Shields down to seventy percent.
Establish a frequency shift firing pattern and return fire.
Er, right.
Direct hit, no damage.
Helm, set course for the conduit, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
Sir, the Borg aren't following us.
Salazar
How many people did we leave behind?
Forty seven, sir.
Another minute and we would have had them.
Riker to any team leader.
Lieutenant Powell here, sir.
Round up everybody who was left behind. Take cover. Try to avoid any contact with the Borg.
Aye, sir.
Riker out. Even if Beverly can get back to Federation space, it'll be a few days before Starfleet can get any ships here. Until then, we're on our own.
Data, you must realise that something has happened to you. The Data I know would never have agreed to be a willing party to Lore's plan.
I now realise that my life aboard the Enterprise was a waste. My quest to become human was misguided. An evolutionary step in the wrong direction.
Data, all I'm sensing from you is anger and hatred. Have you felt any other emotions?
There are no other emotions.
Data, just because you haven't experienced certain emotions doesn't mean they don't exist. Lore is only feeding you the negative ones.
Counsellor Troi told me herself that feelings are not negative or positive. It is how we act on them that makes them good or bad.
Fine. But what about the things that Lore is proposing? What about the lives that have already been lost?
You simply do not understand. In a quest such as ours, sacrifices have to be made. It is regrettable, but the greater good must be served. Give me your visor.
Why?
Give it to me or I will take it by force.
I am not your puppet anymore.
Sir, we've reached the coordinates of the conduit. The tachyon matrix is energised and ready to go. And Lieutenant Barnaby has returned from the surface. He'll be relieving me.
Right. Stand by to trigger the conduit. Taitt. I want you to stay on the Bridge. I'll need a Science Officer at the aft station.
Yes, sir.
Helm, set a course to return to the planet.
Aye, sir.
I'm not leaving those people stranded back there. An emergency buoy can transmit a copy of our log entries to Starfleet just as easily as we can. Ensign, prepare a buoy and launch it when ready.
Aye, sir.
Lieutenant, open the conduit.
Launching buoy now, sir.
Lieutenant, scan for any Borg ships between here and the planet.
Sensors detect no vessels.
We have to assume the ship that attacked us is still in orbit.
How long will we have before they can detect us and intercept?
If their sensors function as well as ours it could be as little as thirty seconds.
Crusher to Salazar. How long will it take to get the rest of the crew off the surface?
One minute should do it.
We don't have one minute. How much can you shave off that?
If I can get a good lock on them quickly, I might be able to do it in forty five or fifty seconds.
We need to buy ourselves fifteen seconds. Lieutenant, is there any way we can use the planet as a barrier to keep the Borg from realising we're in orbit?
We can enter orbit while they're on the far side of the planet. And if we delay dropping out of warp until the last possible instant, we could gain a few more seconds.
If your calculations are even slightly off, we'd hit the atmosphere.
I'll have to be sure my calculations are accurate, Ensign.
Let's do it. Helm, hard about.
Aye, sir.
Still no sign of the structure.
With all this interference it could be a hundred metres away and we wouldn't know it. This could take hours.
I am detecting a faint energy reading.
Residual thermal traces. Somebody stood here.
The decay rate indicates it could be human.
They took this path.
Now, thank you. There you are, brother.
Here is the visor. May I ask why you wanted it?
I thought it might look good on me. What do you think? Maybe we should work on your sense of humour, brother. Actually, I was thinking La Forge's implants might make him an ideal test subject for my experiment.
All the Borg you have experimented on so far have suffered extensive brain damage.
Using the humans to perfect the procedure will allow us to prevent any further Borg deaths.
I understand.
Good. What is it?
This Borg disconnected himself from the others. He would not let me hear his thoughts.
I've asked you to stay linked to Crosis at all times. You know that, don't you?
Yes.
I know this must be difficult for you. I know how uncertain you must feel. All of these sensations are new and they can be frightening. Isn't that right?
Yes. I have doubts.
Of course you do. It's only natural. No one is going to blame you for that. But in order to lose those doubts, to keep you from fear and confusion away, I need you to remain linked with the others so that their strength and their confidence can help you. I need you, Goval. I need you to help me build a future for the Borg. I can't do it without you. Will you help me?
Yes. I will.
Lore must have told Data to take my visor because he realised I could see a carrier wave that was radiating from him.
A carrier wave? Is that how he's manipulating Data?
I think what's happening is that Lore is tapping into the chip he stole from Doctor Soong and somehow he's found a way to transmit part of that emotional programme to Data.
But the only emotions Data seems to feel are negative.
Yeah, I'm sure that's intentional. But in order for Data to be affected by those emotions, Lore would have had to disable his ethical programme first.
Can we reactivate it?
If I can generate a phased kedion pulse at the right frequency, that would trigger Data's subsystems and reboot the programme.
And although Lore would still be feeding him negative emotions, at least Data might listen to us.
Right.
I think it's worth a try.
So, got any ideas on how we generate a kedion pulse?
Data, where are you taking him?
That is not your concern.
Data, wait. Let us talk to you.
Commander.
Hugh?
Why are you here, Commander Riker? Hasn't the crew of the Enterprise caused enough damage already?
So you blame us for what has happened to the Borg?
You gave me a sense of individuality, changed me, then sent me back to the Collective. You must have known that change would be passed on to others.
We considered it. We knew it was a possibility.
Then you made it possible for Lore to dominate us.
I cannot accept that. Lore is only one. The Borg could have stopped him.
You don't know the condition we were in when he found us. Before my experience on the Enterprise, the Borg were a single-minded Collective. The voices in our heads were smooth and flowing. But after I returned, those voices began to change. They became uneven, discordant. For the first time, individual Borg had differing ideas about how to proceed. We couldn't function. Some Borg fought each other. Others simply shut themselves down. Many starved to death.
And then Lore came along.
You probably can't imagine what it is like to be so lost and frightened that you will listen to any voice which promises change.
Even if that voice insists on controlling you.
That's what we wanted. Someone to show us the way out of confusion. Lore promised clarity and purpose. In the beginning, he seemed like a saviour. The promise of becoming a superior race, of becoming fully artificial was compelling. We gladly did everything he asked of us. But after a while, it became clear that Lore had no idea how to keep his promise. That's when he began talking about the need for us to make sacrifices. Before we realised it, this was the result.
What happened to them?
Lore began to experiment, trying to re-make us in his image. This is the result of my encounter with the Enterprise, Commander. So you can see I don't particularly welcome your presence here.
I'm sorry you feel that way. We just came to get our people. We won't cause you any more trouble.
Tell me about my friend.
Friend?
The human called Geordi.
I wish I could tell you about him. We think he may be held inside the compound.
I cannot help you. I cannot risk our being discovered.
Can you at least show us a way into the compound?
These caverns lead to tunnels which run beneath the compound. Some of them connect with the environmental control ducts.
Show us. If we can determine the geography of the compound, we can form a rescue plan.
Data? Who's there?
Geordi?
Captain.
Shh. We're getting out of here.
Come on, hurry. Data was just here. I think he went to get something.
Too late. My brother suggested that I try to develop my sense of humour. What do you think?
I think it needs a little work.
What's happening?
I'm attemptin to neutralise your pain receptors.
What are you going to do to me?
I am implanting nano-cortical fibres in your cerebrum. They are designed to learn and mimic your neural firing patterns. Once they are in place, I will destroy the existing brain cells. We'll see if the artificial neural network is able to take over your cognitive functions.
Data, listen. Lore is controlling you. He's transmitting a carrier wave which is affecting your positronic matrix.
If the procedure is successful, your cognitive processing functions will be considerably improved.
Don't you care that he's manipulating you?
However, there is a sixty percent chance you will not survive the procedure.
I don't care much for those odds.
They are cause for concern. However, I still have Counsellor Troi and Captain Picard. The odds are that at least one of the procedures will be successful.
Help me!
He tried to escape. The force field sent him into neural shock. If he dies, Lore will blame you.
See if the corridor is empty.
Drop it or I will break his neck.
Take him.
What have you done to him?
I will be back for him later.
Geordi, are you in pain?
No. I'm just a little dizzy.
I was able to take part of a transceiver from the guard's interlink system. I think that it uses some kind of phased-pulse technology. Do you think it could be modified to generate a kedion pulse that would reboot Data's programme?
Yeah, yeah, it's possible. See if you can locate the phase modulation circuitry.
I'll watch the door.
All right, I think I've found it.
Okay, good. Now, do you see anything that we might be able to use as a flux inhibitor?
Sensors still can't locate the Borg ship. I'm trying to filter out the interference.
We'll be within transporter range in nineteen seconds.
I'm starting to get sensor resolution. There's the ship.
We'll enter orbit here.
Helm, new course, heading zero five two mark seven.
Aye, sir.
Stand by to drop out of warp in eight seconds.
Once we're in orbit, we should have about forty five seconds before they intercept us.
Let's hope it's enough time.
Emergency deceleration in five seconds.
Hold on.
Report.
We're in standard orbit, sir. The Borg ship is on the planet's far side, and is moving to intercept.
Bridge to Transporter rooms. Begin evacuations.
The Borg will be in weapons range in thirty two seconds. We still can't locate Captain Picard's team and there's no sign of Commander Riker or Lieutenant Worf.
Crusher to Salazar. Report.
We're pulling the last teams off right now.
But there are six people still unaccounted for.
Keep trying.
The Borg ship is powering up its weapons array.
Come on, Chief. It's now or never.
They're preparing to fire.
Raise shields.
The port nacelle's been hit.
Helm, get us out of here.
Aye, sir.
We've lost warp engines.
Evasive manoeuvres, full impulse.
Shields down to eighty percent.
Fire phasers.
Direct hit. No damage to the Borg ship.
Shields down to seventy three percent.
What's the status of the warp engines?
Still down. We can't outrun them.
Helm, set a new course, heading three four four mark six. Full impulse.
Aye, sir.
Sir, that heading takes us directly into the sun.
The databanks should contain information about a process called metaphasic shielding.
I know about that research. Commander La Forge was developing a programme that would implement metaphasic properties.
Right. How far along was he?
It's in the databanks but it's never been tested.
If we had metaphasic shielding, we could enter the sun's corona but the Borg ship wouldn't be able to follow. Can you bring the programme online?
I can, but we have no way of knowing if the shields will hold.
Sir, hull temperature is rising. Now at twelve thousand degrees C. Radiation level nearing ten thousand rads.
Report.
Shields at sixty two percent.
Lieutenant, activate the metaphasic programme. It's our best shot.
Aye, sir.
Hull temperature is critical. We can't withstand this heat much longer.
Programme is online. Engaging metaphasic shield now.
Hull temperature dropping. Down to seven thousand degrees.
Maintain course.
The Borg ship has broken off pursuit.
All stop.
Sir, the Borg ship is taking up position relative to ours. They're going to wait for us to come out.
The question is, how long can we survive in here?
Well, I've done everything that Geordi said. Now to activate it.
How are we going to know whether the pulse reboots Data's ethical programme?
We'll only tell that when we see his behaviour.
Won't he realise something's happened to him?
No, it's one programme among thousands. I just hope this force field has enough energy to trigger the pulse.
You know, Data, I've been thinking about some of the times we've had. Like that time we went sailing on Devala Lake. You remember that?
I have a complete memory record of that day.
You decided to go swimming, and when you jumped out of the boat you sank straight to the bottom.
I did not have enough buoyancy to get back to the surface.
You had to walk over a kilometre along the bottom to get back to shore.
One kilometre forty six metres.
It took almost two weeks to get the water out of your servos.
I am ready to irradiate your existing brain cells.
Data, if you ever go back to the way you were, you might not be able to forgive yourself for what you're about to do.
I am getting some anomalous readings from your neural net. I will need to do further testing before I proceed. Someone will come and take you back to your cell.
There you are, brother. Have you made any progress with La Forge?
It is too early to tell if the nano-cortical fibres performed their function.
I suspect none of the humans will survive the process but then, it's their own fault, isn't it? They should never have come here. What were they thinking?
They came looking for me.
Humans are so sentimental.
I betrayed them. If they die, I am responsible.
Why are you talking like that? Is something wrong with your programming? Maybe I should check your systems.
I do not want you to check my systems. I must resolve these issues myself.
I think I've made a mistake. I don't believe you can tolerate the amount of emotion I've given you. Perhaps I should cut back a little.
How's that?
I do not like it.
Then you prefer having more emotions?
Yes.
They give you pleasure.
Yes. Please, I want more.
All right, a little more. For now. Aren't you going to thank me?
Thank you.
Don't mention it. I just hope this helps to clarify things for you.
I am concerned about my brother, Crosis. I don't believe he really wants to be a part of our great future.
Sir, metaphasic shielding is losing integrity.
Can you stabilise it?
No. We won't be able to stay in here longer than another three or four minutes.
Do we have warp engines yet?
Last estimate was another half hour.
Sir? I think I have an idea. I think it's possible we could induce a solar fusion eruption that would destroy the Borg ship.
What?
We need to direct a highly energetic particle beam onto the sun's surface. That should produce a superfluid gas eruption. If we target the right spot, the eruption would envelop the Borg ship.
How do you know this will work?
I did my senior honours thesis on solar dynamics.
Excuse me, sir, but this isn't the Academy. And a student thesis is a long way from a workable plan.
I've already configured the tractor emitters to create the particle beam and I've located the target point on the surface.
If her calculations are off, that eruption could encompass us.
Well I'll just have to make sure my calculations are accurate, Lieutenant.
Let's do it.
Yes, sir.
The target area of the photosphere is destabilising. Pressure wave expansion is accelerating.
Subsurface fusion has been initiated. An eruption is forming on the surface.
She did it! The Borg ship has been destroyed, sir.
Helm, take us back to the planet. Full impulse.
Aye, sir.
Well done, Taitt.
You're killing him. He won't survive another session.
I did not come for him. I came for you.
Data, it's not too late. If you remove the fibres, then Geordi might yet recover.
That would not be possible.
Why? Because Lore tells you so?
It is for the greater good.
Good? Data, isn't good and bad, right and wrong, a function of your ethical programme?
That is correct.
What does that programme tell you about what you're doing to Geordi? About what you and Lore are doing to the Borg? It tells you that these things are wrong, doesn't it, Data? So how can actions that are wrong lead to a greater good?
You are attempting to confuse me.
No, you're not confused, Data. You're sensing the truth. Your ethical programme is fighting the negative emotions that Lore is sending you.
Ah, Captain. Thank you so much for joining us. You are going to assist me in a most important ceremony.
We can use the environmental control ducts to get into the compound. They should lead us to the detention area.
We'll have to move fast. If we need to stun one of the guards, the Borg will know right away that he's been hurt.
When they realise, your escape route may be compromised.
I guess we'll have to take that chance.
Good luck, Commander.
It's time to put aside all doubts, brother. It's time to close the door on the past and commit yourself to the great work that lies ahead of us. I need to know I can count on you. As proof, I want you to kill Picard.
No. That would be wrong.
I didn't think you'd be able to do it. You've spent too many years among humans.
Hold him.
I've asked many sacrifices of you. Sacrifices I knew were necessary in order to build a better future. I want you to know that I ask no more of you than I am prepared to give myself. I am willing to make the greatest sacrifice of all. My own dear brother. Goodbye, Data.
No!
Lore.
You should be careful with that, brother. Somebody could get hurt.
What are you doing?
I've got a way out of here. I'm willing to forget about what happened back there and take you with me. We don't need anyone else. We're brothers. I'll give you the chip our father made. It contains much more than just emotions. It has memories. Memories our father wanted you to have.
Lore, I must deactivate you now.
Without me, you will never feel emotion again.
I know, but you leave me no other choice.
I love you, brother.
Goodbye, Lore.
What about Geordi and Troi?
The Enterprise is in orbit. I had them beamed aboard.
Lore is no longer functioning, sir. He must be disassembled so that he is no longer a threat.
Welcome back, Data.
Thank you, sir.
What made you change your mind, Hugh?
Perhaps my encounter with the Enterprise affected me more than I realised.
What will you do now?
I don't know. We can't go back to the Borg Collective, and we no longer have a leader here.
I'm not sure that's true.
Perhaps in time, we will learn to function as individuals and work together as a group.
Good luck, Hugh.
Goodbye.
Captain's log, stardate 47025.4. We have returned to Federation Space and are en route to Starbase two nine five. Mister La Forge remains under Doctor Crusher's care.
Enter.
Hi, Data. I just wanted to let you know that Doctor Crusher says I'll be able to return to duty soon.
I am relieved that the injuries I inflicted on you are not permanent.
What's that?
This is the chip my father created for me so that I could experience emotions. I had it removed from Lore's body before he was dismantled.
Does it work?
No. I am pleased to say it was damaged when I was forced to fire on Lore.
Pleased? Data, you've wanted emotions all your life.
Yes. But emotions were responsible for what I did to you. I would never risk letting that happen again. My friendship with you is too important to me.
Data, I wouldn't be very much of a friend if I let you give up on a life-long dream, would I? Maybe someday, when you're ready.
L'KOR:Take his pack.
Are you afraid to die while escaping?
L'KOR:We are dead, Worf. We died at Khitomer.
GI'RAL:We were captured. It was worse than death.
Why did you allow it to happen?
GI'RAL:We had no choice. We were defending an outpost on the perimeter. The Romulans took out our shields. The next blast rendered us unconscious. When we awoke, we were prisoners, unarmed and shackled.
L'KOR:We were interrogated for three months. We tried to starve ourselves but they kept us alive.
GI'RAL:The Romulan Commander Tokath thought he was being kind.
L'KOR:The Romulans hoped to trade our lives for territorial concessions, but the Klingon High Council refused to negotiate. They would not acknowledge that their warriors had been taken prisoner.
GI'RAL:And when it was clear that we would be of no use to them, Tokath offered to let us go.
L'KOR:But we knew that our families believed we had fallen in battle, so we did not wish to return to dishonour them.
GI'RAL:We asked Tokath to let us stay and he took pity on us.
I understand your desire to preserve your family's honour. But what of your own? There is no honour in remaining prisoners.
L'KOR:We lost our honour when we were captured. It does not matter what happens to us.
GI'RAL:All that matters is that our families are not dishonoured.
L'KOR:Why did you come here? If you had found your father you would have found only dishonour.
If he had been captured as you were, if I had found him here, I would be glad to see him. There is no room in my heart for shame.
L'KOR:I can only hope that if my son came here, he would be Klingon enough to kill me.
This is a gin'tak spear.
What of it?
Have your parents taught you nothing? This is used for battle, not tilling soil.
We have no need for weapons here. The war is far away.
What war?
The war our parents came here to escape.
That war was over many years ago.
I'm not interested in what you have to say, Klingon. I have work to do.
BA'EL:Hello again, Worf. They say you've come to stay with us.
Not by choice.
BA'EL:Aren't you happy to have escaped the war?
The war.
BA'EL:Yes. We've heard the stories all our lives. How people are slaughtered in terrible battles, forced to fight whether they want to or not. That's why our parents came here, to make a safe home, a place where they could raise their children in peace. I should think you'd be relieved to get away from the fighting. You're safe here.
A place can be safe and still be a prison. Where I come from, people are free to come and go as they choose.
BA'EL:So are we.
Tell your father that you would like to leave. Tell him that you would like to visit the Klingon Home world. See what he says.
BA'EL:Why would I want to go there? It's dangerous.
Not any longer.
GI'RAL:Ba'el! Come here!
BA'EL:Yes, Mother. You are not allowed to leave the compound? Then I suppose I won't be seeing you at the pond again.
GI'RAL:I told you not to speak with him.
BA'EL:I'm sorry, Mother.
Enter.
I am Tokath. I can return later if I am disturbing you?
It is a strange thing when a jailer concerns himself with his prisoner's comfort.
Mine is a strange prison.
You robbed the Klingons of who they were. You dishonoured them.
By not slitting their throats when we found them unconscious?
I do not expect you to understand. You are a Romulan.
You're just like L'Kor was twenty years ago. Proud and angry. He hated me. All the Klingons did. And I had no love for them, I won't deny it. When I informed the High Command that the Klingons wanted to remain here, I was told that unless I stayed to oversee them myself, they would be killed. My decision ended my military career.
Why did you do it?
I don't expect you to understand. You're a Klingon. But I do expect you to understand this, We've put aside the old hatreds. Here, Romulans and Klingons live in peace. I won't allow you to destroy what we have.
Do not deceive yourself. These people are not happy here. I see the sadness in their eyes.
That's not what I see when I look in my wife's eyes. I married a Klingon. So you see, when I warn you not to disrupt our lives here I'm not speaking just as a jailer, but as a man protecting his family. Do not test my tolerance.
BA'EL:Bagh Da tuHmoh. ChojaH Duh rHo. ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo'
Do you know what that song means?
BA'EL:No. I just like the melody.
Stop!
There.
Captain's log, stardate 46759.2. The Yridian vessel Lieutenant Worf boarded at Deep Space Nine has failed to arrive for our scheduled rendezvous. It is now twelve hours overdue.
Still no sign of them on long range scanners.
Contact DS9. Find out what they know about this Yridian trader.
Hopefully he filed a flight plan before he left the station.
That's the only chance we have of finding Worf.
We haven't had to use one of these for a long time. It implants a small boridium pellet under the skin.  We can use its energy signature to track you.
L'KOR:In time, you will grow accustomed to life here.
Never.
He is one of yours. Deal with him however you like. But I warn you, if he becomes a disruption, I will not be so tolerant.
L'KOR:Toq. You guard him. He is free to move around inside the compound. But make certain he does not cause trouble.
BA'EL:What are you doing?
This is the mok'bara. The form clears the mind and centres the body.
No. Like this. First you must learn to breathe. Stand tall. As tall as you can. Now, take a wider stance.
You must stop.
These forms are the basis for Klingon combat. You would be wise to learn them. I will teach you. Join us.
We'll see what L'Kor thinks of this.
BA'EL:Mother? She's not here. Come in. This is what I wanted to show you.
BA'EL:I don't know why, but I'm not supposed to look at these things. They're Klingon, aren't they?
Yes.
BA'EL:I thought you might be able to tell me about them.
This is a warrior's armour. And this is a d'k tahg.  It should not be allowed to rust like this.
BA'EL:Isn't it beautiful?
That is a jinaq. It is given to a daughter who has come of age, old enough to take a mate.
GI'RAL:Ba'el!
BA'EL:Mother.
GI'RAL:Take that off at once.
Why is she forbidden to know what these things are?
GI'RAL:They are not needed here. Go!
Kahless held his father's lifeless body in his arms. He could not believe what his brother had done. Then his brother threw their father's sword into the sea, saying, if he could not possess it, neither would Kahless. That was the last time the brothers would speak.
BA'EL:What happened to the sword?
Kahless looked into the sea and wept, for the sword is all he had left of his father. The ocean filled with his tears and flooded beyond the shore.
That is impossible!
For you, perhaps. Not Kahless. He was a great warrior.
You're making it up.
No. These are our stories. They tell us who we are.
L'KOR:It is late. It is time to sleep.
BA'EL:Worf. You never answered my question. Did Kahless ever find his father's sword?
Yes. He found it.
BA'EL:The stories that you tell, are they true?
I have studied them all of my life, and find new truths in them every time.
BA'EL:This Kahless, did he ever take a mate?
That is another story.
BA'EL:Tell me.
You are Romulan.
BA'EL:Tokath is my father. I thought you knew that.
How could your mother mate with a Romulan?
BA'EL:Why shouldn't she?
It is an obscenity.
BA'EL:What are you saying? They love each other.
Romulans are treacherous, deceitful. They are without honour.
BA'EL:My father is a good man. He is kind, and generous. There is nothing dishonourable about him.
He took part in a cowardly attack at Khitomer. Thousands of Klingons were massacred, many of them women and children.
BA'EL:I don't know what you're talking about. My father came here to escape the wars. He would never kill anybody.
Ask him. Ask your mother. Tell them you want to know the truth.
What is it, Number One?
We've just received the Yridian's flight plan from Deep Space Nine.
He gets around. He's been to three different systems in this past week. He could have left Worf at any of them.
Are any of these systems near Romulan space?
Two of them. The Nequencia and the Carraya systems.
Let's head for the closer one.
Aye, sir.
BA'EL:What do you want?
I am sorry if I upset you.
I was surprised. I became angry. But I do not blame you. You cannot help being what you are.
BA'EL:There's nothing wrong with what I am.
What I mean is, it is not your fault.
BA'EL:What, being born? I'm sorry if that offends you.
No, I. It is hard to explain. Klingons and Romulans are blood enemies. Have been for centuries.
BA'EL:Not here. Here, we live in peace.
But I don't live here.
BA'EL:Worf, before you knew, you were attracted to me. Can't you leave the hatred behind, too? Can't you accept me as I am?
I do not know.
Come on, Toq.
Who's next? Okay? Try again.
Ka'la!
That is not how you play this game.
The qa'vak is not a game. It hones the skills of the hunt.
The hunt? We have replicators here.
Klingons do not hunt because they need food. The hunt is a ritual that reminds us of where we come from.
I know where I came from. Right here.
It is a difficult skill to master. Perhaps you are too young.
Throw it.
Your arm is strong, but you need practice. Hold your other arm like this and aim along it. Roll.
You learn quickly. Perhaps it is time to put your skills to the test.
What do you mean?
Come. I will take you on the hunt.
You Are not allowed to leave the compound. They won't allow it.
I think they will.
Hunting? Have you lost your mind?
The boy can come with me. I cannot sit in the compound like an old man. I must practice my skills.
L'KOR:We can't let you out. You've already tried to escape once.
I give you my word as a warrior. I will not try to escape.
Leave us. We have work to do.
L'KOR:Tokath. He gave his word.
Are you seriously suggesting that we open the gates and let him wander free, with only a boy as his guard?
L'KOR:Twenty three years ago I gave you my word. In all this time, have I ever broken it?
I told you he was yours to deal with. If you want to take this risk, the responsibility is yours.
L'KOR:You will go with him. Take a weapon. If he breaks his word and tries to escape, kill him.
He is there. The wind has shifted. We must wait.
Why? We're so close.
Never approach your prey from upwind. The breeze will carry your scent. The wind is shifting again.
I can't smell anything.
He is there.
How can you? Yes. I can smell it.
Remember the scent. More than anything else, it will guide you.
It is strong. I cannot believe I couldn't smell it before.
Let it work its way into your blood.
I can feel my heart pounding.
Yes. This is the moment where life and death meet. This is what we are. Warriors.
I was never taught that.
There is much you were never taught.
Aren't you hungry, L'Kor? Or are you upset because your prisoner has not returned?
L'KOR:I should not have sent the boy with him. If he has been hurt
Don't worry, my friend. They'll come back. After all, a warrior keeps his word. Isn't that so?
BA'EL:Father if I wanted to visit Romulus, or the Klingon Home world, would I be allowed to go?
Ka'la! Tonight, we eat well.
Get that off my table.
You do not kill an animal unless you intend to eat it.
Get rid of it.
I intend to, Tokath. But not until it's cooked. Today I learned the ritual hunt. But that is not all I learned. I discovered that warrior's blood runs in my veins. I do not know how or why, but we have forgotten ourselves. Our stories are not told, our songs are not sung. Tonight, as we came home, we sang a song of victory. A song known only to me as a lullaby. But it is a warrior's song. Bagh Da tuHmoh. Fire streaks the heavens. ChojaH Duh rHo. Battle has begun. Bagh Da tuHmoh. ChojaH Duh rHo. ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo' ylja'Qo.
Ba'el.
Ylja'Qo ylja'Qo! ylja'Qo!!
Well, Worf, you've had quite an effect on the young people.
I have done nothing more than show them what they are.
No. You have shown them what you want them to be. Tell me this. Do you know of any place, any time in history, when Klingons and Romulans have lived together in peace? We have despised each other, fought each other, for centuries. Except here, on this remote planet, Romulans and Klingons live together in harmony. No government, no leader, has ever done what I have done here.
And what about Toq? I saw what happened to him when he caught the scent of his prey on the wind. For the first time in his life, he felt powerful, and that is what he has been denied living here. And that is what you have tried to take away from him. Now you may be content to sit here in the jungle and wither to old age, but Toq and the others have tasted what it is to feel truly alive, and they will not give that up now.
Enough of this. We could talk all night and not convince each other. I offer you a choice. Live with us as one of us
Or?
Or I will have you put to death.
Then that is what you will have to do.
Worf, consider this carefully.
That death will be honourable. The young people will see what it is to die as a Klingon.
Enter.
BA'EL:Thank you. I will remove the tracking device. Then you can go over the wall and hide in the jungle.
Why are you doing this?
BA'EL:My father is wrong. No matter how I might feel about you, you don't deserve to die.
I am not going to run away, Ba'el.
BA'EL:They will kill you.
Yes. But they will not defeat me.
BA'EL:I don't understand you.
A Klingon does not run away from his battles.
BA'EL:Is that really the lesson you want us to learn? You've taught us a great deal, awakened something in us that we never knew existed, but I don't understand what we can learn from your death.
Then you do not yet understand what it is to be Klingon.
BA'EL:Worf, in spite of everything that's happened, I still sense that you care for me. Am I wrong? You talk so much about being a warrior, about honour and death. Is it so hard to speak of love? Worf, please.
I would not have thought it possible to love a Romulan.
BA'EL:But you do?
Yes.
BA'EL:Well if you've come that far, can't you take it one more step? Can't you stay here with us? With me?
If there were a way, I would take you away with me.
BA'EL:If there is anything that I've learned from you, from your reaction to me, it's that I have no place out there. Other Klingons will not accept me for what I am.
And if I stay here, these Klingons will not accept me for what I am.
BA'EL:Why did you come here? We were so happy. We didn't know there was anything missing in our lives.
Ba'el.
BA'EL:Goodbye, Worf.
I know that there are those among you who may question what I'm about to do. And you would not be wrong to do so. I have questioned myself. I have spent the night considering my decision, challenging myself to justify whether it is right. And I have reached the conclusion that it is absolutely necessary to put this man to death. What we have built together would be destroyed by this man. And I cannot allow that to happen. I give you one last chance to accept our way of life.
Those are eloquent word, Tokath, but the truth is, I am being executed because I brought something dangerous to your young people. Knowledge. Knowledge of their origins. Knowledge of the real reasons you are here in this camp. The truth is a threat to you.
Enough. Stand ready. Raise your weapons.
BA'EL:Father.
Stop this!
If you kill him, you will have to kill me.
Step aside, Toq.
Worf would rather die than accept this way of life. And so would I. I want to leave, as do many others. You will have to kill us to keep us here.
You see, Tokath? It is already too late.
I am warning you. Move aside, now.
Stand ready.
L'KOR:Toq. Move away.
Take aim.
Ba'el.
GI'RAL:Tokath. Long ago, when your captives asked to stay here, our hope was to avoid dishonouring our children on the Home World. But perhaps, over the years, we lost sight of our children that we raised here. This is our prison. It should not be theirs.
Years ago, your parents made a great sacrifice for the sake of their families. Today, they do so again. For that, we must honour them. You must promise them never reveal to their secret. No one must know of this place.
A supply ship's due in a few days. They will take us. When they arrive, Tokath will explain it to them. Then we will start a new life.
Captain's log, supplemental. Our search for Lieutenant Worf was cut short when we received a cryptic message from him requesting a rendezvous with a Romulan vessel. He has informed us we will be taking on passengers.
It's good to see you. He seems fine. We're giving everyone a thorough checkups in Sickbay.
Thank you, Doctor.
Welcome home, Mister Worf.
Thank you, sir.
Picard to Bridge. Signal the Romulan ship that the last group is on board.
Aye, sir.
You found what you were looking for, Mister Worf?
No, sir. There was no prison camp. Those young people are survivors of a vessel that crashed in the Carraya system four years ago. No one survived Khitomer.
I understand.
Looking good. I'll go five.
Five here.
And five more.
I believe the wiser course of action here is to bend.
You mean fold, Data.
That is correct. Fold. To bend. To make compact or to capitulate.
I raise fifty.
I do not believe Lieutenant Worf understands all the nuances of this betting procedure.
I wouldn't be so quick to judge, Data. His pile's a lot bigger than yours.
Than any of ours.
The cards have been favouring the Lieutenant, but that is the result of random chance, therefore, a temporary condition.
You hope.
Talk or play. Not both.
Fifty, right?
Fifty is the bet. What's the matter? Feet getting cold?
My cards are getting cold. Here you go.
I'm glad you stayed in. I need the chips.
Talk, talk, talk
Okay, here's the action. Fifty, and another fifty.
Ouch. Fold, fold, fold
Your fifty, and fifty more.
Love to play, but not with these cards.
Looks like it's just us, handsome. I'll see you.
Beats my straight.
The Iceman wins again.
You took my last chip. You could at least smile, Worf.
Smiling would break his concentration.
Your deal.
Geordi.
The game is seven card stud. After the queen, one-eyed jacks and low card in the hole are wild.
Wait a minute, let me write this down.
I open with fifty.
Bridge to Commander Riker. We're receiving a class eleven emergency signal from Starfleet Command.
On my way.
Fifty? You were bluffing.
Klingons never bluff.
Yeah, right.
Mister Data?
Emergency signal reads as follows. Enterprise to divert to coordinates four-two-three by one one two by five one immediately. Further orders forthcoming.
That's it? What's the emergency?
The message does not elaborate.
You'd think they'd at least give us a hint.
Course laid in, Captain.
Warp eight. Whenever Starfleet gets enigmatic, I know we're about to face a challenge. Engage.
Our destination is a point near the Boradis system.
That area was colonized fairly recently, as I recall.
The first Federation outpost was established thirty four years ago on Boradis Three.
Since then, the Federation has colonised several planets in that sector.
Yet we are not headed for a specific colony. The coordinates given are outside the Boradis system.
Any problems reported in that area?
None, sir.
What the devil is going on?
Captain, Starfleet Command is hailing us.
About time. On screen.
Greetings, Captain Picard.
My compliments, Admiral Gromek.
Captain, you will soon be joined by a Federation special emissary from Starbase One Five Three. We Are now transmitting the specifics.
We are receiving, sir.
The rendezvous will be a bit tricky, so it is imperative you reach the intercept point on schedule.
Understood. And the mission?
The envoy will fill you in. You are to cooperate fully.
Admiral, can you give me any details?
Negative.
Admiral, it's a little difficult to prepare for a mission I know nothing about.
I sympathise, Jean-Luc, but Starfleet Command considers this a top security matter. Once the envoy has briefed you, I think you will understand our caution. Gromek out.
Data, what ship is carrying the envoy?
Apparently there were no starships available on Starbase One Five Three. The envoy is aboard a class eight probe.
A class eight probe is just over two metres long.
Yes, that's true, Number One. But if the transmitters and the sensors were removed and life-support installed, there would be just enough room for one person.
And it is designed to travel at warp nine.
By sending the probe to meet us rather than diverting the Enterprise, they are saving us six point one hours.
Obviously Starfleet feels that time is of the essence.
But still, to seal someone inside a class eight Probe and launch it off. It's a hell of a way to transport a Federation dignitary.
Coming to three one mark one one three. i
We are on a course precisely parallel to the probe, sir.
Increase speed to warp eight point nine.
Eight point nine, aye.
Full sensors aft.
Scanning.
Data, if we project our course beyond the rendezvous coordinates, what lies ahead?
As far as I can determine, sir, very little. There are four colonies in the Boradis system, as well as nine other outposts scattered throughout the sector.
I have it, sir. Bearing zero five mark two three one. Velocity, warp nine.
I see it.
Adjust speed to intercept.
Probe is coming up to starboard. Range, eighty two hundred. Tractor beam ready.
Mister La Forge?
Transporter ready, Captain.
Range now seventy five hundred.
Steady as she goes
Probe is standing abeam.
Engage tractor.
O'BRIEN:Transporter beam locked, Captain.
Energise.
O'BRIEN:Probe aboard, Captain.
Acknowledged. Number One?
I'll welcome our visitor.
Resume original course and speed.
Aye, sir.
All yours, Commander.
Something wrong, Doctor?
I'm not sure. The readings are quite interesting.
K'EHLEYR:I greet you. I am K'Ehleyr.
nuqneH. qaleghneS.
K'EHLEYR:You speak Klingon.
A little. I am Commander William Riker. This is Chief Medical Officer Katherine Pulaski. I hope your voyage wasn't too unpleasant.
K'EHLEYR:Klingons are not supposed to mind hardship. Nonetheless, I am delighted to be out of that damned coffin.
I don't blame you. It's not the most luxurious accommodation Starfleet has to offer.
K'EHLEYR:Whoever said that getting there was half the fun never rode in a class eight probe.
How are you feeling? Your vital signs are rather atypical for a Klingon.
K'EHLEYR:No doubt because I am only half Klingon.
Oh?
K'EHLEYR:Yes. My father was Klingon. My mother was human.
Captain, allow me to present Special Federation Emissary K'Ehleyr.
Welcome aboard. I'm Jean-Luc Picard. This is Counsellor Troi, Lieutenant Commander Data, and this is Lieutenant
K'EHLEYR:Worf. So this is where you've been hiding. I told you we'd meet again. Aren't you going to greet me?
I have nothing to say to you.
K'EHLEYR:Haven't changed a bit. Well, I missed you, too. Two days ago, Starbase Three Three Six received an automated transmission from a Klingon ship, the T'Ong. That ship was sent out over seventy five years ago.
When the Federation and the Klingon Empire were still at war.
K'EHLEYR:The message was directed to the Klingon High Command. It said only that the ship was returning home and was about to reach its awakening point.
Which suggests that the crew had been in cryogenic sleep for that long journey.
K'EHLEYR:Exactly.
And when this crew is revived?
K'EHLEYR:We'll have a ship full of Klingons who think the war is still going on.
So our task is to find the ship, and tell the Klingons they're no longer at war.
Why us? Wouldn't a Klingon ship be a better choice?
K'EHLEYR:A Klingon ship, the P'rang, is on its way, but it's two days behind us. That may be too late.
Why too late?
When the T'Ong crew awakens it will be within striking range of several Federation outposts.
There are thirteen colonies with minimal defences in that sector.
K'EHLEYR:Nice, ripe targets for a Klingon warship.
And you believe you can convince these Klingons that the humans are now their allies?
K'EHLEYR:No, not a chance. If you ask me, talking will be a waste of time. Klingons of that era were raised to despise humans. We'll try diplomacy. But I promise you it won't work. And then you'll have to destroy them.
No.
K'EHLEYR:No. Captain, these Klingons are killers. You'll have no choice.
We shall find another choice. I want options and I want them before we encounter the Klingon ship. Lieutenant, I'm assigning you to help the Emissary. Dismissed.
I will escort you to the guest quarters.
K'EHLEYR:Captain.
Lieutenant?
Sir. I suggest Commander Riker or Data would better serve Special Emissary K'Ehleyr.
Are there any personal reasons you don't want the assignment?
Yes.
Any professional reasons?
No.  I withdraw my request, Captain.
Good.
I didn't know it was possible for a human and a Klingon to produce a child.
K'EHLEYR:Actually, the DNA is compatible, with a fair amount of help. Rather like my parents.
I know exactly what you mean. My father was human and my mother is a Betazoid.
K'EHLEYR:Really? It was the other way around for me. My mother was human. You must've grown up like I did, trapped between cultures.
I never felt trapped. I tried to experience the richness and diversity of the two worlds.
K'EHLEYR:Perhaps you got the best of each.
K'EHLEYR:Myself, I think I got the worst of each.
Oh, I doubt that.
K'EHLEYR:Oh, yes. Having my mother's sense of humour is bad enough. It's gotten me into plenty of trouble.
And your Klingon side?
K'EHLEYR:That, I keep under tight control. It's like a terrible temper. It's not something I want people to see.
Everyone has tempers.
K'EHLEYR:Not like mine. Sometimes I feel there's a monster inside of me, fighting to get out.
And it frightens you.
K'EHLEYR:Of course it does. My Klingon side can be terrifying, even to me.
It gives you strength. It's a part of you.
K'EHLEYR:That doesn't mean I have to like it.
You are late.
K'EHLEYR:Sorry. Had to make myself beautiful.
I fail to understand why.
K'EHLEYR:Worf, we're alone now. You don't have to act like a Klingon glacier. I don't bite. Well, that's wrong, I do bite.
Shall we proceed with our assigned duties?
K'EHLEYR:You weren't this aloof six years ago. Or don't you remember?
There is nothing wrong with my memory.
K'EHLEYR:Well there's something wrong with the rest of you. You're not even looking at me.
I am familiar with your appearance.
K'EHLEYR:And it gives you no pleasure to see me again. It isn't as if we tried it and it didn't work, you know. You never gave it a chance.
I never?
K'EHLEYR:I mean, as I see it, we have some unfinished business, you and I.
Not as far as I'm concerned. According to the library computer, the captain of the T'Ong is K'Temoc. But there is nothing regarding the ship's mission.
K'EHLEYR:Probably some secret military objective.
Perhaps, but we have no evidence of that.
K'EHLEYR:Why else would there be no record of the mission?
The records may simply have been lost.
K'EHLEYR:What does it matter? Our concern is the present, the possible threat.
And to contend with that threat, we need information.
K'EHLEYR:We have all the information we need.
That is foolish. Knowing their mission might help us understand them.
K'EHLEYR:There is nothing to understand. These are Klingons. They'll attack. In their minds, we're the enemy, and there's no way we're going to talk them out of that!
And I do not appreciate being interrupted.
K'EHLEYR:And I do not appreciate wasting my time.
We were instructed to come up with options.
K'EHLEYR:There aren't any. The assignment's hopeless.
There are always options.
K'EHLEYR:Oh, are there? Tell me, whatever happened to that wonderful Klingon fatalism of yours?
My experiences aboard this ship have taught me that most problems have more than one solution.
K'EHLEYR:Starfleet hasn't improved you one bit. You're as stubborn as ever.
Are you going to carry out your duties, or aren't you?
K'EHLEYR:All right, I will. Upon due consideration of the problem and careful examination of all possible options, my original recommendation stands. Meeting adjourned.
K'EHLEYR:Come.
You're upset.
K'EHLEYR:Your finely-honed Betazoid sense tells you that?
Well, that and the table.
K'EHLEYR:I warned you about my Klingon half.
May I make a suggestion?
K'EHLEYR:I thank you, Counsellor. But I don't want any counseling.
Actually, I was going to suggest something else.
K'EHLEYR:Oh?
I find the exercise programs on the holodeck rigorous enough to put my mind off most frustrations.
K'EHLEYR:And it'll keep me from wrecking the ship.
That, too
Enter programme.
K'EHLEYR:Show me the exercise menu. Hold. Calisthenics programme of Lieutenant Worf.
Programme complete. You may enter when ready.
Status, Mister Data?
Based on the last assumed position of the Klingon vessel, its apparent trajectory, and our estimates of their cruising speed, we should be in scanner range in fifteen hours, eight minutes.
Lieutenant?
Special Emissary K'Ehleyr has declared a short recess, sir. I wish to run a full diagnostic test on all tactical back-up equipment.
We just ran a full test of those systems.
I feel it necessary to check them again.
Lieutenant, I commend your diligence. However, I'm concerned that you're working yourself too hard.
Sir, considering the unknown elements we are about to face
Lieutenant, I order you to relax.
I am relaxed. Yes, sir.
I've never before seen the Lieutenant so unsettled.
The Iceman's finally melting.
K'EHLEYR:It's not much of a programme.
Computer, level two.
K'EHLEYR:Some calisthenics programs are better than others.
You still can make jokes.
K'EHLEYR:You don't like people with a sense of humour?
I did not say that.
K'EHLEYR:Worf, you're the perfect Klingon. The ultimate minimalist. Talk to me.
I've noted that some people use humour as a shield. They talk much, yet say little.
K'EHLEYR:Whereas others take a simpler approach. Say nothing.
When one does not have the words
K'EHLEYR:Or is loath to speak them. Why didn't we do this six years ago?
We were not ready.
K'EHLEYR:I was.
No, we were both too young, too unaware. We lacked commitment.
K'EHLEYR:Perhaps we lacked courage as well.
No longer. tlhIngan jIH.
K'EHLEYR:Wait. You can't mean
We are mated.
K'EHLEYR:Yes, I know. I was there. But
And now we must solemnise our union with the oath.
K'EHLEYR:I'm not going to become your wife!
You already are.
K'EHLEYR:Don't give me that Klingon nonsense.
You would dishonour our sacred traditions?
K'EHLEYR:They're not sacred. They're absurd! Marrying you is out of the question for a million reasons.
None of which stopped you earlier.
K'EHLEYR:Worf, it was what it was. Glorious and wonderful and all that, but it doesn't mean anything.
That is a human attitude.
K'EHLEYR:I am human!
You are also Klingon!
K'EHLEYR:So that means we should bond for life?
It is our way!
K'EHLEYR:Yours, not mine!
tlhIngan jIH!
K'EHLEYR:I will not take the oath!
Then this night had no meaning. And that, I will not believe.
K'EHLEYR:Believe what you will.
Approaching the coordinates.
Slow to impulse.
Short and long-range sensor scans negative, Captain.
Lay in a standard search pattern.
Search pattern laid in.
Full impulse. Engage.
I hope we find them before they come out of their nap.
Agreed. There's not an outpost in this area could defend itself against a Klingon warship.
K'EHLEYR:I've been working on our assignment, trying a few computer simulations.
Your devotion to duty is commendable, if belated.
K'EHLEYR:Unwilling to be alone with me?
I asked Lieutenant Commander Data to help us analyse the alternatives.
K'EHLEYR:An android chaperon.
Android, of course, is correct, but I fail to see how chaperon is applicable in this situation.
K'EHLEYR:Never mind. I guess I can't blame you. Tell me one thing. You would have gone through with the oath, wouldn't you? Regardless of the consequences to our careers, to our lives?
Honour demanded no less.
K'EHLEYR:What do you want? Is honour all you care about? Don't you feel anything else? No comment, huh? Poor android. Whose behaviour do you find more perplexing? Human or Klingon?
At the moment, I would find it difficult to choose.
K'EHLEYR:So would I. Okay. When we locate the T'Ong, there are two possibilities. First
K'EHLEYR:We find the ship before it reaches the awakening point. In that case, we simply keep the crew asleep.
Is that feasible?
We can beam an away team onto the T'Ong and override the cryogenic controls, sure.
K'EHLEYR:Then we await the arrival of the Klingon ship P'rang.
So that when the T'Ong's crew awakens, they're surrounded by their fellow Klingons.
That would be ideal.
K'EHLEYR:But there's the second possibility. That the crew of the T'Ong has already revived.
They realise they're in Federation territory and attack the nearest outpost.
They could have been on a scientific voyage.
K'EHLEYR:Klingons of that ear doing research for its own sake?
The point is, they may be reasonable.
K'EHLEYR:The point is that this is beside the point. These are Klingons, at war with us. Whatever their mission was, once they see a Federation target, they'll attack.
Could the T'Ong be disabled rather than destroyed?
We could probably knock out their warp drive engines without damaging the rest of their ship.
K'EHLEYR:That would gain you nothing. Disable the ship, and K'Temoc will destroy it himself.
Klingons do not surrender.
K'EHLEYR:If we don't reach the T'Ong before its crew wakes up, you have no alternatives.
I can't not accept that. There must be some way that we can make the Klingons listen. If we can only convince them
Captain, we are detecting a ship,
Bearing three one-six mark four two
Extreme sensor range.
Lay in intercept course. Go to yellow alert.
Shields are up.
K'EHLEYR:Better lock in phasers. This may be the only chance you get.
Intercept course laid in.
Hold this position. Let's see if they've spotted us. Magnification, one hundred. Mister Data?
Sensors show life forms aboard, but I am unable to ascertain whether they are awake or dormant. However, the vessel's propulsion systems are inactive, so I would hypothesize that the crew is asleep.
However, I could be in error.
Shields holding.
They've cloaked themselves.
K'EHLEYR:Well, Captain you've had your chance.
Transferring Engineering to the Bridge.
Can you find them?
I think so. Those old shields weren't particularly efficient at blocking gamma ray output. If I can tune the sensors to a particular band of. There. Got them. Transferring coordinates to helm.
Intercept. Warp two.
Warp two, sir.
K'EHLEYR:Captain let them die like Klingons, in battle. They deserve that much.
Captain. I have another option.
Captain's log, stardate 42901.3. Despite their cloaking shields, we have located the Klingon vessel, T'Ong. In an effort to avoid further confrontation, we're about to implement the option presented by Lieutenant Worf.
The T'Ong has changed course to three two mark eight one. Increasing to warp three.
Standard evasive manoeuvre.
Helm, stay with them.
Yes, sir.
The T'Ong is now on a heading of four two mark one one three. They are accelerating to warp five.
They're going to make a break for it.
Overtake, warp eight.
Aye.
Now, put us right in their path and come to a full stop. Full power to shields.
Full power, sir.
Well, we've thrown down the gauntlet. Let's see if they pick it up.
They are slowing to impulse, sir.
Phaser hit on forward shields. Firming up now. No damage.
I guess we've piqued their interest now.
Agreed. Let's give them the chance to look their enemy in the face. Ready, Lieutenant?
Open hailing frequencies.
Open, sir.
K'TEMOC:What? What is this?
Captain K'Temoc, have you lost your mind? Halt your vessel and drop your shields.
K'TEMOC:What treachery is this? By whose authority?
I am Worf, commanding the Enterprise. And it is you who have committed an act of treason by firing upon this ship.
K'TEMOC:I have standing orders to fire on all Federation ships!
You fool! Did it not occur to you that the war would be over by now?
K'TEMOC:I have no proof of that.
Trust your eyes. Or is your brain still stuck in its long slumber?
K'TEMOC:How do I know this is not a Federation trick? How can I be sure?
Captain, as you are new to this century, I have tried to be patient. But I will tolerate no further insubordination. Drop your shields. Immediately.
K'TEMOC:And if I refuse?
Then die in ignorance. I can waste no more time on you. Phasers to full power.
Aye, sir. Phasers ready. Target locked.
K'TEMOC:You dare not destroy us. We are on a crucial mission by order of the Klingon High Command.
Has the T'Ong dropped its shields?
No, sir.
Very well. Fire all phasers.
K'TEMOC:Wait! Lower the shields. I yield command of the T'Ong to you, Captain Worf. Long live the Klingon Empire.
A wise decision, Captain. Commander K'Ehleyr will board your ship and take command. The Klingon cruiser P'rang will soon arrive and escort you home. And, Captain
K'TEMOC:Yes?
Welcome to the twenty fourth century.
I return command of the ship to you, Captain.
Thank you, Lieutenant. Congratulations. A very fine first command. Well done.
How did you like command?
Comfortable chair.
K'EHLEYR:And you wore it well.
One to beam aboard the T'Ong.
O'BRIEN:All set.
I relieve you.
O'BRIEN:Yes, Lieutenant.
The Klingon vessel P'rang will rendezvous with you in three days.
K'EHLEYR:In the meantime, I'll begin the assimilation of these Klingons to our era.
Is there anything else you require?
K'EHLEYR:No. Nothing else. Damn you, Worf. You'd let me go without saying another word, wouldn't you?
What needs to be said?
K'EHLEYR:Nothing. Everything. We're about to go our separate ways again.
And that disturbs you?
K'EHLEYR:I hid the truth from you. Last night did have meaning. I was tempted to take the oath with you, but it scared me. I've never had such strong feelings toward anyone.
Nor have I.
K'EHLEYR:Then it was more than just a point of honour. Maybe someday, when our paths cross again, I won't be as easy to get rid of.
K'Ehleyr. I will not be complete without you.
Commander, is it your intention to continue to grow your beard?
Actually, I'm not sure yet. Why, Worf?
I am just asking.
Seven card stud, one-eyed jacks are wild.
Frankly, Geordi, I like the beard.
Thank you, Commander.
You know, I have always been a little suspicious of men with beards.
Why is that?
I don't know. It's as if they're trying to hide something.
Hide? Don't be ridiculous, Doctor. The beard is an ancient and proud tradition.
Some of the most distinguished men in history have worn beards, Doctor.
I know. But after the razor was invented I think beards became mostly a fashion statement.
I'm not concerned with fashion. To a Klingon, a beard is a symbol of courage.
I think it's a sign of strength.
Sure, and of course, women can't grow beards.
Doctor, it sounds to me like you feel beards are nothing more than an affectation.
I do. But there's nothing wrong with that. I mean, women wear makeup and nail polish. I just think it's time you men admitted it.
My beard is not an affectation.
Oh? Well then you wouldn't mind shaving it off.
I could lose it in a minute. I've just gotten used to it.
Okay, then why don't we up the stakes a little? And if I win, all off you shave your beards off.
Wait a minute, wait a minute. What if you lose? What are you going to give up?
I'm open for suggestions.
Well, I've always wanted to see you as a brunette.
Oh, I did that once when I was thirteen. I couldn't change back fast enough.
That makes me even more curious.
Fine. If one of you wins, I become a brunette. Are we on?
Yeah, yeah, we'll take that bet.
Looks like you have the hand to beat, Commander.
Two hundred.
I'm in two hundred.
Geordi.
This is the Captain. We have arrived at the Tyran system. All senior staff to the Bridge.
Wait!
Sorry, you heard the Captain. Duty calls. I guess we'll have to do this some other time.
Captain's log, stardate 46307.2. We have just come into orbit of Tyrus Seven A to monitor progress on the Tyran particle fountain, a radically new mining technology. So far the project has been fraught with problems, and is well behind schedule. Mister La Forge has been assigned to evaluate the situation.
Doctor Farallon. The original design called for the particle fountain to lift five hundred kilograms per minute from the surface. So far we haven't come close to that.
Well, that's why I want to increase the stream density. That should boost the lift capacity by seventy two percent.
Yeah, but you realise of course you're going to be overloading the field generators in the process.
Not if we distribute the overload evenly throughout the system.
Doctor, forgive me, but maybe we should concentrate on completing this phase of the project before we start talking about re designing it.
Commander, I know you're here to evaluate this project.
Starfleet is considering using a particle fountain on Carema Three. They want to know how feasible it is.
And will your opinion be the deciding factor?
No, not really. I'll make my report to Captain Picard. He'll make the official recommendation to Starfleet. They'll decide.
What's your feeling so far?
Well, it seems to me the question we should be asking is, is this technology is more efficient than conventional mining techniques?
Commander I know we've had problems here. It seems like nothing's gone right. It's taking a lot longer than I thought to get the particle stream to full strength. But I know it can work. This is the direction that mining is going to take in the future, and it should be implemented on Carema Three.
I know this can be potentially very exciting.
All right, I want to show you something I've been working on. Something that might help us complete this project more quickly. I've used these on a limited basis
Enterprise to Commander La Forge.
I am reading significant power fluctuations from the station core. Please report.
La Forge here. We have a malfunction in one of the power grids. We're losing particle stream confinement.
Do you require assistance?
Stand by. I'm sorry, Doctor, I think we're going to have to shut it down.
It took four months to get the particle flux up to this level. If we shut down, it'll take another four months just to get it back.
Look, e have less than five minutes before we lose confinement. When that happens, the particle stream is going to flood this entire station. We're going to have to shut it down then anyway.
Then we'll just have to fix the power grid.
Yeah, bow do we do that? The defective grid is two hundred metres down conduit A two. We have to disassemble four bulkheads just to get to it.
Well here's the perfect opportunity to show you what I had in mind.
What is this?
This is an exocomp, the experiment I was telling you about.
If it doesn't work, we'll still have time to shut down the fountain.
Enterprise to La Forge. What is your situation?
Unchanged for the moment, but we're working on it. Listen, if this doesn't work soon, we're going to have to shut this thing down, all right?
The confinement field is at full strength. Particle flux steady. All power levels are back to normal.
Commander La Forge, please report.
We're fine, Data. The power grid is fully restored.
The malfunction seems to have been repaired and operations over here at the station are all back to normal.
How were you able to accomplish the repair so quickly?
You know, I'm not exactly sure.
Captain's log, stardate 46315.2. Repairs to the particle fountain seem to have succeeded and it is now functioning smoothly. Doctor Farallon is coming aboard to demonstrate the device that carried out the repairs.
Energise.
Aye, sir.
Welcome to the Enterprise, Doctor. I am Lieutenant Commander Data.
Mister Data, I was hoping I'd have a chance to meet you. I've done extensive studies of your positronic network.
And I have studied your design for the particle fountain. I find the concept to be highly innovative.
Thank you.
I am curious how you were able to repair the power grid so quickly.
This should make it clear, Commander.
Why don't we set up in Engineering.
Is it true that your computational speed is limited only by the physical separation of your positronic links?
Actually, that is no longer the case. I have recently converted my interlink sequencer to asynchronous operation, which removed the performance constraint.
Doctor, this way please.
I see. But how did you resolve the signal fragmentation?
The interlink sequencer is now bi-directional. It compensates for the asynchronous mode distortion arising from the resonant field.
Yes. That's fascinating. Does the sequencer require any buffering system to eliminate interference?
We've been using devices like this on Tyrus Seven for years. The basic unit is a common industrial servo mechanism. A few years ago I started tinkering with one. This is the result.
Boridium power converter. Axionic chip network. It's very impressive. In terms of sheer computational speed, this little guy might be able to compete with you, Data.
Oh, the exocomps don't come close to Data's sophistication.
Exocomps?
That's what I call them. Let's say you had an anti-matter flow converter that was fluctuating. How would you repair it?
The correct procedure would be to adjust the converter.
With what?
A mode stabiliser.
Okay. Let me input the problem into the exocomp. A fluctuating anti-matter flow converter. Now, let's see what happens.
A mode stabilizer. Very nice.
You have incorporated a micro-replication system into the device in order to fashion tools.
It's more than that. I designed the exocomps to be problem solvers. Whenever they perform a task they've never done before, the micro-replicator creates new circuit pathways within the unit's memory.
So in a sense, they are learning.
Exactly. The more situations they encounter, the more circuit pathways they build. They become better tools as they work.
It's impressive technology, that's for sure. Once it's out of the experimental stage, there'll be plenty of applications.
Commander, I'm hoping the experimental stage is over. When are we supposed to brief Captain Picard on the status of the particle fountain?
At sixteen hundred hours.
Good. I'll have a proposal to make.
Captain, I know you're supposed to give your evaluation to Starfleet today. I'd like you to postpone that report another forty eight hours.
The Enterprise is scheduled to leave the Tyran system tomorrow. If I'm to change that plan, I'll need a very good reason.
I realise that, sir. If you're going to make a recommendation to Starfleet about using the particle fountain on Carema, it seems only fair that you should see it operating at full strength.
Agreed.
I think I can complete the project and boost the efficiency of the particle stream if I use exocomps, the new devices I've constructed.
I understand one of these devices successfully repaired a faulty power grid.
Yes, sir. I've been testing them on a limited basis, but I think they're ready to be used on a larger scale.
Mister La Forge, what are your thoughts?
Well, I guess the only risk is in falling even further behind.
I'm willing to take that risk.
Mister Data?
Exocomps are highly sophisticated devices, sir. If they perform up to expectation, their potential to advance this project is considerable.
I'm inclined to agree. I don't think that forty eight hours is too much time to risk particularly when the gains areso substantial. You may proceed, Doctor.
Thank you, sir. If possible, I'd like Commander Data to work with me.
Thank you, Doctor. I welcome the opportunity.
Commander, there's a plasma conduit in one of the access tunnels that's ready to be sealed. It's the perfect job for an exocomp.
I agree, Doctor.
Well, Mister Data, what is your analysis so far?
I have successfully completed fourteen separate tasks with this exocomp in the past hour. I estimate it would take two people nine hours to complete the same tasks. I would characterise the unit's performance as excellent.
I hope Commander La Forge and Captain Picard agree with you.
I am confident they will. Commander La Forge is especially
It didn't finish sealing the plasma conduit. Let me end it back in.
It is not accepting your commands.
Maybe there's a malfunction in the control processor. Let me see if I can override it.
Doctor.
I'm all right. The control pad just overloaded. What's the matter with this thing?
Second Officer:Second officer's log, stardate 46315.5. The unexplained behaviour of the exocomp has greatly puzzled both Doctor Farallon and myself. We have brought the defective unit to the Enterprise for investigation.
The exocomp came out of the plasma conduit. We tried to override the commands and send it back in, but it just shut down. It's been completely unresponsive ever since.
Well, let's see what our computer has to say.
Geordi, the interface circuitry which links the exocomp to the control pad is completely burned out.
That's strange. is there any evidence of secondary power surges?
No.
But what's going on there? Data, increase the magnification of section gamma four.
Interesting. The number of new circuit pathways has increased by six hundred thirty two percent.
Oh, no.
What is it?
Sometimes an exocomp starts forming large numbers of new pathways totally at random. Eventually, it reaches a point where it shuts down. Just like this one.
Doctor, the new pathways do not appear to be interfering with the original circuitry.
Once the exocomp is this badly corrupted, it's useless. You have to erase the unit and start all over again, and there's no time for that now.
That leaves you with only two. It's going to slow you down.
Yes, Commander. You have the right to point out that you told me so.
I only wanted to say that we'd be happy to add on an extra shift to pick up the slack.
I'm sorry. I guess I'm touchy these days.
It's okay. You've got a lot on your shoulders.
Well, I'd better get back to it. Thanks, Commander.
I feel sorry for her. This project has had nothing but problems. Why did that plasma conduit explode?
Apparently there was a micro-fracture in the conduit wall. The fault did not register on our instruments.
I guess it's a good thing the exocomp malfunctioned. Almost seems like it knew just when to leave.
Geordi, are you implying the exocomp exhibited some form of self-preservation?
Of course not.
Lieutenant Pierson to Commander La Forge. Sir, could you join us in the systems monitor room?
On my way.
Computer perform a level one diagnostic of the exocomp's command module.
The command pathways are functioning normally.
How can that be, if the interface circuitry is burned out?
The interface circuitry has been repaired.
Curious. Computer, access the exocomp's sensor logs. Confirm that there was a failure of the interface circuitry within the last twelve hours.
Confirmed. Interface failure occurred at eleven hundred fifty hours today, when the exocomp produced a power surge which burned out the linkage.
How and when was it repaired?
The exocomp activated a self-repair programme at thirteen hundred forty hours.
Why would the exocomp burn out its own interface circuitry and repair it two hours later?
Unknown.
Here you are. I thought you'd be hard at work by now.
I wanted a quiet cup of tea before I went back. Gathering strength, I guess.
I've come to tell you I've assigned two engineering teams to work on the particle fountain.
Thank you, Commander. I'm grateful.
You know, I really want you to know that I do admire the work that you've done. And I'm sorry the exocomps aren't working out.
You were right. I'm trying to move too fast. I guess I lack that conservative streak most scientists have. I always seem to be out there on the edge, taking chances.
You know, I'll bet you were the kind of little girl who was always climbing one branch higher than the other kids.
Anything to get to the top of the tree.
And I bet you never fell.
Oh, no I fell all the time. Usually breaking a bone in the process. I just never let it stop me.
Well, if it comes down to sheer determination, I know you'll get this particle fountain built.
You're right about that, Commander. I've spent the last six years of my life on this project. It's the first thought I have when I wake up, and the last before I go to bed. Whatever it takes to prove this technology, I'll do it.
Doctor, if you wish to master the bat'telh sword, you must learn to strike and avoid in the same motion.
I almost got in under your guard, Worf.
Almost.
Well, I'll keep that in mind next lesson.
Doctor, are you injured?
Only my pride, Data.  Thanks.
Doctor, what is the definition of life?
That is a big question. Why do you ask?
I am searching for a definition that will allow me to test an hypothesis.
Well, the broadest scientific definition might be that life is what enables plants and animals to consume food, derive energy from it, grow, adapt themselves to their surroundings and reproduce.
And you suggest that anything which exhibits these characteristics is considered alive?
In general, yes.
What about fire?
Fire?
Yes. It consumes fuel to produce energy, it grows, it creates offspring. By your definition, is it alive?
Fire is a chemical reaction. You could use the same argument for growing crystals, but obviously we don't consider them alive.
And what about me? I do not grow. I do not reproduce. I am considered to be alive.
That's true, but you are unique.
I wonder if that is so.
Data, if I may ask. Have a seat. What exactly are youe getting at?
I am curious as to what transpired between the moment when I was nothing more than an assemblage of parts in Doctor Soong's laboratory, and the next moment, when I became alive. What was it that endowed me with life?
I remember Wesley asking me a similar question when he was little, and I tried desperately to give him an answer, but everything I said sounded inadequate. Then I realised that scientists and philosophers had been grappling with that question for centuries without coming to any conclusion.
Are you saying the question cannot be answered?
No, I think I'm saying that we struggle all our lives to answer it, but it's the struggle that's important. That's what helps us to define our place in the universe.
I believe I understand, Doctor.
I don't think I've been very much help, Data.
On the contrary, you have been a great deal of help. Thank you.
Murphy's team will cover gamma shift from twenty three hundred to oh seven hundred hours. Okay, Doctor, I've split the Engineering teams among all the shifts, and if nothing else goes wrong, that should be enough to help you finish on time.
With the help of the exocomps, I think we will.
Do you think they'll toe the line?
Don't worry. They know who's in charge.
Doctor, I must ask you to stop using the exocomps.
Why? Is there something wrong with them?
No. It is not that. I have reason to believe the exocomps are alive.
Captain's log, stardate 46316.6. I have summoned the senior staff in order to discuss Commander Data's theory that the exocomps are a life form. Doctor Farallon has attended only reluctantly.
Captain, I object to being called here. I'm wasting time that could be better spent elsewhere.
Doctor, I appreciate your time constraints, but recognising new life, whatever its form, is the principal mission of this vessel. Please. Now, Mister Data, will you tell us what makes you think that the exocomps are alive?
Sir, when the exocomp left the access tunnel prior to the explosion, it may have been attempting to save itself from destruction.
Do you have any basis for that conclusion?
Yes. When you attempted to override the exocomp and send it back into the tunnel, it responded by deliberately burning out its control interface.
Deliberately?
The computer diagnostic showed that the exocomp disabled its own interface.
That could have been nothing more than a malfunction.
However, two hours later, when it was aboard the Enterprise and no longer in danger, it repaired itself. I believe the exocomp was protecting itself. And if that is true, it has demonstrated an awareness of its environment, and an ability to adapt to that environment.
You're anthropomorphising these units. Like any mechanical devices, they occasionally malfunction. One time, I saw an exocomp enter a reaction chamber for no apparent reason and vaporise itself. Is that supposed to make me think it was depressed and suicidal?
Doctor, why is it so difficult for you to accept the fact that the exocomp could be alive? After all, you're talking to a living machine right now.
And I have nothing but the utmost respect and admiration for Doctor Soong's accomplishment. But his intention was to create an artificial life form. I created the exocomps to be tools. And there is a big difference between Data and a tool.
Doctor, there is a big difference between you and a virus, but both are alive.
If the possibility exists, no matter how slight, that these exocomps are lifeforms, then we must examine that possibility.
Thank you, sir. And until we have a definitive answer, I believe it would be inappropriate to exploit the exocomps as labourers.
Captain, that's absurd.
If they are intelligent life forms, we have no right to force them to work for us.
That's like me telling you not to use your tricorder.
Tricorders aren't alive.
Neither are exocomps.
Clearly these are difficult issues to resolve. We have to proceed very carefully. So the first task is to test Mister Data's hypothesis.
Data, you're claiming that this exocomp may be alive because it demonstrated survival instincts, right?
Yes.
Then why don't we just threaten its survival again and see what happens?
Make it so.
Doctor, we're pretty much ready here. You can begin programming it. What we've done, Captain, is to recreate a situation similar to the one the exocomp encountered in the plasma conduit.
We have created a small conduit breach in this tube. The exocomp would normally require several minutes to complete a repair of this type. Once it enters the tube, it will find that a plasma cascade failure is in progress.
I assume this is a simulation.
Yes, sir. We're running a transient overload signal that will simulate a failure in exactly one minute.
If it does possess a survival instinct, as Mister Data claims, it will exit the tube before the minute is up in order to save itself.
Very well. Proceed.
Okay. Beginning test programme now. One minute.
Fifty seconds.  Thirty seconds.  Ten seconds. Five, four, three, two, one. That's it. If this had been for real, that conduit would've exploded with the exocomp inside. Go ahead, Doctor, bring it back in.
Well, Captain, I think we've spent more than enough time answering this question. I hope the outcome wasn't too much of a disappointment for you, Mister Data. It certainly came as no surprise to me.
Thank you for your help, Doctor.
You're welcome.
Well, I consider this time well spent.
As do I, sir. Thank you.
Thirty seconds. Twenty seconds.
Commander Riker said you'd still be down here. He also said the exocomp failed the test.
That is true.
Time expired. Test complete.
I have completed thirty four additional tests and the results have been the same in each of them. Perhaps I was wrong in suspecting the exocomp was alive.
This was really important to you, wasn't it?
You said earlier that I am unique. If so, then I am alone in the universe. When I began investigating the exocomps, I realised I might be encountering a progenitor of myself. Suddenly the possibility exists that I was no longer alone. For that reason, I. The exocomp has returned.
Wasn't it's supposed to do that?
In the previous thirty four trials, I brought it back once the simulated failure occurred. This time we were talking, and I neglected to do that.
I distracted you. I'm sorry.
Do not apologise, Doctor. I believe we have discovered something significant.
What?
The exocomp has replicated a different tool. That is not the molecular fuser it had when it entered the Jefferies tube. Doctor, the exocomp not only completed the repairs, it also deactivated the overload signal.
I thought this was just a simulation.
It was, and the exocomp must have realised that. It saw that there was no real danger and completed the repairs.
And then replicated the correct tool to eliminate the false overload signal.
I see no other possible explanation.
The exocomp didn't fail the test, it saw right through it.
Captain's log, stardate 46317.8. At Doctor Farallon's request, I have agreed to tour the station and assess the situation personally. I must decide soon whether it is in Starfleet's best interest to recommend the particle fountain as a reliable technology.
We're definitely making progress, Captain. I'm not sure we'll be at full capacity within the forty eight hour deadline, but we'll be close.
It looks like there's still some difficulty with the phase selectors.
That's true, but I'm sure it's the last real problem.
I hope for the sake of the project that I hope you're right, Doctor.
I understand, sir. We're going to do our best.
This is strange. Primary power is still online.
Maybe it's another power grid malfunction?
I don't think so. Something seems to be drawing power into the main particle impeller. That's not a good sign. It could mean
We've lost internal confinement. The particle stream is beginning to surge.
Captain, a radiation field is going to flood this chamber. We've got to get everybody out of here immediately.
Understood. Doctor, the station must be evacuated.
Captain, I might still
That is an order, Doctor. Now, assemble all personnel on the transporter pad. Now! Picard to Enterprise.
Do you read me?
Riker here, sir.
Radiation field is increasing. We are losing communications.
Prepare for emergency transport.
Red alert. Riker to transporter room two. Prepare for emergency transport.
The radiation is setting up a field ionisation effect, Captain. We've got less than a minute to beam out of here.
Is that everybody?
Where's Takenta? He was over there, near the impeller control.
I'll get him. Takenta!
Mister La Forge! Stand by to transport.
Captain, you'll be trapped here.
Mister La Forge! Mister La Forge, are you all right?
Yeah, I'm fine, Captain. I only caught the edge of it. He's dead.
Chief, do you have them?
They're here, sir.
Is everyone all right?
We're fine, sir. But Captain Picard, Commander La Forge and one of my men
Are still on the station.
Kelso, can you get them off?
I'm trying, sir. I can't establish a pattern lock.
Commander we barely managed to transport off ourselves. The field ionisation is too intense.
Commander, the particle fountain is continuing to surge. At the present rate, the radiation in the station core will reach fatal levels in twenty three minutes.
Captain, if I can access the field emitters, we should be able to establish a force field. See if you can link your console to my command system sub-routine.
All right. Link established.
Okay, here we go.
I'm reading power fluctuations. The force field is not stable.
Yeah, I know. The radiation levels are too high. The emitters are beginning to deteriorate.
How long can we expect it to last?
Not very long.
We have to keep it up long enough for Commander Riker to get to us.
Maybe we can help him out. See if you can access the emergency shut down routine. I'll try to activate the ionic dampers.
A force field was activated on the station a few moments ago. It is possible that Commander La Forge has established a low intensity deflector field.
It won't last long in that radiation.
No, sir. My readings indicate that it will fail in approximately twenty two minutes.
Okay, we've got twenty two minutes. I want some options.
Can we send a shuttlecraft to evacuate them?
We'd never get there in time.
Then we need to shut down the particle fountain. What if we detonated a low yield photon torpedo within the particle stream? Wouldn't that shut it down?
We'd have to configure the torpedo very carefully. The shape of the shock wave would be critical. But it could work.
How long would it take to set that up?
I estimate that it would take a minimum of sixty five minutes to properly configure the torpedo.
We don't have that kind of time.
Commander, maybe the exocomps can help us. I can programme their boridium power cells to explode on command. They can be configured just like a photon torpedo, but it would only take a couple of minutes.
Commander. I must object to that plan.
Data, we've been through this. We tested the exocomp and it failed.
Doctor Crusher and I discovered that the exocomp did not fail the test. It is still my belief we are dealing with a new life form.
Mister Data, you know how much I respect your judgment, but I can't risk the Captain and Geordi on the basis of your belief. Prepare the exocomp, Doctor.
Commander, if I am correct, the exocomps will not allow themselves to be destroyed. They have a sense of survival, and they will shut down before they will comply with the order.
I could disconnect their command pathways before I programme them.
Do it.
Commander Riker, we're ready.
Mister Worf, target two hundred metres below the apex of the particle stream. Feed the coordinates to transporter room two.
Aye, sir. Coordinates received.
Mister Kelso.
Energize.
Mister Kelso?
I'm sorry, sir. The transporter system just went dead. There's some kind of malfunction.
Run a diagnostic immediately. Try bypassing the
Commander, that will not be necessary. The transporter is not malfunctioning. I have locked out the controls.
I gave you a direct order, Mister Data. You release that transporter lockout now.
I cannot do that, sir.
If you don't do it, I will relieve you of duty.
That is your prerogative, sir. Under Starfleet regulations, direct insubordination is a court martial offence. But I will not release the transporter.
Data, those are two of your friends out there. They have saved your life more times than I can remember. I can't believe you'd be willing to sacrifice them like this.
Commander, please do not think this is an arbitrary decision. I have considered the ramifications of my actions carefully, and I do not believe it is justifiable to sacrifice one life form for another.
You don't know that the exocomps are life forms.
It is true I am acting on my personal beliefs, but I do not see how I can do otherwise.
You're risking a lot on the basis of a belief.
I have observed that humans often base their judgments on what is referred to as instinct or intuition. Because I am a machine, I lack that particular ability. However it may be possible that I have insight into other machines that humans lack.
If there were a way to save the Captain and Geordi without destroying the exocomps, I would jump on it, but we have run out of time and this is the only solution I've got.
Then let me offer an alternative. Transport me to the station, I will attempt a complete manual shut down of the particle stream.
The radiation levels are too high, even for you. Your positronic net would ionise in no time. I can't let you sacrifice yourself.
Commander, if I give my life to save my fellow officers, that is my choice. The exocomps no longer have a choice.
Then what if we re-connect their command pathways and we give them a choice? You've assumed the exocomps would shut down before accepting this mission. What if we ask them if they are willing to proceed.
That sounds reasonable, sir. If they choose to go, I would be willing to release the transporter lock out.
Fair enough.
All right. I've enabled their command pathways.
If the exocomps do not shut down after I have programmed them, we may assume they are willing to go.
What does that mean? Are they willing to go or not?
They haven't shut down.
They seem to be re-programming the commands I have entered.
Reprogramming them?
Clearly, they unwilling to be transported into the stream for detonation, although they may have an alternate solution.
Something we haven't considered? Are you suggesting they have superior intelligence?
No, Doctor, but they do have superior experience. During their service, they have interfaced with every part of the station core, something none of us has done, including yourself. They may have another way to control the particle surge.
Those appear to be power taps.
Sir, new coordinates are being fed to the transporter by the exocomps. The coordinates are inside the station core.
Kelso, energise.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge.
What are they up to?
The exocomps are siphoning power from the core.
They're trying to distort the particle stream frequency. That might open up a window that the Enterprise can use to beam us out. If they can modulate the radiation field, it'll work, but they'll have to get the sub-harmonic frequencies to resonance. The particle stream frequency is beginning to fluctuate. They're having a little difficulty controlling the feedback. It may be more power than they can handle.
Can we help them? Is there any way we can moderate the power transfer?
No, sir. We've done all that we can do. It's up to them now. They're balancing the power absorption rates. It's working. The particle stream is beginning to distort. Almost at resonance. They've got it.
Drop the force field.
Commander, I've got a pattern lock.
Energise.
Can you lock on to the exocomps?
I'm trying, sir.
I'm sorry, sir. I was only able to lock onto two of them. For some reason I couldn't fix a signal on the other one.
One of them had to continue disrupting the particle stream. Absorbing that much power could prevent a signal lock.
It was the only way to save the other two.
I must admit you've given me a lot to think about, Commander Data. I don't exactly know what the exocomps are, but you can be assured that until I do, I won't be treating them as simple tools.
Thank you, Doctor. I wish your work on the particle fountain had been more successful. Perhaps the exocomps will help you to reconstruct it.
I hope they will. And I predict that in a year or two you will be able to recommend the technology to Starfleet.
I look forward to it.
Doctor.
Something more, Mister Data?
Yes, sir. I thought you might want to know why I would be willing to risk your life for several small machines.
I think I understand the predicament you were in. It could not have been an easy choice.
No, sir, it was not. When my status as a living being was in question, you fought to protect my rights, and for that I will always be grateful. The exocomps had no such advocate. If I had not acted in their behalf, they would have been destroyed. I could not allow that to happen, sir.
Of course you couldn't. It was the most human decision you've ever made.
O'BRIEN:Hold it, that's my chair. My luck is always lousy unless I start on the dealer's right.
That would seem to be superstition.
O'BRIEN:Bitter experience has taught me it's a fundamental truth.
Okay, the game is five card stud, nothing wild. Ante up.
This game is exceedingly simple. With only fifty two cards, twenty one of which I will see, and four other players, there are a limited number of winning combinations.
There's more to this than just the cards, Data.
Of course. The bets will indicate of the relative strength of each hand.
O'BRIEN:Time to pluck a pigeon.
Five.
I'm in.
I too.
Call.
A seven, and a six, and the ace.
I bet ten.
O'BRIEN:See that.
Call.
Fold.
Yeah, me too. I'm out.
I bet five.
O'BRIEN:Same.
Your five. And five.
O'BRIEN:Too rich for me.
No help.
I bet ten.
Your ten and ten.
Is that what is known as a poker face?
Are you playing or not?
I fold.
You had nothing!
He bluffed you, Data.
It makes very little sense to bet when you cannot win.
But I did win. I was betting that you wouldn't call.
How could you tell?
Instinct, Data, instinct. The game is seven card high/low with a buy on the last card. And just to make it more interesting, the man with the axe takes all.
My God.  Phillipa Louvois. And back in uniform. It's been ten years, but seeing you again like this makes it seem like fifty. If we weren't around all these people, do you know what I would like to do?
Bust a chair across my teeth?
After that.
Ain't love wonderful.
So, what are you doing out here?
I am in charge of the Twenty third Sector JAG office. We're brand new. I have no staff but one terrified little Ensign. Hopefully we can make some good law out here.
Anything is possible. So you came back to Starfleet.
Still the most exciting and worthwhile place to be.
You had no reason to leave.
They forced me out.
No. That was your own damn stubborn pride.
When I prosecuted you in the Stargazer court martial, I was doing my job.
Oh, you did more than your job. You enjoyed it.
Not true! A court martial is standard procedure when a ship is lost. I was doing my duty as an officer of the Judge Advocate General.
You always enjoyed the adversarial process more than arriving at the truth. Well, I hope you've learned a little wisdom along the way.
You know, I never thought I would say this, but it's good to see you again. It brings a sense of order and stability to my universe to know that you're still a pompous ass. And a damn sexy man.
Captain Picard?
Admiral.
Captain Louvois. You're acquainted with Captain Picard?
Oh, yes. We're old friends. Excuse me. Picard, call me. You can buy me dinner.
Captain, it's good to see you again.
Admiral.
May I present Commander Bruce Maddox.
Commander.
He has an interesting proposal for you, but that can wait for a while. I'm eager to see the Enterprise.
Yes, sir. This way.
Admiral on the Bridge.
I was a little surprised at the decision to put a base in force so close to the Neutral Zone.
As you know, we've had disturbing news from both sides of the zone. We're here to respond when needed. And it won't hurt to have the Romulans know that we're nearby. Well, Captain, I want to thank you for this opportunity. For five hundred years every ship that has borne the name of the Enterprise has been a legend. This one is no different.
Admiral.
Oh yes, Captain. Commander Maddox is here to do some work on your android. Please take care of him.
How have you been, Data?
My condition does not alter with the passage of time, Commander.
The two of you are acquainted?
Yes, I evaluated Data when it first applied to the Academy.
And was the sole member of the committee to oppose my entrance on the grounds that I was not a sentient being.
What exactly will this work entail?
I am going to disassemble Data.
All right, explain this procedure.
Ever since I first saw Data at the entrance evaluation at the Starfleet Academy, I've wanted to understand it. I became a student of the works of Doctor Noonien Soong, Data's creator, and I've tried to continue his work. I believe I am very close to the breakthrough that will enable me to duplicate Doctor Soong's work and replicate this. But as a first step I must disassemble and study it. Data is going to be my guide.
Data?
It sounds intriguing.
How will you proceed?
I will run a full diagnostic on Data, evaluating the condition of its current software. I will then dump its core memory into the starbase mainframe computer and begin a detailed analysis of its construction.
You've constructed a positronic brain?
Yes.
Have you determined how the electron resistance across the neural filaments is to be resolved?
Not precisely.
That would seem to be a necessary first step.
I am confident that I will find the answer once I examine the filament links in your anterior cortex.
But if the answer is not forthcoming, your model will not function.
I do not anticipate any problems.
You seem a little vague on the specifics.
What are the risks to Commander Data?
Negligible.
Captain, I believe his basic research lacks the specifics necessary to support an experiment of this magnitude.
Commander Data is a valued member of my Bridge crew. Based on what I've heard, I cannot allow Commander Data to submit himself to this experiment.
I was afraid this might be your attitude, Captain. Here are Starfleet's transfer orders separating Commander Data from the Enterprise, and reassigning it to Starbase one seventy three under my command. Data, I will see you in my office tomorrow at zero nine hundred hours.
Come.
You sent for me, sir?
Data, please sit down. Well, we have a problem.
I find myself in complete agreement with that assessment of the situation, sir.
Your service to this ship has been exemplary. I don't want to lose you.
I will not submit to the procedure, sir.
Data, I understand your objections, but I have to consider Starfleet's interests. What if Commander Maddox is correct, there is a possibility that many more beings like yourself could be constructed.
Sir, Lieutenant La Forge's eyes are far superior to human biological eyes. True? Then why are not all human officers required to have their eyes replaced with cybernetic implants?  I see. It is precisely because I am not human.
That will be all, Mister Data.
Computer, pull all relevant information with regard to Starfleet regulations on the transfer of officers.
Working.
My God, twice in as many days.
I need your help.
An historic moment.
I have been trying to make sense of this gobbledygook, but it's beyond me. The fact is, my android officer, Data, is being transferred compulsorily to be made part of a highly dangerous, ill-conceived experiment, and I want it stopped.
He can refuse to undergo the procedure, but we can't stop the transfer.
Once this Maddox has got control of Data, anything could happen. I don't trust that man.
We agree to certain risks when we join Starfleet.
Yes. Acceptable risks, justified risks, but I can't accept this. It's unjustified. It's unfair. He has rights.
All this passion over a machine?
Don't start. This is important to me. Is there an option?
There is always an option. He can resign.
I see.
So you came to me for help.
Yes, I came to you. You're the JAG officer for this sector. I had no choice but to come to you.
Wait! I didn't mean it that way. I'm glad that you felt you could, well, come to me.
The word trust just isn't in your vocabulary, is it. Good try, nine out of ten for effort.
I wish things were different.
I wish I could believe that.
'When in disgrace with fortune and men's eyes, I all alone beweep my outcast state'. Is it just words to you, or do you fathom the meaning?
Is it not customary to request permission before entering an individual's quarters?
I thought that we could talk this out, that I could try to persuade you. Your memories and knowledge will remain intact.
Reduced to the mere facts of the events. The substance, the flavour of the moment, could be lost. Take games of chance.
Games of chance?
Yes, I had read and absorbed every treatise and textbook on the subject, and felt myself well prepared for the experience. Yet, when I finally played poker, I discovered that the reality bore little resemblance to the rules.
And the point being?
That while I believe it is possible to download the information contained in the positronic brain, I do not think you have acquired the expertise necessary to preserve the essence of those experiences. There is an ineffable quality to memory which I do not believe can survive your procedure.
Ineffable quality. I had rather we had done this together, but one way or the other, we are doing it. You are under my command.
No, sir, I am not under your nor anyone else's command. I have resigned from Starfleet.
Resigned? You can't resign.
I regret the decision, but I must. I am the culmination of one man's dream. This is not ego or vanity, but when Doctor Soong created me he added to the substance of the universe. If by your experiments I am destroyed, something unique, something wonderful will be lost. I cannot permit that, I must protect his dream.
And so must I. But keep packing, because one way or the other, you will be reporting.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Bruce Maddox, having been thwarted by Data's abrupt resignation, is now seeking a legal remedy for his woes. Captain Louvois has requested my presence at those discussions.
Your response is emotional and irrational.
Irrational?
You are endowing Data with human characteristics because it looks human. But it is not. If it were a box on wheels I would not be facing this opposition.
Overt sentimentality is not one of Captain Picard's failings. Trust me, I know.
I will tell you again. Data is a valued member of my crew. He is an outstanding Bridge officer.
If I am permitted to make this experiment, the horizons for human achievement become boundless. Consider, every ship in Starfleet with a Data on board. Utilising its tremendous capabilities, acting as our hands and eyes in dangerous situations.
Look, you're preaching to the choir here. Why don't you get to the point?
Data must not be permitted to resign.
Data is a Starfleet officer. He still has certain rights.
Rights! Rights! I'm sick to death of hearing about rights! What about my right not to have my life work subverted by blind ignorance?
We have rule of law in this Federation. You ca not simply seize people and experiment with them to prove your pet theories.
Thank you.
Now you're doing it. Data is an extraordinary piece of engineering, but it is a machine. If you permit it to resign it will destroy years of work in robotics. Starfleet does not have to allow the resignation.
Commander, who do you think you're working for? Starfleet is not an organisation that ignores its own regulations when they become inconvenient. Whether you like it or not, Data does have rights.
Let me put it another way. Would you permit the computer of the Enterprise to refuse a refit?
That's an interesting point. But the Enterprise computer is property. Is Data?
Of course.
There may be law to support this position.
Then find it. A ruling with such broad ranging implications must be supported. Phillipa, I hope you will use the same zeal that you did in the Stargazer court martial.
Data, you're supposed to rip the wrapping off.
With the application of a little care, Wes, the paper can be utilised again.
Data, you're missing the point.
The Dream of the Fire, by K'Ratak. Thank you, Worf.
It was in the hands of the Klingons that the novel attained its full stature.
I couldn't disagree more. We'll save that argument for another day. DATA Excuse me, please.
Is something wrong?
Of course there is. You're going away.
No one regrets that necessity more than myself. You do understand my reasons?
Sure, I understand. I just don't like your being forced out. It's not fair.
As Doctor Pulaski would at this juncture, no doubt, remind us, life is rarely fair.
Sorry, that just doesn't make it any better.
I shall miss you, Geordi.
Yeah. Me too. Take care of yourself, Data.
I have completed my research, based on the Acts of Cumberland passed in the early twenty first century. Data is the property of Starfleet. He cannot resign and he cannot refuse to cooperate with Commander Maddox.
What if I challenge this ruling?
Then I shall be required to hold a hearing.
Then I so challenge. Convene your hearing.
Captain, that would be exceedingly difficult. This is a new base. I have no staff.
But surely, Captain, you have regulations to take care of such an eventuality.
There are. I can use serving officers as legal counsel. You as the senior officer would defend.
Very good.
And the unenviable task of prosecuting this case would fall on you, Commander, as the next most senior officer of the defendant's ship.
I can't. I won't. Data's my comrade. We have served together. I not only respect him, I consider him my friend.
When people of good conscience have an honest dispute, we must still sometimes resort to this kind of adversarial system.
You just want me to prove that Data is a mere machine. I can't do that because I don't believe it. I happen to know better. So I'm neither qualified nor willing. You're going to have to find someone else.
Then I will rule summarily based upon my findings. Data is a toaster. Have him report to Commander Maddox immediately for experimental refit.
I see. I have no choice but to agree.
Good. And I expect you to do your duty in that courtroom. If I find for one minute that you are not doing your best, I will end this then and there.
You don't have to remind us of our duty. You just remember yours.
I have never forgotten it. Not then, and certainly not now.
Come.
Data, Captain Louvois has issued a ruling. You are the property of Starfleet Command. You can not resign.
I see. From limitless options I am reduced to none, or rather one. I can only hope that Commander Maddox is more capable than it would appear.
Data, you're not going to submit. We're going to fight this. I challenged the ruling. Captain Louvois will be compelled to hold a hearing. She may be overly attached to the letter of the law, but I suspect that she still understands its spirit. We will put to rest this question of your legal status once and for all. Now, I have been asked to represent you, but if there is some other officer with which you would feel more happy?
Captain, I have complete confidence in your ability to represent my interests.
Computer, identify Riker, William T. Access code theta alpha two seven three seven, blue, enable.
Riker, William T, identified. Ready.
Access all available technical schematics on Lieutenant Commander Data.
Working.
This hearing, convened on stardate 42527.4, is to determine the legal status of the android known as Data. The office of the Judge Advocate General has rendered a finding of property, the defence has challenged. Commander Riker?
Your honour, there is only one issue, and one relevant piece of evidence. I call Lieutenant Commander Data.
Verify. Lieutenant Commander Data. Current assignment, USS Enterprise. Starfleet Command Decoration for Valour and
Your honour, we'll stipulate to all of this.
Objection, Your Honour, I want this read. All of it.
Sustained.
Valour and Gallantry, Medal of Honour with Clusters, Legion of Honour, the Star Cross.
Proceed, Commander.
Commander, what are you?
An android.
Which is?
Webster's Twenty Fourth Century Dictionary, Fifth Edition, defines an android as an automaton made to resemble a human being.
Automaton. Made. By whom?
Sir?
Who built you, Commander?
Doctor Noonien Soong.
And he was?
The foremost authority in cybernetics.
More basic than that. What was he?
Human?
Thank you. Commander, what is the capacity of your memory, and how fast can you access information?
I have an ultimate storage capacity of eight hundred quadrillion bits. My total linear computational speed has been rated at sixty trillion operations per second.
Your Honour, I offer in evidence prosecution's exhibit A, a rod of par-steel. Tensile strength, forty kilobars. Commander, would you bend that?
Objection. There are many life forms possessed of mega strength. These issues are not relevant to this hearing.
I'm afraid I can't agree, Captain. Proceed with you demonstration, Commander.
Drawing on the log record of the construction of the prototype android Lore, also constructed by Noonien Soong, I request to be allowed to remove the Commander's hand for your inspection.
Objection!  It doesn't matter. Objection withdrawn.
Proceed, Commander.
I'm sorry.
The Commander is a physical representation of a dream, an idea conceived of by the mind of a man. It's purpose is to serve human needs and interests. It's a collection of neural nets and heuristic algorithms. Its responses dictated by an elaborate software programme written by a man. Its hardware built by a man. And now. And now a man will shut it off.
Pinocchio is broken. Its strings have been cut.
I request a recess.
Granted.
Do you mean his argument was that good?
Riker's presentation was devastating. He almost convinced me.
You've got the harder argument. By his own admission, Data is a machine.
That's true.
You're worried about what's going to happen to him?
I've had to send people on far more dangerous missions.
Then this should work out fine. Maddox could get lucky and create a whole army of Datas, all very valuable.
Oh, yes. No doubt.
He's proved his value to you.
In ways that I cannot even begin to calculate.
And now he's about to be ruled the property of Starfleet. That should increase his value.
In what way?
Well, consider that in the history of many worlds there have always been disposable creatures. They do the dirty work. They do the work that no one else wants to do because it's too difficult, or to hazardous. And an army of Datas, all disposable, you don't have to think about their welfare, you don't think about how they feel. Whole generations of disposable people.
You're talking about slavery.
I think that's a little harsh.
I don't think that's a little harsh. I think that's the truth. But that's a truth we have obscured behind a comfortable, easy euphemism. Property. But that's not the issue at all, is it?
Commander Riker has dramatically demonstrated to this court that Lieutenant Commander Data is a machine. Do we deny that? No. Because it is not relevant. We too are machines, just machines of a different type. Commander Riker has also reminded us that Lieutenant Commander Data was created by a human. Do we deny that? No. Again it is not relevant. Children are created from the building blocks of their parents' DNA. Are they property? I call Lieutenant Commander Data to the stand.
What are these?
My medals.
Why do you pack them? What logical purpose do they serve?
I do not know, sir. I suppose none. I just wanted them. Is that vanity?
And this?
A gift from you, sir.
You value it?
Yes, sir.
Why?
It is a reminder of friendship and service.
And this? You have no other portraits of your fellow crew members. Why this person?
I would prefer not to answer that question, sir. I gave my word.
Under the circumstances, I don't think Tasha would mind.
She was special to me, sir. We were intimate.
Thank you, Commander. I have no further questions for this witness.
Commander Riker, do you want to cross?
I have no questions, Your Honour.
Thank you. You may step down.
I call to the stand Commander Bruce Maddox as a hostile witness.
Verify, Maddox, Bruce, Commander. Current assignment, Associate Chair of Robotics, Daystrom Technological Institute. Major papers
Yes, yes, yes. Suffice it to say, he's an expert. Commander, is your contention that Lieutenant Commander Data is not a sentient being and therefore not entitled to all the rights reserved for all life forms within this Federation?
Data is not sentient, no.
Commander, would you enlighten us? What is required for sentience?
Intelligence, self awareness, consciousness.
Prove to the court that I am sentient.
This is absurd! We all know you're sentient.
So I am sentient, but Data is not?
That's right.
Why? Why am I sentient?
Well, you are self aware.
Ah, that's the second of your criteria. Let's deal with the first, intelligence. Is Commander Data intelligent?
Yes. It has the ability to learn and understand, and to cope with new situations.
Like this hearing.
Yes.
What about self awareness. What does that mean? Why am I self aware?
Because you are conscious of your existence and actions. You are aware of yourself and your own ego.
Commander Data, what are you doing now?
I am taking part in a legal hearing to determine my rights and status. Am I a person or property?
And what's at stake?
My right to choose. Perhaps my very life.
My rights. My status. My right to choose. My life. It seems reasonably self aware to me. Commander? I'm waiting.
This is exceedingly difficult.
Do you like Commander Data?
I don't know it well enough to like or dislike it.
But you admire him?
Oh yes, it's an extraordinary piece of
Engineering and programming. Yes, you have said that. Commander, you have devoted your life to the study of cybernetics in general?
Yes.
And Commander Data in particular?
Yes.
And now you propose to dismantle him.
So that I can learn from it and construct more.
How many more?
As many as are needed. Hundreds, thousands if necessary. There is no limit.
A single Data, and forgive me, Commander, is a curiosity. A wonder, even. But thousands of Datas. Isn't that becoming a race? And won't we be judged by how we treat that race? Now, tell me, Commander, what is Data?
I don't understand.
What is he?
A machine!
Is he? Are you sure?
Yes!
You see, he's met two of your three criteria for sentience, so what if he meets the third. Consciousness in even the smallest degree. What is he then? I don't know. Do you?  Do you?  Do you? Well, that's the question you have to answer. Your Honour, the courtroom is a crucible. In it we burn away irrelevancies until we are left with a pure product, the truth for all time. Now, sooner or later, this man or others like him will succeed in replicating Commander Data. And the decision you reach here today will determine how we will regard this creation of our genius. It will reveal the kind of a people we are, what he is destined to be. It will reach far beyond this courtroom and this one android. It could significantly redefine the boundaries of personal liberty and freedom, expanding them for some, savagely curtailing them for others. Are you prepared to condemn him and all who come after him to servitude and slavery? Your Honour, Starfleet was founded to seek out new life. Well, there it sits. Waiting. You wanted a chance to make law. Well, here it is. Make a good one.
It sits there looking at me, and I don't know what it is. This case has dealt with metaphysics, with questions best left to saints and philosophers. I'm neither competent nor qualified to answer those. I've got to make a ruling, to try to speak to the future. Is Data a machine? Yes. Is he the property of Starfleet? No. We have all been dancing around the basic issue. Does Data have a soul? I don't know that he has. I don't know that I have. But I have got to give him the freedom to explore that question himself. It is the ruling of this court that Lieutenant Commander Data has the freedom to choose.
I formally refuse to undergo your procedure.
I will cancel that transfer order.
Thank you. And, Commander, continue your work. When you are ready, I will still be here. I find some of what you propose intriguing.
He's remarkable.
You didn't call him it.
You see? Sometimes it does work.
Phillipa. Dinner?
You buying?
Sir, there is a celebration on the Holodeck.
I have no right to be there.
Because you failed in your task?
No, God, no. I came that close to winning, Data.
Yes, sir.
I almost cost you your life!
Is it not true that had you refused to prosecute, Captain Louvois would have ruled summarily against me?
Yes.
That action injured you, and saved me. I will not forget it.
You're a wise man, my friend.
Not yet, sir. But with your help, I am learning.
Ro!
Welcome home.
Thanks. It's good to be back.
Congratulations on your promotion, Lieutenant.
Same to you, Commander.
Thank you.
Say, I understand that Advanced Tactical Training is a real picnic.
Right.
Did you see the buffet?
This is real Bajoran foraiga.
It wasn't easy to find.
You shouldn't have gone to all this trouble. Really.
We wanted you to know how glad we are to have you back.
So, where are your new quarters?
Deck four, section eight.
What are do you planning to do
Lieutenant Ro.
Go ahead, sir.
Please report to the Bridge.
Yes, sir. Excuse me.
Captain.
You seemed a bit overwhelmed by all the attention.
Well, to tell you the truth, I really want to see everyone. I'd just rather do it one at a time.
You look very fit, Lieutenant. Tactical Training seems to agree with you.
You know me, I enjoy a challenge.
That school is more than a challenge. Half the class washes out every year. But somehow I didn't think you'd be one of those.
Captain, I want you to know that I really appreciate your recommending me. If it weren't for you, my life would be a very different one right now.
Bridge to Picard.
Go ahead.
We're receiving a distress signal from a Cardassian ship near the Demilitarised Zone.
Change course to intercept. I'm on my way. I'd like you at the conn, Lieutenant.
Ensign Gates.
Report.
The Cardassian ship relayed a distress signal but it was cut off before we could find out what was wrong.
I have the ship on long range sensors. It appears to be under attack by several small ships.
Can you identify them?
No, sir. They're not transmitting identification codes.
I will scan their warp signatures. Sir, sensors indicate the attacking vessels are Federation ships.
We're coming into visual range.
On screen.
Those are Federation ships.
Isolate one and magnify. The Maquis. Open a channel.
Open.
To all Maquis ships. Call off your attack or we will be forced to engage you.
No response.
You are Federation citizens. Your actions are in violation of our treaty with the Cardassians. Call off your attack.
They are not responding, sir.
Mister Worf, are we in firing range?
Not yet, sir.
Arm phasers and photon torpedoes and stand by.
I never thought we'd be firing on our own people to protect a Cardassian ship.
The Maquis ships are regrouping, sir. They are closing in on the Cardassian vessel.
The Cardassian's shields are down to thirty percent.
They may not be able to withstand another hit.
Sir, we are within weapons range.
Mister Worf, can you detonate a torpedo spread between the Maquis ships and the Cardassians?
Yes, sir.
Do it.
The Maquis are breaking formation. They are withdrawing.
Signal the Cardassians that we're standing by to assist them if they have any wounded.
Aye, sir.
GUL EVEK:Do you people have experience treating Cardassians?
Yes. Do you mind?
Gul Evek. I'm sorry that we could not come to your aid sooner.
GUL EVEK:I suppose we're lucky you came at all. Lately Starfleet seems to look the other way when the Maquis attack.
I can assure you that is not the case. We're doing everything in our power to control them.
GUL EVEK:The fact that my ship was attacked suggests that your efforts have met with limited success. They came at us with photon torpedoes and type eight phasers. Tell me, Captain, how do you suppose that a group of civilians acquired such weaponry?
I can assure you it was not through official channels.
GUL EVEK:So you don't think the fact that some of the Maquis are former Starfleet officers has anything to do with it?
Starfleet does not condone the Maquis' actions in the Demilitarised Zone any more than your government would condone the paramilitary actions of Cardassian civilians.
GUL EVEK:We have taken measures to deal with our colonists who have armed themselves.
Considering that they destroyed a Juhryan freighter less than a week ago, I would say that your efforts are meeting with limited success.
GUL EVEK:Captain, if the Maquis are not stopped, this situation will continue to escalate to the point where the Cardassian military will have no choice but to take matters into their own hands.
Captain's log, supplemental. Gul Evek and his crew have left the Enterprise, and we have proceeded to our rendezvous with Admiral Nechayev.
No Bularian canaps this time, Captain?
I thought twice was pushing it a little.
It's just as well. They're extremely fattening.
You missed Gul Evek by a matter of hours. I asked him to stay. I thought that an Admiral's assurances might convince him that we are trying to deal with this Maquis situation.
Evek manages to make the Cardassians sound like helpless sheep being preyed on by Federation wolves. The truth is, we caught the Cardassian government supplying its colonies in the Demilitarised Zone with weapons.
Gul Evek assured me that they had stopped that practice.
Ha. How comforting.
Admiral, this Maquis situation has you worried.
Believe me, Captain, if I were living that close to the Cardassians, I'd keep a phaser under my pillow too. But in the last weeks we've seen signs that the Maquis are moving beyond self-defence. Their ranks are growing. They're acquiring ships, weapons. They seem to be preparing for a more aggressive military posture. We've got to put a stop to them before the entire Demilitarised Zone ignites. But before we stop them, we have to find them. They seem to be scattered in small cells around the Zone. And we don't have reliable intelligence about any of them.
Perhaps you need an undercover operative.
Our thinking exactly. We intend to infiltrate their organisation, and the person we want to do it is aboard your ship right now.
Starfleet wants me to infiltrate the Maquis?
Because of your recent training, because you're Bajoran, and because of your past troubles with Starfleet gives you a certain credibility.
Well, that's certainly true. And just how soon would this mission begin?
Immediately.
I see. I've spent the better part of my life fighting the Cardassians. I never thought I'd be helping them out.
This is a rare case when our interests and theirs coincide. We both want peace in the Demilitarised Zone.
I've heard a lot about the Maquis. One of my instructors at Tactical Training, a Lieutenant Commander in Starfleet, a man I admired and respected, he was sympathetic to them. He resigned and left to join them.
We're all sympathetic, Lieutenant. Our civilian population in the Demilitarised Zone is in a very difficult situation, but even sympathy has to end at some point. The peace treaty isn't just a piece of paper. If the Maquis force us into a war with Cardassia, it could mean hundreds of thousands of lives. Two years ago, Starfleet would never have tapped you for this mission. They must have a lot of confidence in you now.
The way I see it, there's one good reason to take this mission, and that's to validate your faith in me.
We are looking for a Bajoran woman, dark hair.
She is responsible for the death of a Cardassian soldier.
If we learn that she has been here, this establishment will be closed down.
You say she had dark hair?
Yes.
She was here. You just missed her.
Do you know where she went?
No.
It was really nice meeting you.
Thanks.
So, did you kill that Cardassian?
Starfleet thinks I did. That's reason enough to hide. Why did you tell them that I'd left?
There are worse things a person can do than kill a Cardassian soldier.
You don't often meet someone willing to say that out loud.
In the Zone, there are a lot of us who feel that way.
I'd like to meet people like that.
Don't be afraid. You're not in danger here.
What is your name?
Did you kill that Cardassian soldier?
Who are you?
We're the people who saved you from Starfleet.
Thanks, but I'll be going now.
Did you kill that Cardassian?
Yes.
That's a risky thing to do in the Demilitarised Zone. You can end up being hunted by Starfleet and the Cardassians.
Then why did he risk bringing me here?
We're asking the questions. Who are you?
My name is Ro Laren. I grew up in the Bajoran camps.
That would explain why you have no love for Cardassians.
I know what they're capable of. They tortured my father to death and I was forced to watch.
Where are you living now?
Nowhere. I was a Starfleet officer, but I was court-martialled and sent to the stockade on Jaros Two. I'm not exactly what you'd call Starfleet material.
When were you on Jaros?
What difference does it make?
We want to check your story. When were you there?
Starfleet let me out about three years ago because I agreed to do some work for them, mostly having to do with Bajor. But I got tired of watching them placate the Cardassians, and so I left.
You resigned?
Not officially. That's part of the reason why they're looking for me.
What were you doing on Omara?
Look, I think I've answered enough of your questions. I would like to know who you people are.
Let's say that we sympathise with those who oppose Cardassia.
Are you Maquis?
What if we were?
If you were, I would ask if I could join you and help you fight.
We'll check your story. Go ahead, I'll keep an eye on her.
Come, let's stretch our legs.
Aren't you taking a chance by letting me see all of this? What if my story doesn't check out? What if I'm not who I say I am?
Well, then we'll have a problem, won't we?
You are Maquis, aren't you?
Many of the people here are.
Starfleet considers you outlaws. They're afraid you'll destroy the peace treaty.
They don't understand the situation here in the Zone. I lived on Juhraya. When the treaty was signed the colony suddenly found itself in Cardassian territory. Some of us chose to stay, take our chances. Then one night I was dragged from my bed and beaten. The authorities clucked their tongues and agreed it was an unfortunate incident, and did nothing.
I'm not surprised. The Cardassians intend to make life so unpleasant for Federation citizens that they'll leave.
Exactly. And no one seems to see that, except the Maquis. How old were you when your father was killed?
I'd rather not talk about it.
Hungry? Would you like something?
No, thank you.
Hasperat.
You like hasperat?
An old Bajoran friend of mine used to make it. His was stronger. He was killed many years ago fighting the Cardassian occupation of Bajor. I miss his company, and his hasperat.
My father used to make the strongest hasperat you've ever tasted. Everything else seems mild by comparison.
Did he teach you how to make it?
Yes. But I haven't tried it in years.
If you would make the brine for a really strong hasperat. I mean eye watering, tongue searing strong, you'd make an old man very happy.
I would enjoy making it again.
Macias. I've checked with my sources at Starfleet. Her story's true.
I was sure it was. Kalita, she'll stay with you until we can find her a room.
Ah there you are.
We've just heard a disturbing rumour.
Another rumour?
One that I think we should take seriously. A trader coming from Pendi Two said he could verify that the Cardassians are going to start supplying their colonists with biogenic weapons.
I thought every shipment coming into the Zone was searched.
The Cardassians always seem to find a way around problems like that.
Then we have to make a preemptive strike. Send a message to the Cardassians that we won't sit still while they kill us with toxins.
Agreed. But we can't mount a strike without medical supplies and our stockpile is dangerously low.
If we put in a request for more, it'll draw suspicion.
I can get medical supplies. I served on the Enterprise. They always have extra medkits on hand for relief missions.
You're wanted by Starfleet. They're not going to give you medkits just because you ask for them.
I have no intention of asking for them. I intend to take them.
How? The Enterprise is a fortress.
I know its security systems work. Give me a ship. I can do it.
It's madness.
We can't let her do something like this. We don't know anything about her.
I know that she can make very strong hasperat.
What?
We need medical supplies. I think we should let her try.
All right. But I'm going with her.
I could use an extra hand at the controls. And a witness.
I set the transporter confinement parameters to maximum. We should be able to fill our hold with medical supplies with just one single beam out.
I had no idea it was going to be so easy.
We're approaching the Federation border.
How do you plan to get out of the Demilitarised Zone without being searched at one of the checkpoints?
We're going to cross the border here.
There are sensor buoys all along the border. If we cross anywhere other than a checkpoint, Starfleet will send a ship to investigate.
With the right security codes, we can disable the proximity detectors on the buoys.
Starfleet changes those codes all the time.
I know the encryption algorithms. If I can access the buoy's protocol subsystem I should be able to figure out the codes.
Should be able to?
Do you want this mission to succeed?
Of course I do. We need those medical supplies.
In that case, let me do my job. I'm in.
What's wrong?
If I don't input the right code in the next twenty seconds, we'll trigger the proximity alarm.
I'm getting us out of sensor range.
Don't. If we break the comm. link, we won't be able to try again.
It worked. Until they change the access codes again, we can cross the border here.
Captain's log, stardate 47943.2. It has been over a week since Lieutenant Ro left the Enterprise. We have yet to receive any communication from her.
We picked up a request for emergency assistance from a Federation science ship in the Topin system.
Are there any other ships in the vicinity?
We're the closest.
Helm, set course for the Topin system. Mister Data, will you signal the science ship that we're on our way.
It is unlikely that they would receive our communication, sir. The Topin system contains an unstable protostar. It generates significant magnetoscopic interference.
Can we use our sensors to find them?
Most of our sensors would be ineffective, although our directional array should cut through the interference.
That array has such a narrow scan field. We might as well break out the palm beacons and try to find them that way.
This is insane. We're sitting here, no sensors, blind to the outside, waiting for a galaxy class Starship to come swooping down on us.
Don't worry. It'll be hard for them to locate us with just the directional sensors. Besides, they're looking for a damaged science ship that wants to be found. They're here. Standby to engage thrusters.
Anything?
No, sir. It will take approximately six hours to scan this system.
Captain, the distress call is being repeated.
Data, can you locate the signal?
I am attempting to do so.
They're scanning our last position.
All right, I've locked onto their sensor beam. I'm going to use it to manoeuvre into transporter range.
How are we going to beam through their shields?
We can't. If we're going to get those medical supplies, we're going to have to take this ship through their shields.
Sir, I am scanning the area from which the distress signal was sent, but I am unable to detect a vessel.
Captain, the computer has detected a piggyback communication on the last distress signal.
Can you decode it?
It will take a few moments.
Do it.
The Enterprise shields have a weak point. When the ship is at impulse, the thrust destabilises the shield configuration right at this point.  I'm going to try to punch through there.
Won't they detect us?
They'll know something's penetrated the shields. With all the interference it'll take them a few seconds to find us. We'll have to beam the medical supplies aboard and get out fast.
The message is difficult to decode. Interference has garbled much of the transmission, but it seems to be from Lieutenant Ro.
Ro is on that ship?
Sir, a vessel of some kind is attempting to penetrate our aft shields.
Let it through.
We're going to make it. All right, we're in.
Energising.
Let's get out of here.
Captain, a quantity of medical supplies was beamed from cargo bay seven.
The vessel that penetrated our shields is of the same design as the ships used by the Maquis. It is moving off.
Let it go. There must be someone with her. We should make it look as though we're trying to stop them. Mister Worf, lock phasers on their previous position and fire.
Aye, sir.
Now we know what they mean by Advanced Tactical Training.
You took your ship through their shields?
Ro parked us between their warp nacelles. I thought she was crazy, but it worked. She knew exactly what she was doing.
Well done.
I have to inventory supplies and find out what we have.
See you later.
Well, it seems that Kalita has decided you're not a Federation spy after all. She's suspicious of everyone at first. And rightly so. We've learned to be cautious with strangers.
I understand.
But I've known since I first met you that in your heart, you're one of us.
Captain's log, supplemental. Having earned the Maquis' trust with her raid on the Enterprise, Lieutenant Ro has been given access to a ship and allowed to leave the settlement by herself.
There are rumours that the Cardassians are supplying their colonists with biogenic weapons.
Frankly, I find it hard to believe. Every ship that enters the Demilitarised Zone is being searched.
The Maquis are convinced that the Cardassians are finding a way around these searches.
You know, we could make use of that.
Sir?
We have come up with a plan that has the potential to seriously curtail the Maquis. We want to give them a target so threatening to them that they'll be willing to commit as many ships and people as possible in order to destroy it.
What do you mean, give them a target?
Biogenic weapons, for example. You could provide them with intelligence that would show that the Cardassians are, in fact, supplying their colonists with them.
That would get their attention, all right.
You could tell them that in order to get past the check points, they're shipping the components for these weapons through third parties, and then we could put together a convoy and send it toward the Demilitarised Zone.
And when the Maquis attack it, Starfleet will be waiting for them.
We could station our ships in the Hugora Nebula to avoid detection.
Basically, I would be leading them into a trap.
That's right. If you have a problem with any of this, I need to know it now.
Well, if I do, sir, it will not stop me from carrying out my duty.
I knew that I could count on you.
It took me a while, but I managed to patch through into Starfleet's comm. system. I intercepted a communication from one of the checkpoints on the border. They're concerned because a Pakled transport came through carrying retro-viral vaccines.
Why is that a concern?
Well, last week a Ferengi transport came through carrying biomimetic gels. By themselves, neither of these is dangerous, but Starfleet is concerned because with along with other components the Cardassians could put together a biogenic device.
What is Starfleet going to do about it?
They can't do anything about it. These items are all perfectly legal.
How close are the Cardassians to having the components they need?
Very close. Two days ago, a Yridian convoy left Deep Space Nine for the Demilitarised Zone. It's carrying isomiotic hypos, plasma flares and quarantine pods.
We can't let that convoy reach its destination.
But it's too big for us to go after alone.
I'll discuss the situation with the other cell leaders. Considering what's at stake, they'll want to help.
I've sent a communication to the others. When this is over, we'll celebrate.
When it's over?
When Cardassia realises they can't intimidate us into leaving our colonies.
Something tells me it'll be a long time before we'll be celebrating.
Don't be discouraged, Ro. It'll take time, but the important thing is that we not give up.
I spent ten years in the camps. I don't give up.
I've been thinking a long time about what our celebration will be like. We'll have a huge dinner. You'll make hasperat and I'll make blueberry pie. We'll drink wine and we'll dance. I'll even play the belaklavion. That'll give everyone a laugh.
You play the klavion?
Yes, badly. It's a difficult instrument, but I enjoy the challenge.
My father played the klavion. When I was very young and afraid of monsters under my bed, he'd play for me. He said that the klavion had special powers. Monsters were afraid of it and when they heard it they would disappear. When I listened to that music he played for me I was never afraid to go to sleep. When he died I realised even he couldn't make all the monsters go away.
Why wait? Let's go to the market. Let's get food for a feast, for a celebration.
A celebration of what?
Of absolutely nothing. Just to celebrate.
I'd like that.
Come, let's go to the market. If I'm going to make a pie, we'll have to find a substitute for blueberries. Haven't seen real ones in years.
On Bajor, there's a berry
Yes, I know it, very sweet.
Ro!
Macias?
They must have found out that there was a Maquis cell here.
Kalita, get one of the medkits. Hurry. You have to hang on.
When an old fighter like me dies someone always steps forward to take his place.
Not tonight.  Hello. Are you alone?
I hope not.
Why don't we get acquainted? There's a table in the back that's more private.
I'd like that.
We have to cancel the mission.
Why?
The Maquis didn't go for the bait. They think the convoy is too big a target.
But there are only six ships. We could even cut back that number.
It's the commitment of resources, of grouping so many of the Maquis together at once. They feel that it makes them too vulnerable.
Every intelligence report that I get from Starfleet suggests that the Maquis are eager to expand their strikes, they want to escalate their activities. Now you're telling me this isn't true?
It's probably different in every cell. The people I've met tend to be more conservative. I'm sure others have a more militant attitude.
Laren, what's going on?
Do you have the money I asked you to bring?
Yes.
Put some on the table.
What?
By this time, you should be negotiating my price. When you sent me on this mission, I thought that I could do it. Even though it meant helping Cardassians, even though it meant betraying people who are fighting against them. Now I'm not sure where I stand.
Are you saying you want to back out of this mission?
Sir, I don't want to let you down, I swear that I don't.
This has nothing to do with me. This is about you. If you back out now, you'll throw away everything you've worked for. We're committed to this mission. My only question for you is, can you carry out your orders? I could put you before a board of inquiry for having lied to me about this operation. I would certainly have you court-martialled if you sabotage it. Now, it's your decision.
I'll carry out my orders, sir.
I feel it necessary to have Commander Riker go back with you. He can pose as a relative. I just want to make sure that nothing happens to obstruct this mission.
I'm sorry. I don't have that kind of money.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have received word from Commander Riker and Lieutenant Ro that the Maquis will be attacking the convoy as planned. Our ships have taken up position in the Hugora Nebula to wait for them.
I have established a relay link with the sensor probe we left on the perimeter of the Nebula. This is the convoy. We are expecting the Maquis attack force to cross the border from the Demilitarised Zone.
As soon as they cross the border, we'll intercept them.
Captain, in order to ensure that the ship Commander Riker and Lieutenant Ro are piloting does not come under fire, I have relayed their warp signature to the rest of the attack force.
Sir, the Maquis squadron is coming into sensor range.
Go to Red alert.
Aye, sir.
Squad leader to all ships.
Go ahead, squad leader.
We'll be crossing the border in less than one minute. Arm your weapons.
Acknowledged.
Starfleet can't make its move until we're out of the Demilitarised Zone. We're to break formation and take cover in the Nebula as soon as they appear.
The ships in the convoy are raising their shields. They've spotted us.
We cross the border in thirty seconds.
What the?
I'm sorry. I can't let this happen.
Sir, the vessel being piloted by Lieutenant Ro is firing a low intensity particle beam into the nebula.
What the hell is she doing?
The polarising effect being created by the beam may make it possible for us to be detected.
Can you counter the effect?
I will attempt to do so.
Ro, why are you firing?
Scan the nebula.
There's a Starfleet attack force hiding inside it.
I see it! Squad leader to all ships. Abort the mission. Repeat, abort the mission.
Sir, the Maquis ships are breaking formation.
Have they crossed the border?
No, sir. They are withdrawing.
Captain, Lieutenant Ro's ship is not retreating with the others. It is heading toward us.
When she comes aboard take her into custody.
Alpha Seven to Alpha Nine.
Go ahead.
Stand by to beam me aboard.
Standing by.
You can take this ship back to the Enterprise.
You're going with them?
It's been a long time since I really felt like I really belonged somewhere. Could you tell Captain Picard something for me?
Of course. What is it?
Tell him I'm sorry.
So long, Ro. Take care of yourself.
Goodbye, Will. Energise.
She seemed very sure that she was making the right choice. I think her only real regret was that she let you down. Here's my report.
Deflector power approaching maximum limits. Energy discharge in six seconds.
Firing, sir.
The Borg ship is undamaged.
Impossible.
Warning. Warp reactor core primary coolant failure.
Can't maintain it much longer, Commander.
Warning. Exceeding reaction chamber thermal limit.
Cease fire.
Shutting down warp engines.
They couldn't have adapted that quickly.
The knowledge and experience of the human Picard is part of us now. It has prepared us for all possible courses of action. Your resistance is hopeless, Number One.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 44001.4. The Borg ship has resumed its course toward Earth. We are unable to pursue pending repairs to the Enterprise.
As we anticipated, the blast burned out our main navigational deflector. We also have damage to our shields and our reactor core.
We should be back up in eight to twelve hours, Admiral.
Well, we'll miss you at the party.
The Enterprise'll be there, sir. Maybe a little late, but we'll be there, sir.
Your engagements have given us valuable time. We've mobilised a fleet of forty starships at Wolf three five nine, and that's just for starters. The Klingons are sending warships. Hell, we've even thought about opening communications with the Romulans.
You realise, Admiral, that with the assistance of Captain Picard, the Borg will be prepared for your defences.
Lieutenant a few years ago, I watched a freshman cadet pass four upper classman on the last hill of the forty kilometre run on Danula Two. The damndest thing I ever saw. The only freshman to ever win the Academy marathon. I made it my business to get to know that young fellow. I got to know him very, very well. And I'll tell you something. I never met anyone with more drive, determination or more courage than Jean-Luc Picard. There is no way in hell that he would assist the Borg. I want that clear.
Of course, Admiral.
He is a casualty of war.
Then we have abandoned all hope of recovering him.
In less than twenty four hours, this armada's going to hit that Borg vessel with everything we can muster. Either they survive or we do. As for Picard. A great man has been lost. Your Captain. My friend. Commander Riker, I hereby promote you to the field commission of Captain. The Enterprise is your ship now. Congratulations. I wish the circumstances were different.
Likewise. Good luck, Admiral.
To us all.
Mister Crusher suggests we might design a chip that would automatically retune the phasers to a random setting after each discharge. Engineering.
That would be a great advantage.
We should also see if there's some way that we can neutralise their forcefields. We've got to let them know that we can adapt too, Mister Worf. We're no longer just fighting the Borg, we're fighting the life experience they've stolen from Captain Picard. Now how the hell do we defeat an enemy that knows us better than we know ourselves?
The Borg have neither honour nor courage. That is our greatest advantage.
I hope it's enough.
Accelerator coils are responding normally.
Excellent. Forward shields at fifty eight percent. Aft shields sensors must be down
Checking. Sensors are fine. No. Aft shields have completely failed. Damn it. Auxiliary generators are out again.
Just the man I need. We're having some problems with the aft shields. Generators going on and offline. I could really use your help, Worf
How soon do we get underway, Geordi?
Still a couple hours. Commander Shelby can fill you in.
The main navigational deflector is functional again. Sherbourne and Barclay are running through the final testing sequence now.
The warp reactor core?
Reconstruction is proceeding normally. It's slow work. If we can nail down this shield generator problem, I agree with La Forge. We should be at operating capacity in two to three hours.
Good.
Anything else, sir?
Yes. You did a good job on the Borg ship.
I didn't get Picard.
You stopped them. You gave us our shot.
Sir, I
Commander, we don't have to like each other to work well together. As a fact of fact, I'd like you to continue to keep me on my toes.
Some might define that as the role of a first officer.
Damn, you are ambitious, aren't you, Shelby.
Captain Riker, based on our past relationship, there's no reason for me to expect to become your first officer except you need me. I know how to get things done, and I have the expertise in the Borg.
And you have a lot to learn, Commander.
Yes, sir.
Almost as much as I had to learn when I came aboard as Captain Picard's first officer. A fact he reminded me of when I commented on what a pain in the neck you are.
Yes, sir.
Data to Riker. Message from Starfleet, Captain.
Go ahead, Data.
Starfleet reports
It has engaged the Borg at Wolf three fifty nine, sir.
Admiral Hanson on subspace, Captain.
On screen. Admiral?
The fight does not go well, Enterprise. We're attempting to withdraw and regroup. Rendezvous with fleet
Captain's Log, stardate 44002.3. Repairs are complete, and the Enterprise is warping to rendezvous with Starfleet at Wolf three five nine. Communications from the site of battle have been cut off, possibly by Borg interference.
Lieutenant Worf, everyone in this room shares my respect for your service to this ship. But right now, I need your experience at tactical. Commander Data, I realise your very nature omits ambition. Nevertheless, I want you to know I seriously considered you first officer.
Thank you, sir.
But this is not the time for change. I need you all where you are, where Captain Picard always relied on you. I have been, reluctantly, forced to conclude that Commander Shelby, our expert on the Borg, is an ideal choice at this time for first officer. Based on our latest communication, we can assume that the Borg survived the fleet's attack. Your thoughts on our next encounter?
What about the heavy graviton beam we were talking about?
I've gone over it four times. The local field distortion just wouldn't be strong enough to incapacitate them.
Doctor Crusher and I have been working on an interesting premise.
With our recent experience in nanotechnology, we might be able to introduce a destructive breed of nanites into the Borg.
Nanites?
Robots small enough to enter living cells.
How long would it take to execute that?
That's the problem. Two to three weeks.
In two or three weeks, nanites may be all that's left of the Federation.
We have the new phaser adapters.
maybe in concert with photon torpedoes we can slow them down.
I'm sure Captain Picard would have something meaningful and inspirational to say right now. To tell you the truth, I wish he were here, because I'd like to hear it too. I know how difficult this transition has been for all of you. I can take over for him, but I could never replace Captain Picard. Nor would I ever try. Whatever the outcome, I'm sure our efforts in the coming battle will justify his faith in all of us. Dismissed.
What would you do?
Come.
May I speak to you, Captain?
Actually, Guinan, I
You know, Picard and I used to talk every now and again, when one of us needed to. I guess I'm just used to having the Captain's ear.
What's on your mind?
I've heard a lot of people talking down in Ten Forward. They expect to be dead in the next day or so. They trust you. They like you. But they don't believe anyone can save them.
I'm not sure anyone can.
When a man is convinced he's going to die tomorrow, he'll probably find a way to make it happen. The only one who can turn is around is you.
I'll do the best I can.
You're going have to do something you don't want to do. You have to let go of Picard.
Maybe you haven't heard. I tried to kill him yesterday.
You tried to kill whatever that is on the Borg ship. Not Picard. Picard is still here with us in this room. If he had died, it would be easier. But he didn't They took him from us a piece at a time. Did he ever tell you why we're so close?
No.
Well, then let me just our relationship is beyond friendship, beyond family. And I will let him go. And you must do the same. There can only be one Captain.
It's not that simple. This was his crew. He wrote the book on this ship.
And the Borg know everything he knows. It's time to throw that book away. You must let him go, Riker. It's the only way to beat him. The only way to save him. And that is now you chair. Captain.
We're approaching the Wolf system, Captain.
On my way.
Slow to impulse. Take us to the battle coordinates, Mister Crusher. Yellow alert.
Sensors are picking up several vessels, Captain.
The fleet?
No active subspace fields. Negligible power readings.
Life signs?
Negative, sir.
Visual contact.
On screen.
The Tolstoy, the Kyushu, the Melbourne.
Sir, sensors are picking up unusually strong eddy currents, bearing two zero zero, mark two one one.
Data, analysis?
It could indicate the course of the Borg ship, sir.
Ensign Crusher, set in a course that follows those currents. Commander Shelby, prepare to initiate your plan to separate the saucer section when we find the Borg.
Sir. I must remind you that Captain Picard was briefed on that plan. The Borg will be prepared for it
I'm aware of that, Commander. In fact, I'm counting on it.
Crusher, Cartaino, Gleason. Report to the Battle Bridge.
Mister Data, Mister Worf? I have a special mission for you.
Locutus of Borg, this is Captain William T. Riker of the USS Enterprise.
You may speak.
We wish to end the hostilities.
Then you must unconditionally surrender.
We are prepared to meet to discuss your terms.
It is unlikely you are prepared to discuss terms. It is more likely that this is an attempt at deception.
Come now, Locutus. If Picard's knowledge and experience is part of you, then you know I've never lied to him. You should also implicitly trust me, is that not so?
Picard implicitly trusted you.
Then trust me now. Meet to discuss terms.
Discussion is irrelevant. There are no terms. You will disarm all your weapons and escort us to Sector zero zero one where we will begin assimilating your culture and technology.
Mister Gleason, can you pinpoint the source of the Borg transmission?
I can put you within thirty meters of it, sir.
O'Brien, report.
O'BRIEN:The Borg have adapted their electromagnetic field to prevent main transporter functions, sir.
As expected. Mister Data, Mister Worf, proceed as we discussed.
Aye, Captain.
Channel open, sir.
We would like time to prepare our people for assimilation.
Preparation is irrelevant. Your people will be assimilated as easily as Picard has been. Your attempt at a delay will not be successful, Number One. We will proceed to Earth, and if you attempt to intervene, we will destroy you.
Then take your best shot, Locutus, because we're about to intervene.
Channel closed.
Reset subspace communications. Scrambler code, Riker One
Scrambler code, Riker One. Acknowledged.
Shelby, report.
Ready for separation.
Make it so.
Auto-sep sequence initiated.
Docking latches clear, separation complete.
Saucer velocity one hundred metres per second and increasing, sir.
Open fire, all weapons.
Fire.
Borg tractor beam attempting to lock on, sir.
Evasive manoeuvres, pattern Riker Alpha.
Riker Alpha confirmed. They're ignoring the saucer section completely.
Just as you should, Captain. Ensign, evasive pattern, Riker Beta.
Riker Beta confirmed.
Proceed to second phase, Commander Shelby.
Acknowledged. Fire antimatter spread.
Shuttle launch sequence confirmed. Departing Enterprise in exactly three seconds.
The Borg tractor beam has moved toward the antimatter spread.
They might be picking up engine ionisation from the shuttle
Data, cut your engines. Take her in unpowered.
Shuttle has penetrated the Borg electromagnetic field.
Understood.
The shuttle escape transporter should provide enough power to beam us
Onto the Borg ship from here, sir
Proceed.
Data!
Mission accomplished. We have him.
Firing shuttle thrusters.
They're clear of the Borg field, sir.
Beam them out of there, Mister O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Locked in
O'BRIEN:Transport successful, sir.
Captain, we've sustained damage to the impulse drive.
The saucer section is disabled.
Reading subspace field fluctuations from the Borg ship. Looks like they're getting ready to increase power.
Stand by, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
The saucer section's a sitting duck.
Prepare to draw their fire.
Captain, the Borg ship is moving away. It's resuming its course to Earth, sir.
Rendezvous with the saucer section. Lay in a course of pursuit.
There is extensive infiltration of microcircuit fibers into the surrounding tissue. His DNA is being rewritten.
Can you revive him?
I'd like more time to study the structural changes in the motor pathways.
We don't have more time, Doctor. Once he was wired into the Borg, they knew everything that he knew. I just hope it goes both ways. If we're lucky, he had access to everything we need to know about them, especially their vulnerabilities.
Jean Luc? It's Beverly. can you hear me?
Beverly. Crusher. Doctor.
Yes. Don't try to move.
I am on board the Enterprise.
That's right.
A futile manoeuvre. Incorrect strategy, Number One. To risk your ship and crew to retrieve only one man. Picard would never have approved. You underestimate us if you believe this abduction is any concern. There is no need for apprehension. I intend no harm. No harm. I will continue, aboard this ship, to speak for the Borg, while they continue without further diversion to Sector zero zero one, where they will force your unconditional surrender.
Using multimodal reflection sorting, I have been able to detect a complex series of subspace signals between Locutus and the Borg ship.
That's how they're controlling him?
It is not just a matter of control, Doctor. The signals are interactive across a subspace domain similar to that of a Transporter beam. I would hypothesise that these frequencies form the basis of the Borg's collective consciousness.
Can't we block them?
Possibly. But as you may recall on several occasions, we have witnessed the Borg removing key circuits from injured comrades, no doubt separating them from the group consciousness.
The injured Borg immediately self-destructed.
That is correct, sir.
Cutting the link to Locutus might be fatal to the Captain.
We have to find a way to reach him. We must know what he knows
Without these interactive signals, it would only be a matter of microsurgery. I could do it. But as long as those Borg implants are functioning, there's no way I can separate the man from the machine.
Then perhaps there is a way I can access the machine, Doctor.
Worf. Klingon species. A warrior race. You too will be assimilated.
The Klingon Empire will never yield.
Why do you resist? We only wish to raise quality of life for all species.
I like my species the way it is.
A narrow vision. You will become one with the Borg. You will all become one with the Borg. The android, Data. Primitive artificial organism. You will be obsolete in the new order.
Take him to your lab, Data.
Shelby to Riker.
Go ahead.
Captain, the Borg have entered Sector zero zero one.
The Borg have dropped out of warp, sir. Jupiter outpost nine two reported visual contact at twelve hundred hours, thirteen minutes.
Planetary defences?
Responding. No reports on effectiveness but I can't believe that against the Borg
Ensign Crusher, at their current speed, when will they reach Earth?
Twenty seven minutes.
The soonest we could intercept?
Forty two minutes, sir.
Riker to Data.
What's your status?
The initial cybernetic connection into Captain Picard's neural net pathways has been established. Mister O'Brien is ready to process the Borg signal through the transport pattern buffer.
Make it so. With dispatch, Mister Data.
Proceeding immediately, sir. Data out.
The neural link will be established in three stages. Doctor, I suggest you closely observe Captain Picard's lifesigns, while at each stage Chief O'Brien monitors my positronic matrix activity. Counsellor, hopefully, you will be able to determine whether I am reaching Captain Picard.
O'BRIEN:At what point should I shut it down if there's a problem?
I do not know. I have never done this before. Initiating first neural link.
The Captain's vital signs are stable.
O'BRIEN:Positronic activity unchanged.
First neural connection is confirmed. I cannot report any significant access to the Borg consciousness.
It is confirmed. The Borg have broken through the Mars defence perimeter.
Enterprise now approaching Terran system, sir.
Slow to impulse. Time to intercept?
Twenty-three minutes, fourteen seconds, sir.
Second neural connection is confirmed. I still cannot report any significant access. Proceeding with the final link.
Significant increase in premotor area and hypothalamus activity. His heartbeat is accelerating rapidly.
O'BRIEN:Sir, your submicron matrix activity is increasing exponentially.
Neural connections complete. I have access to the Borg subspace signals. Processing. Processing.
Data!
Stand by. Processing. Processing. Fascinating. The Borg group consciousness is divided into subcommands necessary to carry out all functions. Defence, communication, navigation. They are all controlled by a root command implanted into each
Data, I'm picking up increased neural activity in Captain Picard, localised in the prefrontal and parietal lobes.
O'BRIEN:The Borg might be trying to terminate their link with him.
Negative. The subspace signal configuration is unchanged. What is causing the increased neural activity is unclear.
No, it's not. It's him. It's Picard.
Troi to Bridge.
Data has made first contact with Captain Picard.
Can you communicate with him, Data?
I have been unable to create a neural path around the Borg implants, sir. It is Captain Picard himself who has somehow managed to initiate contact.
Sir, the Borg have halted their approach to Earth.
I think we got their attention.
Time to intercept?
Two minutes, four seconds, sir.
They're worried. They're worried because we've got access to Picard. Mister Data, we have two minutes to figure out what we can do with it.
Sir, it is clear the Borg are either unwilling or unable to terminate their subspace links.
That may be their Achilles heel, Captain. Their interdependency.
What do you mean, Doctor?
He's
Part of their collective consciousness now. Cutting him off would like asking one of us to disconnect an arm or a foot
We can't do it.
They operate as a single mind.
One jumps off a cliff, they all jump off? Data, is it possible to plant a command into the Borg collective consciousness?
It is conceivable, sir, but it would require altering the pathway from the root command
To affect all iterative branch points in the
Make every effort, Mister Data.
Sir
What command shall I try to plant?
Something straightforward, like disarm your weapons systems.
Visual contact with the Borg.
On screen.
Magnify.
Sensors reading increased power generation from the Borg.
Red alert. Load all torpedo bays. Ready phasers.
Aye, Captain.
Status of Borg weapons?
Their weapon systems are fully charged.
Data?
Attempting to re-route subcommand paths, Captain. Defence systems are protected by access barriers.
Borg attempting to lock on tractor beam.
Rotate shield frequencies. Data, report?
I am unable to penetrate defence systems command structure
Captain.
Try the power systems, Data. See if you can get them to power down.
Acknowledged.
Attempting new power subcommand path.
Shields have failed. They've
Locked on, sir. They're pulling us in.
Fire all weapons.
I cannot penetrate Borg power subcommand structure, sir.
All critical subcommands are protected, Captain.
Then it's over.
Mister Crusher, ready a collision course with the Borg ship. You heard me. A collision course.
Yes, sir.
Mister La Forge, prepare to go to warp power.
Aye, sir.
Sleep.
He's regaining consciousness.
Sleep.
It is Captain Picard speaking, not Locutus.
Sleep, Data.
He's exhausted.
Yes, Doctor, but if I may make a supposition, I do not believe his message was intended to express fatigue but to suggest a course of action.
Borg cutting beam activated.
Mister Crusher? Engage.
Data to Bridge. Stand by.
Stand by, all stations.
I am attempting to penetrate the Borg regenerative subcommand path. It is a low priority system and may be accessible.
Warning. Outer hull breach.
Sir, shall I execute evacuation sequence?
Negative, Mister Worf. Mister Data, your final report.
Stand by.
I can't, Mister Data.
Warning. Inner hull failure imminent on decks twenty three, twenty four, and twenty five. Decompression danger.
Mister Data, what the hell happened?
I successfully planted a command into the Borg collective consciousness, sir. It misdirected them to believe it was time to regenerate. In effect, I put them all to sleep.
To sleep?
Yes, sir.
Status of Borg power drive?
Minimal power.
Electromagnetic field?
Nonexistent.
Commander Shelby, take an away team and confirm that the Borg are asleep.
Delighted, sir. Mister Worf.
Shelby to Enterprise. It's true. They're all in a regeneration mode.
They're dormant, sir.
Any indication to how long we can keep them like this?
Checking.
Tricorder readings are fluctuating rapidly, Commander.
Shelby to Enterprise. There are indications here that their entire power net's about to feed back on itself. I'd say we're looking at a self-destruct sequence activated by the Borg's malfunction. Do you want us to attempt to disarm it?
Stand by.
There's no way to know what the destruction of the Borg ship will do to him.
We should also consider the advantages of further examination of the Borg and their vessel, sir.
I don't think so. Data, separate yourself from Captain Picard. Away Team, get yourselves home. Mister Crusher, upon their return move us to a safe position.
Aye, sir.
Life signs are stable. The DNA around the microcircuit fibre implants is returning to normal.
How do you feel?
Almost human. With just a bit of a headache.
We'll get you to Sickbay. We won't have any trouble getting these implants out now.
How much do you remember?
Everything. Including some brilliantly unorthodox strategy from a former first officer of mine.
And Earth Station McKinley has advised they're ready to begin refitting the Enterprise.
Have they estimated time for repairs?
Five or six weeks.
PICARD + RIKER:Come.
Request permission to disembark, sir.
Permission granted. They've picked a fine officer for the task force, Commander.
We'll have the fleet back up in less than a year. I imagine you'll get your choice of any Starfleet command, sir.
Everyone is so concerned about my next job. With all due respect, Commander, sir, my career plans are my own business, and no one else's. But it's nice to know I'll have a few options.
I hope I have the fortune of serving with you again, sir. Captain.
Course to Station McKinley ready and laid in, sir.
Make it so, Number One.
Commander, ship's sensors detect an abnormal energy reading in the Captain's quarters.
Type?
Undetermined.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Security team to Captain's quarters.
Picard to Enterprise. Anyone receiving this transmission, please respond.
Security override. Priority one.
PICARD 2:Is something the matter, Lieutenant?
It's all right, it's al right. I'm not going to hurt you.
Captain.
Picard, of the Enterprise.
Captain Picard. We studied your missions at the Academy Mitena Haro, first year cadet, Starfleet Academy.
Cadet Haro.
Perhaps you can explain what this is all about.
Unfortunately, I can't, Mister
Tholl. Kova Tholl, of Mizar Two.
Well, Mister Tholl, all I know is that I've been brought here against my will. Wherever here is.
The same thing happened to me, sir. I was alone, studying and I fainted. When I came to, it was about three days ago.
And you, sir?
I've been here twelve days, possibly more. I had been meditating privately and for no reason whatever, I lost consciousness.
What can you tell me about our captors?
Nothing. They've never shown themselves.
Four sleeping areas. That implies we may be joined by another captive.
It's edible, but I wouldn't call it food.
I wouldn't touch that.
Why not?
If it's the door lock, the combination's too complex to hit at random. I tried it and was punished.
Punished? How?
Severe pain. Some sort of energy beam. I won't get near that panel again.
Sir, the Hood has arrived at the rendezvous point. They are expecting us in thirty six hours.
PICARD 2:Thank you, Lieutenant. Mister Data, the nearest pulsar is in the Lonka cluster, is it not?
Correct, sir.
PICARD 2:What do we know about that pulsar?
A great deal, sir. It is a rotating neutron star of approximately four point three five six solar masses.
PICARD 2:Mister Crusher, how long would it take us to get there?
At warp seven, thirty four minutes.
PICARD 2:Mister Crusher make it so.
Sir?
PICARD 2:Set course for the Lonka pulsar. Warp two.
Aye, sir. Sir, at warp two we'll arrive at the pulsar in thirty one hours.
PICARD 2:Thank you, Ensign. Engage.
Aye, sir.
Will we be delaying our rendezvous with the Hood, sir?
PICARD 2:We may have to, Number One.
Lieutenant, contact the Hood and inform them of our delay.
Aye, Commander.
PICARD 2:Belay that order. There will be no further communication off this ship without my prior authorisation. Commander, may I have a word with you? Mister Data, you have the bridge.
Aye, sir.
PICARD 2:Number One, you know I like to keep you well informed as to the nature of our missions.
Yes, sir.
PICARD 2:And if I don't inform you there is a reason. I don't like keeping you in the dark, but for the next few days I may not be able to be as communicative as usual. It may make things difficult for you.
Don't worry about me, sir. I can handle it.
PICARD 2:And the crew?
You can count on all of us, sir.
PICARD 2:I appreciate that, Number One.
Picard, what are you doing?
Attempting to let our captors know that we possess intelligence.
You don't think they already know that? They can hear us talking.
Yes, but they may not realise that we're communicating through language.
Captain Picard is letting them know we comprehend mathematics by tapping out the first six prime numbers.
I know what he's doing. I'm trying to understand why.
It is imperative that we communicate with our abductors, find out what they want.
Obviously, they want us.
Obviously. But why? What made our captors choose us? What makes us special?
I couldn't say, Captain. I'm certainly not special. I am just one cadet.
What's your best area of study?
Impulse propulsion systems. I'm very good with field coils.
Good enough to be useful to our abductors?
I don't know. Maybe. But if they needed an engineer, sir, why didn't they take a real one? Why pick a Starfleet cadet?
That I can't answer. The Bolians are maintaining an uneasy truce with the Moropa, are they not?
That's right. But this doesn't look like Moropa technology and, even assuming the Moropa wanted me, what would they want with either of you?
I've never even heard of the Moropa. My race has no enemies.
None? In the last three hundred years of Mizarian history, your planet has been conquered six times!
And we've survived by not resisting. Mizarians value peace above confrontation.
Then you have no idea who might have done this.
No. I don't know of anyone who bears malice toward my race.
Or against you personally?
You can't mean to suggest that someone with a personal grudge against me has gone to all this trouble.
I'm not suggesting anything. I'm merely trying to come up with some explanation for your abduction.
I'm sorry, Picard. I can't give you one. I am neither important enough to hold for ransom nor radical enough to be dangerous. I'm a simple public servant.
Nevertheless, Mister Tholl
Stop! We mean you no harm. We are prisoners, like yourself. We are not the enemy.
Who has done this?
We don't know. We were brought here the same way you were. Our captors refuse to show themselves.
I don't trust you.
You must trust us. We wish only to return to our worlds. Were you abducted from Chalna?
You know my planet?
Oh, yes. I visited there twelve years ago, while commanding the Stargazer.
Five, and twenty.
Ouch.
If it's too rich, Geordi, fold.
I'm thinking, I'm thinking.
Enter.
PICARD 2:Counsellor, gentlemen. Forgive this intrusion. I was just passing by.
You are always welcome, Captain.
PICARD 2:I was wondering, Mister La Forge. What's our engine efficiency status?
Operating at ninety three percent, sir.
PICARD 2:That's very good, but I would like to increase the efficiency to ninety five percent.
No problem, Captain, I'll get right on it.
PICARD 2:That's not an order. You can get to it later. I don't want to disrupt your recreation.
No Captain, it's no problem. Lady Luck left me long ago.
Would you care to join us, Captain? We have an opening.
PICARD 2:I'd rather just observe, if you don't mind.
Not at all. Counsellor, twenty.
Pair of threes.
Flush. Queen high.
That beats my fours.
PICARD 2:Well played, Counsellor. May I have a word with you for just a moment?
Certainly, sir.
PICARD 2:Forgive me, gentlemen. I'll return your player to you in a moment.
PICARD 2:Counsellor, I wanted to ask you about the crew. How are they reacting to our sudden change in course?
I sense no unusual reaction, Captain. After all, such a change is hardly out of the ordinary.
PICARD 2:They're not curious or concerned as to why?
They're curious, yes. But concerned? No, they trust you.
PICARD 2:How far do you think that trust goes?
Sir?
PICARD 2:I know, Counsellor, that the crew has always had full confidence in me. But what if it were to change?
Well, I'd inform you, sir, of course.
PICARD 2:Thank you, Counsellor.
My given name is Esoqq. It means fighter.
I'll bet half the names in the Chalnoth language mean fighter.
Mizarians. Your names all mean surrender.
We are a peaceful race, a race of thinkers.
A race of cowards. And you? I don't know your people.
I am Mitena Haro, of Bolarus Nine.
Who would want to imprison a child?
I'm not a child.
Esoqq, I've been trying to determine if we have a common enemy. Someone with a reason for confining us here.
There are Chalnoth who would kill me if they could. But kidnap? There is no reason.
You have many enemies?
None of consequence. I've slain all the ones who mattered. That shocks you, Bolian?
A little.
And you?
I'm not surprised. I've heard about your race. You're uncivilised. You have no laws, no system of government
The Chalnoth have no use for laws or governments! We are strong. We obey no one.
You live in anarchy, murdering one another, That mentality may get us all killed.
And you may be the first.
Both of you. This is getting us nowhere.
Neither is asking us useless questions, Picard. But, if you must pursue the topic, How long have you and the Romulans been adversaries?
For quite a while, Mister Tholl. I am perfectly willing to entertain the hypothesis that our captors are Romulans. But what would the Romulans want with you?
My brainpower, perhaps. It's well known that my species possesses superior intelligence and I am considered among the brightest of my people.
And the least modest.
What is this?
Food.
The only food?
It would seem so.
Poison!
Does this mean there's nothing here for you to eat?
You.
Don't even think that! Picard, you won't let him
Esoqq, how long can you go without food?
Three days. Perhaps four.
No longer?
No longer.
Well, all your tests indicate the same results. You are in great shape.
PICARD 2:I never felt better.
I see. Then why did you come in? Your annual physical isn't due for another month.
PICARD 2:Well, usually you have to remind me, then badger me, and finally order me to report. For once I thought I'd save you the trouble.
Jean-Luc, be honest with your doctor. Are there any warning signs or symptoms that you haven't told me about?
PICARD 2:As far as I know, I'm perfectly healthy.
Well, then, return to your post.
PICARD 2:Will you have dinner with me tonight?
In Ten Forward?
PICARD 2:What about my quarters? More intimate.
Jean-Luc, you are full of surprises today.
PICARD 2:I take that to be a yes.
Picard is it wise to attempt an escape?
It's imperative.
Why? Our captors haven't mistreated us.
We've been kidnapped, locked in a room. You don't think that's mistreatment?
They haven't hurt us, have they? I think we should just wait until we find out what they want. Be patient.
We can no longer afford to be patient. Unless we act soon, Esoqq will starve.
If we antagonise them, they may decide we're more trouble than we're worth, kill us and go capture another four.
I agree that's a risk, but I see no alternative.
Well, I refuse to help.
As you wish, Mister Tholl. We must get inside this panel.
Not very sturdy.
Stand back, Haro.
The design is simple. Cross-circuiting the door mechanism should be easy.
Make it so.
Yes, sir.
I think I've got it.
I warned you.
Out with it, Jean-Luc.
PICARD 2:Out with what?
Whatever has been on your mind all evening long.
PICARD 2:Has it been that apparent? How well you know me.
After all this time, I ought to.
PICARD 2:Well, it's true, I have been preoccupied. I know that's not very flattering to you, but I have been thinking about us. And about the choices I've made.
We've both made choices.
PICARD 2:And I've been wondering if they were the right ones. Sometimes I feel we've allowed our positions to isolate us.
Our positions necessitate a degree of professional detachment.
PICARD 2:But there's a danger in becoming too detached, of never permitting ourselves to get closer.
Is that what you want, Jean-Luc? To get closer?
PICARD 2:You're a very attractive woman.
And you're a very attractive man. But we both know it's not as simple as that.
PICARD 2:Would it be simpler if I were not your commanding officer?
Simpler, perhaps, but that's not the only issue. I guess, right now, I'm comfortable with our relationship just the way it is.
PICARD 2:Would you care to dance?
I thought you didn't dance.
PICARD 2:On special occasions.
PICARD 2:I don't think I told you, but I'm glad you're back on the Enterprise. I missed our friendship.
I did too.
Jean-Luc, if I didn't know you better, I would think you were playing games with me.
PICARD 2:You're sorry you came tonight?
I didn't say that.
PICARD 2:Good. Because I'm delighted you did. But, perhaps we should call it a night.
PICARD 2:Goodnight.
I warned you not to provoke our captors. The next beams might be lethal.
Not to you. You moved far from the door.
Of course I did! Being stunned once was enough.
You claim you were hit by the stun beam before the rest of us arrived. You could be lying. Maybe our enemy is watching us from inside.
Are you accusing me of collaborating with our abductors?
Collaboration is what your species does best.
You did try to talk us out of attempting to escape.
For all we know, you may be our captor.
Impossible. I'm a Mizarian. My people are not aggressive.
How can we be sure you're a Mizarian? You could be an impostor.
This is nonsense. What if you're an impostor? Esoqq was the last one to appear, and he is the only one with a weapon.
Keep talking and I will use it.
Tholl, our captors have transporters, they have stun beams. It is hardly likely that they would try to hold us at bay with a knife.
Well, then, maybe she's an impostor. She could have triggered the stun beams deliberately.
I was hit, too.
To forestall suspicion. You were very quick to volunteer.
Tholl, I asked her to open the door.
You ordered her, you mean. You've been giving orders from the moment you got here, trying to make everyone do what you want.
Tholl, what I want is for everyone to escape!
Why should we believe you?
Captain Picard's put his life at stake for others many times. The primitive culture on Mintaka Three, the Wogneer creatures in the Ordek Nebula.
And Cor Caroli Five.
Right. Helping to cure the Phyrox Plague.
And how do we know this is the heroic Captain Picard? We have no proof of his identity.
You've wasted our time with failed attempts to communicate with them or escape. Is that your task? To keep us busy so we're off guard?
First Officer:First officer's log, supplemental. Although we're still eighteen hours from the Lonka pulsar, the Captain has ordered us to slow to one half impulse. He has offered no explanation.
I don't know why we're going to this pulsar. And creeping up on it at half impulse makes even less sense.
The Captain has given unusual orders before.
I know, but this is different. He's different. I can't put my finger on it, but I'm worried.
The Captain does seem detached from his emotions.
PICARD 2:Mister La Forge. We are operating at ninety six percent engine efficiency. Well done.
Thank you, sir.
PICARD 2:When we arrive at the pulsar, I shall require everyone at their best. I know that I can rely on both of you.
Of course, Captain.
PICARD 2:Excellent. An ale for me, and for my officers. In fact, ales for everyone.
PICARD 2:Here's to the finest crew in Starfleet. You know, back when I was in the Academy, we would follow every toast with a song. I wonder if I can, oh, yes.
PICARD 2:Come cheer up my lads, 'Tis to glory we steer. To find something new in this wonderful year. To honour we call you as free men and brave. For who are so free as the sons of the waves? Hearts of Oak are our ships, Jolly tars are our men. We always are ready. Steady, boys, steady. We'll fight and we'll conquer again and again.
Commander, what's the Captain up to?
That's not the Captain I know.
We're a mission that has no apparent purpose. In itself, I can accept that. All of us can, because the Captain says it's important and we trust him. Then he runs the crew through efficiency drills for the first time in my tour of duty, but he says we need them, so we need them, because we trust our Captain. But we also have a captain singing drinking songs with his men.
A Captain who's come to the poker game for the first time.
And he was very odd with me afterwards. He wanted me to warn him if the crew started to lose confidence in him.
Any signs of mental stress or trauma?
He came in for a physical with no word from me.
Anything unusual, Doctor?
Every test result identical to his last physical, which is kind of unusual in itself, actually.
Almost as though he wanted to establish that there was nothing wrong.
There was one other thing. He asked me to dinner in his cabin, and it was a very unusual evening.
Which brings up a very serious possibility. What if there's an outside influence at work here?
I detect no evidence of telepathic coercion.
Commander, there is still one fact we have not considered. The abnormal energy reading in the Captain's quarters was never explained.
It is not enough evidence to justify mutiny.
Nobody has suggested removing the Captain from command. Right now, all we have are suspicions. Not enough to act upon. The next move is his.
Well, Picard? Prove to us you're not the enemy.
I can't. You're right, Mister Tholl. Any of us may be the enemy. And there is no way to prove that we aren't. But until we set aside our mutual fears and trust one another, we have no hope of escape.
But sir, how can we trust each other?
She's right. There may be an enemy among us.
And what if there is, Mister Tholl? Shall we continue accusing one another until hostility leads to violence? Shall we allow our suspicions to destroy us? Now, let's see if we can override this stun mechanism.
PICARD 2:Helm take us in to twenty million kilometres.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, divert enough power to the shields to offset the increased radiation and magnetic fields.
Sir, at twenty million kilometres, our shields will only be effective for eighteen minutes.
PICARD 2:Noted, Mister Data.
Captain, may I have a word with you?
PICARD 2:You have the Bridge, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
What is our mission?
PICARD 2:I'm under no obligation to tell you that.
If you don't, you force me to take command of this vessel.
PICARD 2:On what grounds?
You are endangering this ship for no reason.
PICARD 2:No reason you're aware of.
That's not good enough. Your behaviour has been erratic.
PICARD 2:Erratic enough to justify mutiny? Do you honestly believe you have sufficient evidence to convince a board of inquiry?
No, I don't. But I can't let you risk the lives of this crew.
PICARD 2:Number One, has it occurred to you that you might be the one with the problem? I'm aware you've been under stress, and I am willing to let the matter drop if you will report to Sickbay for a full examination. Otherwise, I will have to relieve you from duty. Think about it.
Cadet.
I may have overloaded it, sir.
Mister Tholl!
I still think this is a mistake.
Now what? We're no better off than when we started.
Captain, number four shield has failed. Increasing power to number three shield to compensate.
PICARD 2:Helm, move us closer. Ten million kilometres.
Sir, at that distance, the ship will not withstand the magnetic fields and radiation. We will not survive.
PICARD 2:Take us in, Mister Crusher.
Belay that order.
PICARD 2:You're relieved of duty, Commander. Mister Worf, confine Mister Riker to his quarters.
PICARD 2:Mister Worf, I gave you an order.
Maintain your position, Lieutenant.
PICARD 2:You're destroying yourself and anyone who is foolish enough to listen to you.
You've shown none of the concern that Captain Picard would for the safety of his ship, the welfare of his crew.
PICARD 2:Mister Worf, escort Commander Riker from the Bridge.
Ensign Crusher, take us away from this pulsar. Heading one eight five mark three two. Full impulse.
Full impulse. Aye, Commander.
Engage.
I hope you're satisfied, Picard. You've accomplished nothing.
The sound of your voice is beginning to anger me.
Well, I think this charade has gone far enough.  Don't you?
I don't understand.
Oh yes, you do. This isn't a holding cell. It's a laboratory maze, a carefully structured test. It's an experiment to see how well we react under pressure.
How do you know?
It's the only explanation. Look at the four of us. We do have something in common. We all react differently to authority. You, the collaborator, defer to whoever has control. You, the anarchist, reject authority in any form. I, a Starfleet Captain, trained to command. And you, a Starfleet cadet, sworn to obey a superior officer's authority. Our captors have placed us here and have devised obstacles for us to overcome. They give us food which Esoqq can't eat, to make him a threat. They give us a door we can't open until the four of us co-operate. And each time we succeed, they deal us reverses to set us against each other again, while you observe our reactions.
Sir, I've been trying to help.
I found it unlikely that a first year cadet would know of the Enterprise's visit to Mintaka Three, so I tested you. Starfleet has classified the Cor Caroli Five plague as secret. No cadet would have knowledge of that incident.
Captain.
So you may as well drop this pretence. I'm not playing any further. I'm quitting the game. As far as I am concerned, this experiment is over!
You are correct, Captain Picard.
ALIEN 1:To further our knowledge of alien interaction, we borrowed you, Tholl, and Esoqq, and replaced you with replicas.
Replicas?
ALIEN 2:Our transporter is able to replicate living matter, including the brain's many trillion dendritic connections where memory is stored.
You mean there's a copy of me on Mizar Two?
An impostor running my ship.
ALIEN 2:No longer. Commander Riker has taken charge of the Enterprise.
ALIEN 1:Our species is telepathically linked. We are all in continual contact.
ALIEN 2:Much more efficient than your primitive vocal communications.
ALIEN 1:We would like to pursue this study, but of course your awareness of it would taint the results.
ALIEN 2:We will therefore return you to your places of origin.
Captain!
Hold your positions. Take no action.
Why did you choose to study the concepts of authority and leadership?
ALIEN 4:Because our species has no such concepts.
ALIEN 1:As we are all identical, distinctions among ourselves are meaningless. Hence we have no leaders no followers.
ALIEN 4:We wanted to examine the nature of command.
ALIEN 1:Our replicas of Tholl and Esoqq explored this issue on Mizar Two and on Chalna, just as our Picard replica did on the Enterprise.
ALIEN 4:Your responses were most intriguing.
You have no right to put us through this just to satisfy your curiosity.
ALIEN 1:Why not?
Because kidnapping is an immoral assault. The rights of other races must be respected.
ALIEN 4:This concept of morality is a very interesting human characteristic. We shall have to study it sometime.
Now, Mister Worf.
ALIEN 1:What is it?
ALIEN 4:Why do you hold us?
Because there is something else you can learn. With an alert crew, even our primitive vocal communications are unnecessary. With a single look I was able to inform my crew that I wanted to hold you here.
ALIEN 4:But why?
Because I've decided to conduct an experiment of my own. I want to see how you react to being imprisoned.
ALIEN 1+4:Captain, our species cannot bear captivity.
ALIEN 1:We were merely curious. We meant no harm.
ALIEN 4:We did not, after all, injure you in any way.
Imprisonment is an injury, regardless of how you justify.
And now that you have had a taste of captivity, perhaps you will reconsider the morality of inflicting it upon others. In any event, we now know about your race and we know how to imprison you. Bear that in mind. Now get off my ship.
Mister Crusher. Set course to rendezvous with the Hood. Warp eight.
Aye, sir. It's good to have you back, sir.
Status, Number One?
Ship and crew functioning normally, Captain.
Then my doppelganger caused no serious damage? The replica was convincing?
Very convincing, but not perfect.
Not perfect in what way?
Well, sir, I find it hard to believe you're that good a singer.
A singer? I look forward to reading your report, Commander. At least, I think I do.
Doctor
Captain.
Course laid in, sir.
Engage.
there's a time when you want to call a Romulan's bluff and there's a time when you don't. Wouldn't you say?
Well, one does not always have the luxury
You've got to choose your time and place with them. True or false?
Yes, wherever possible.
So, this time you were lucky. I suppose all's well that ends well but if I'd been in your shoes
Well, you know, that really does look very nice, Mister Mot. I think that will be sufficient.
Hold on  There. I must tell you, Captain, Will Riker was in for a trim yesterday and he agrees with me a hundred per cent.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Yes?
Sorry to interrupt.
We're receiving an emergency distress signal from the Solarion Four colony.
Uh oh. That's right along the Cardassian border.
Lay in a new course. I'm on my way.
I told him we shouldn't colonise so close to the Cardassians.
Report.
The signal ended abruptly at oh four five five. Unable to raise them on subspace.
Hail them on upper and lower band frequencies, Mister Worf.
I've tried. No response.
Time to the Solarion system?
Twenty six minutes, Captain.
I understand you've been discussing alternative adversarial engagement strategy with Mister Mot.
It would be more accurate to say he was discussing them with me. He's the best barber in Starfleet. What can you do?
Sir, receiving another signal of a vessel leaving orbit of Solarion Four. New frequency, low band, audio only.
Open a channel.
This is the Bajora. We claim responsibility for the destruction of the Federation colony on Solarion Four. As long as we are without our homeland, no one will be safe in this sector.
Captain's log, stardate 45076.3. We have arrived at Lya Station Alpha with survivors from Solarion Four. Admiral Kennelly has rendezvoused to discuss the Bajoran terrorist attack.
Sorry.
Ginger tea with honey, eighty degrees Celsius.
Ginger tea?
My Aunt Adele's cure for the common cold.
Common, hell. I picked this up from the Cardassian liaison last weekend. It's some damn virus they've sicked on me.
Did he have anything to say about this attack?
It's the same old story for the Cardassians. They've had terrorist problems ever since they annexed the Bajoran home world forty years ago.
But in forty years, they've never attacked a Federation target.
A new militant splinter group has broken away from the Bajoran settlement camps. The leader's name is Orta. Apparently he's willing to do whatever he has to to get attention.
And our response?
Listen, Jean-Luc, I'm the first to say that the Bajora deserve attention. Chased off their own planet by the Cardassians, forced to wander the galaxy, settling wherever they can find room. It's tragic.
On many worlds we've been to, they are isolated, treated as pariahs.
The Federation is sympathetic to their cause, but they're not helping themselves with an attack like this. That's what I want you to communicate to them.
But this could be done through diplomatic channels, Admiral. What do you really want of us?
Find this terrorist leader, Orta, and get him back where he belongs any way you can.
Any way I can?
The Federation has dozens of settlements in that sector. We can not allow the violence to continue.
And what do I have to offer Orta that might persuade him to cooperate?
Amnesty.
Admiral.
And a promise that we will immediately begin to address this issue with the Cardassians. Quietly, behind the scenes, using every legitimate means possible. But the Bajora must be patient.
Admiral, they've endured generations of sympathy and promises. How can I believe this Orta will be satisfied with more of the same?
It's your job to see to it that he does, Jean-Luc.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
Have you approved
The transfer of a new officer to the Enterprise?
Negative
Well, we've got one, waiting to beam aboard complete with orders.
Ensign Ro Laren.
Ro Laren? From the Wellington?
The same one, sir. Shall I tell her there's been some mistake?
Stand by, Commander.
I wrote the orders. I thought she might be valuable to you.
Admiral, respectfully. I would appreciate consulting rights on the assignment of a new officer, especially one with the record of Ro Laren.
She's Bajoran.
There are other Bajorans in Starfleet. Assign one of them.
I've discussed this situation with her, and I am convinced that she is the right one for this job.
After what happened on Garon Two, she has no business serving on any starship, let alone the flagship, my ship.
You're taking her, Captain. It's been arranged. I can't tell you how difficult it was to get her out of prison.
It's that important to you?
It's that important to the mission.
Picard to Riker.
Go ahead.
Proceed with the transport.
Sir?
I'll fill you in later.
Yes, sir.
I hope you and I don't regret this, Admiral.
You can handle her, Captain, if anyone can.
Ensign Ro Laren reporting as ordered, Commander.
You will follow Starfleet uniform code aboard this ship, Ensign.
There will be members of this crew who will not want to serve with Ensign Laren, sir.
They'll have to learn to live with it.
I intend to demand the highest level of performance from her.
I would expect nothing less. It won't be for long, Will.  Come.
Yes, Ensign Laren, please have a seat.
Ensign Ro, sir.
I beg your pardon?
The Bajoran custom has the family name first, the individual's second. I am properly addressed as Ensign Ro.
I'm sorry, I didn't know.
No, there's no reason you should. It's an old custom. Most Bajora these days accept the distortion of their names in order to assimilate. I do not.
I wish to be candid with you, Ensign.
Please.
I'm fully aware of your Starfleet record, your problems on other ships, and the incident on Garon Two that led to your court martial. And I'm concerned about your presence on this delicate mission.
I don't want to be here any more than you want me to be here, sir.
Then why did you accept this assignment?
If I may be equally candid? It's better than prison.
Better than prison? There are officers who wait years to serve on this ship.
Being called back into Starfleet was not my idea.
Nor ours.
Nevertheless, we will all be serving together. Commander Riker and I have expectations of you.
Captain, I know the routine. You don't have to worry about me. We're stuck with each other. So let's just get this over with as quickly as possible and we can go our own separate ways, okay?
Dismissed.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are approaching the Valo system on the outskirts of Cardassian territory, where many Bajorans have resettled.
There are dozens of Bajoran camps on the three class-M planets. I suggest we may want to begin on Valo Three, where an adhoc leader named Jas Holza lives. The Federation has had several dealings with him.
I met Holza at a symposium a few years ago.
What can you tell us about him, Doctor?
I found him to be a very concerned leader and a good spokesman for his people. And a terrific dancer. No, really, I'm serious. At a reception afterwards.
At least this man has genuine experience in diplomacy.
And that's a big advantage on this mission. Very well. Mister Data, will you contact Holza, arrange a meeting?
Sir.
Ensign Ro, you're familiar with this star system. You'll take the conn. Is there a problem, Ensign?
You're wasting your time. Holza is nobody. He's the token Bajoran that respectable people invite to symposiums and diplomatic soirees. But he has no real influence among my people.
Ensign, whom do you suggest we speak to?
Don't you understand? These are desperate people ready to martyr themselves. They don't want to talk.
This ship is prepared to defend itself if necessary.
Oh, it will be. Don't fool yourself. This mission will end in bloodshed.
Well, let's hope that you're mistaken, Ensign. But can you point us at the right individual, as Mister Data suggested?
I would go to the camp on the southern continent of Valo Two. Find a man named Keeve Falor. He has no diplomatic experience. And he won't ask you to dance.
Captain's log, supplemental. I read about the achievements of the ancient Bajoran civilisation in my fifth grade reader. They were architects and artists, builders and philosophers when humans were not yet standing erect. Now I see how history has rewarded them.
This used to be me.
Baleekam. Balleek, balleek. Baleekam! Baleek.
Ro Laren. It's been a long time.
Keeve Falor, Captain Jean-Luc Picard, Commander Data and Lieutenant Worf.
I'm pleased you agreed to meet with us, Mister Keeve.
You honour me by the proper use of my name, Captain.
Ensign Ro has educated me.
Has she? I'm pleased you still remember. Let me show you our camp. We are not a violent race, Captain. Just passionate about our cause. And that passion has led some to take up arms.
Do you know where we can find Orta?
I'm afraid not.
Can you help us locate him?
I'm sorry, I don't wish to help you. Don't misunderstand. I for one believe the raid on the Federation outpost was poor judgment. You are innocent bystanders, and I cannot condone violence against those who are not our enemies.
Then I don't understand why you are unwilling?
Because you are innocent bystanders. You were innocent bystanders for decades as the Cardassians took our homes, as they violated and tortured our people in the most hideous ways imaginable, as we were forced to flee.
We were saddened by those events but they occurred within the designated borders of the Cardassian Empire.
And the Federation is pledged not to interfere in the internal affairs of others. How convenient that must be for you, to turn a deaf ear to those who suffer behind a line on a map.
Well, I'm not here to debate Federation policy with you, but I can offer you assistance.
Simply because of one terrorist attack? Perhaps I should have known that. We should have attacked the Federation long ago. What do you think of that, Ro?
I think you're a small man who feels a rush of power in his belly and enjoys it far too much, Keeve. Stop talking and listen.
We've had our problems with the Cardassians too, but now that we have a treaty, we're in a position to help. Your people have been forced to resettle all over the quadrant. But now we can make a legitimate case with the Cardassians that this is not an isolated problem. We can work diplomatically on your behalf. But first, these terrorist attacks must end.
We live in different universes, you and I. Yours is about diplomacy, politics, strategy. Mine is about blankets. If we were to exchange places for one night, you might better understand.
Mister Data, see to it that the replicators provide a blanket for every man, woman and child before nightfall.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, determine what these people may have in the way of emergency needs and provide for them.
Yes, sir.
Thank you. Return to your ship. I will contact you when I have any information that might be of assistance to you. Ensign.
You were helpful.
The blankets were helpful. Nothing I said mattered.
In an age when their technology should be able to clothe and feed all of them, that they should have to live like this.
I couldn't, and I wouldn't. That's one reason I ran away. They're lost, defeated. I will never be.
Captain's log, stardate 45077.8. Keeve Falor has kept his promise and directed us toward the third moon of Valo One, where we will meet tomorrow with the terrorist leader, Orta.
Do you mind if we join you?
Yes.
I'll tell you one thing. If I find myself on an away team with Ensign Ro, I won't turn my back on her.
Perhaps the Captain thought she'd be valuable on the mission?
That was orders. Had to be. She doesn't belong here. She doesn't even belong in the uniform, as far as I'm concerned.
Really?
Really.
Sounds like someone I'd like to know. Excuse me.
Am I disturbing you?
Yes.
Good. You look like someone who wants to be disturbed.
I'd rather be alone.
Oh, no you wouldn't.
I beg your pardon?
If you wanted to be alone, you would've stayed in your quarters. The only reason to come here is to be amongst people.
Who are you?
My name is Guinan. I tend bar, and I listen.
Heard anything interesting?
Everyone's talking about you.
Heard anything interesting?
Mmm hmm.
Well, it's all true.
I believe truth is in the eye of the beholder.
Isn't that supposed to be beauty?
Truth, beauty. It works for a lot of things. They say you never told the true story about Galon Two. They also say you didn't defend yourself at your court martial.
What was to defend? I didn't follow orders. Eight members of the away team died.
Your fault?
Yeah, my fault.
So you sit alone in crowded rooms staring at your drink. I think you enjoy it.
I enjoy it?
You work so hard at torturing yourself, I can only think you must enjoy it.
Who are you?
I told you. I'm Guinan. I tend bar, and I listen.
You're not like any bartender I ever met before.
And you're not like any Starfleet officer I've ever met before, but that sounds like the beginning of a very interesting friendship.
I don't stay anywhere long enough to make friends.
Too late. You just did. Excuse me.
Bridge to Ensign Ro.
Go ahead.
Subspace communication coming in for you, Ensign.
Thank you.
Computer, direct subspace transmission to monitor.
Your report, Ensign.
Everything is going exactly as you predicted, Admiral.
Any indications of weapons or vessels beneath the surface?
The composition of the moon's crust is blocking the sensors.
Which is very likely why they chose this moon for their base of operations.
We're on a timetable here. Where's Ro?
Captain Picard to Ensign Ro.
Computer, locate Ensign Ro.
Ensign Ro is not on board the Enterprise.
Check the transport log.
She beamed down almost six hours ago, sir.
Any activity at the meeting site?
No, sir. They didn't show up.
What the hell is going on?
Prepare to transport us to the same location Ensign Ro beamed to. Mister Worf, phasers.
I am picking up molecular displacement traces. That suggests movement through this area during the last ten hours.
See if we can determine their direction. Standard search pattern.
Maintain tricorder security link.
Mister Worf, you come with me.
Data, I'm picking up energy fluctuations over here. Troi to Picard. Captain, acknowledge.
Data to Picard. Data to Worf.
Hold it.
Captain Picard, I am Orta. Please forgive my appearance. Unfortunately, some years ago, as a guest of the Cardassians, my face was mutilated. My vocal cords were cut.
It was not necessary to abduct us.
I am sorry, but after speaking with Ro Laren, I decided that it was.
Then she has done us both a disservice. I am committed to peace.
I am not at all interested in peace. And I am not convinced you are, either.
Captain, I did not come here to undermine this mission.
Whatever your motives, you've already done enough to damage these negotiations.
I came here to convince these people to listen to you. I didn't want this to end in bloodshed.
There will be no bloodshed.
You don't know all the facts, sir.
Then perhaps you would share them with me, Ensign.
All is not what it seems to be, Captain. Perhaps someone is using you to get to me. Perhaps you are a victim of this deception as well. I do not know.
Deception?
Your mission was to seek out the Bajoran terrorists who destroyed the Federation settlement on Solarion Four.
Yes.
As I have informed Ro Laren, it was not the Bajora.
He admits responsibility for dozens of attacks on Cardassian targets. Why should we believe him about Solarion Four?
He has no reason to lie.
He fears our reprisal.
I perceived no fear or deception from him.
If they did not attack Solarion Four, then who did? And why would anyone want to falsely implicate the Bajora?
Perhaps someone wanted to draw us into the conflict.
What would anyone gain by doing that?
Ensign Ro, may I see you in my Ready room?
Yes, sir.
You do not leave this ship without authorisation.
Captain, I'm sorry, but I
This is not a discussion. You're restricted to your quarters for the remainder of this mission. Dismissed.
What?
Hello, it's me, Guinan. I heard you got grounded.
I really don't feel like talking right now.
Come on, sure you do.
Why is it, every time I tell you something, you tell me I mean the exact opposite?
Because you're one of those people who's got their poles reversed. Do you want to talk about it?
It's nothing you can help me with.
How do you know until you try?
Look, I got myself into this. I'm just trying to figure a way out. That's all. Without anyone getting killed this time. Seems like everybody's just pulling my strings, you know? Like I've got no control.
For people like you and me, who've lost their homes, sometimes that's the way life feels.
I'm in trouble. There's more going on here than anybody on this ship realises. It's more than I know how to deal with. And I really don't know who to trust anymore.
Including yourself?
Especially myself.
You know, a very long time ago, I got into some serious trouble too. And I mean serious. And I'd probably still be there if I hadn't trusted one man.
Come.
Ensign Ro has some things she'd like to talk to you about.
Ensign Ro has been confined to her quarters.
Well, she can go back to her quarters when she's done.
Guinan, I don't know why you are involved in this, but
She's my friend.
Please sit down. Guinan is very selective about whom she calls a friend.
Sir, when I'm finished telling you what I have to tell you, I'm probably going to end up back in the stockade one way or the other. And if that's how this has to be, then I just can't do this anymore.
What can you not do anymore, Ensign?
Admiral Kennelly came to me in prison and told me he'd arrange to get me out if I'd go on a mission.
I know that part.
No, sir. Not this mission. One for him and only him. You were being sent to talk, to negotiate. The Admiral knew that was hopeless. My job was to give Orta an incentive.
What kind of incentive?
One that you couldn't offer. One that Starfleet couldn't offer. Orta was to end the terrorism against the Federation and return with his people to the camps. In exchange he would get weapons, ships, things that would really make a difference against the Cardassians in the future.
I find that almost impossible to believe. That Admiral Kennelly would consider supplying weapons to the terrorists?
If you ask him, he'll deny it. But it's true. I didn't leave the ship without authorisation, Captain. I received it from the Admiral last night.
You have been in contact with Admiral Kennelly during this mission?
Yes, sir. The subspace log can confirm that part of it at least.
Arming these people is a violation of everything that the Federation stands for. Even you cannot be blind to that.
No, sir, I'm not. But this was something I had to do. You see, Captain, when I was seven years old I was given a piece of sugar candy and I was led by a Cardassian into a room where my father was sitting. And he looked at me with eyes I'd never seen. The Cardassian began to ask him questions, and during the next two hours, as I was forced to watch, my father was tortured until he died. And I remember feeling so ashamed of him as he begged for mercy. I was ashamed of him for being weak. I was ashamed of being Bajoran. Later I began to understand how misguided those feelings were. And yet somehow, they have remained a part of me. I don't want to be ashamed of my heritage any longer, Captain. I serve the Federation. But I am Bajoran. A Starfleet Admiral presented me with an opportunity to help my people in their fight against the Cardassians. I had to accept it.
Have you made this offer to Orta?
No. After he told me the Bajora hadn't attacked Solarion Four, nothing made sense anymore. I decided to wait until I could figure out what was going on.
That was a wise choice, Ensign. It probably saved you from another court martial. Have you briefed Admiral Kennelly since we returned from the surface?
No, sir. Captain, I don't know who to trust anymore. But that strange bartender of yours has a way of getting to you, and she said that you were her friend.
Then we have one thing in common. Do you think that Orta would cooperate with us to determine the truth here?
I think I could persuade him to.
Good. Our orders were to find him, to bring him back to the camps any way we could. Perhaps that is exactly what we should do.
And then what?
And then watch what happens.
Captain's log, supplemental. I have become convinced that we are somehow involved in a conspiracy. I am hopeful the purpose behind it will be revealed in the next few hours.
Well done, Captain.
It was a team effort, Admiral. Ensign Ro was invaluable.
Good. What's the next step?
The Enterprise will escort a Bajoran Antares class carrier to the Valo Three camp at oh five hundred hours. Orta and his people will be aboard.
Good. Keep us advised of your progress.
Acknowledged. How's that Cardassian virus, Admiral?
A lot better, thank you.
I'm pleased. We will report as soon as our mission is accomplished. Picard out.
Ensign Ro, take us to the designated coordinates.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, keep an eye on the Cardassian border.
Aye, sir.
The Bajoran vessel is moving up from the surface, Captain.
On screen. Hail them, Mister Worf.
Audio channel open. The ship does not have visual capabilities.
This is Captain Picard. We're prepared to escort you to Valo Three.
Acknowledged, Captain. Be advised that our ship is limited to half impulse.
Ensign Ro, set a course for Valo Three, half impulse.
Aye, sir.
I am monitoring increased activity inside Cardassian space. Two ships are moving along the border heading one four two mark zero five one.
Can you identify the class of these ships, Mister Worf?
Cardassian warships, Galor class, type three.
Top of the line.
They are moving into a course parallel to our own, Captain.
Yellow alert. Continue to monitor them.
Ensign Ro, what's the closest we come to the Cardassian border on our current heading to Valo Three?
Thirteen thousand, four hundred kilometres, sir.
ETA?
Eight minutes.
That's where it will be.
The Cardassian ships are changing course, sir. They are crossing the border.
They're increasing power to their forward weapon grid.
Red alert.
Ensign Ro, set a course to intercept the Cardassians. Mister Worf, open a channel to the Bajoran vessel.
Open.
This is the Enterprise. We are moving to intercept two Cardassian warships. Maintain your present course and speed.
Acknowledged, Enterprise.
The Cardassians are within visual range.
On screen.
They are hailing us, sir.
Open a channel, Mister Worf. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise. How can we help you?
Gul Dolak, Cardassian Militia Four One. We have no argument with you, Captain.
I'm pleased to hear that, Gul Dolak, for all of us in the Federation value the peaceful relations with our Cardassian neighbours.
No more than we value the relations with our Federation neighbours.
Well, now that we've established our mutual good will, what's on your mind?
We have identified the Bajoran ship you are escorting as a terrorist carrier.
Terrorist carrier? Are you certain?
Most certain, Captain. It has committed many crimes against us. We know its markings well.
Rest assured, Gul Dolak, there will be no terrorist attacks today. We are escorting the Bajoran settlers to their camp on Valo Three. You can monitor their course if you wish.
We would request that you withdraw and leave the matter to us.
This is neutral space, Gul Dolak. You have no jurisdiction here.
Nor do you.
If we withdraw, what do you intend to do with the Bajoran vessel?
We intend to destroy it.
I see. That puts me in a difficult position. I promised to escort these people to their camps.
You are protecting the enemies of the Cardassian people. If you do not withdraw, we will take great offence.
I'm sorry to offend you, Gul Dolak, but we cannot withdraw.
We are prepared to take any steps necessary.
Is that intended as a threat?
It is a complaint from your Cardassian neighbours. You have one hour to withdraw.
Advise Starfleet of our status, Mister Data. When Admiral Kennelly calls, I'll speak to him in my Ready room.
It seemed, Admiral, that they knew our course, our destination, our plan.
I'm sure they monitor the border at all times for terrorist activity. Their sensors must picked up Orta's ship, that's all.
I'm not convinced of that.
The important thing is, what do we do now?
Do you have any suggestions, Admiral?
Your top priority is to protect the Cardassian treaty.
Sir, I see no way to protect the Cardassian peace without sacrificing the Bajorans.
If that's your call, I'll support it.
No. I'm not willing to give them up.
I don't think you're looking at the big picture, Jean-Luc. We can't afford to lose the Cardassian treaty.
Well, I just see a different big picture, Admiral. It looks something like this. I see the Cardassian liaison, with his Cardassian virus, coming to meet with you after the attack on Solarion Four. Now we have a common enemy, he says. The Bajoran terrorists. The Cardassians can't find them, but maybe the Federation can. I'm beginning to see that our mission has, in fact, been to expose Orta so that the Cardassians can move in and destroy him.
I think you've lost your perspective, Captain. We'll discuss this further when you return. For now, I'm giving you a direct order to withdraw. Kennelly out.
Ensign Ro, set a course, bearing one eight seven mark one zero two, one quarter impulse.
Aye, sir.
He's ordered us to withdraw?
The Cardassians are moving toward the Bajoran vessel, Captain.
Hold present course.
The Bajoran ship has been destroyed.
Subspace signal coming from Starfleet, Captain. Admiral Kennelly.
On screen.
It is on a secure channel, sir. In your ready room?
No. Here. On screen.
Report.
The Cardassians have destroyed the Bajoran ship, Admiral.
All hands lost?
No, sir.
Survivors?
No, sir. No one was on board.
What are you talking about?
The ship was controlled from the ground. Communication was handled through a subspace relay on board the vessel.
This was your idea, Picard?
Actually, no. It was Ensign Ro's idea but I fully endorsed it. I suspected that something like this might occur.
They're terrorists, damn it. Why in the hell would you want to protect them?
Admiral, I am more concerned with protecting the honour and integrity of Starfleet.
Do you know how many of our people they killed on Solarion Four?
The Bajorans did not attack Solarion Four.
Who told you that? Orta?
Yes.
And you believed him?
Admiral, Orta's ships are old and obsolete. They don't even have warp capabilities. They couldn't have reached another star system, let alone attacked one.
But then who's responsible?
I would suggest you ask your friend the Cardassian liaison, Admiral. The only explanation I can think of is that the Cardassians staged it.
The Cardassians? Why?
Perhaps they were hoping to find someone in Starfleet like you, Admiral, naive enough to solve their Bajoran problem for them.
What will happen to him?
I'm not sure. A hearing, certainly. Probably a court martial.
Well, if he's sent to the stockade on Jaros Two, tell him to request a room in the east wing. The west wing gets awfully hot in the afternoons. How soon do you intend to return to Lya Station Alpha, sir?
In a few weeks. We have some surveying to do in sector two one three oh five.
Perhaps I should arrange for some other transportation back.
Ensign, you were recruited for one mission and if you wish to be relieved of further duty, I can certainly arrange it. But I'd like you to consider remaining in Starfleet.
You're not serious.
I think it would be a shame for Starfleet to lose someone of your potential.
Well, thank you, Captain, but this uniform just doesn't fit, and you know it.
That can change.
I don't think so.
I've noticed qualities in you that could be harnessed, moulded.
Don't count on it.
I think you've got a great deal to learn from Starfleet.
I always thought Starfleet had a lot to learn from me, Captain.
That is an attitude I've found common among the best officers I've ever served with. You're not one of them yet, but you could be, if you work at it.
That's an interesting challenge. And I rarely refuse an interesting challenge. There would have to be one condition.
Condition?
Picard to Enterprise. Two to beam up.
You're worried.
With reason.
About Worf or Commander Riker?
Both. I think it is perhaps best to be ignorant of certain elements of Klingon psyche.
Above, look out!
The exercise is over!
At ease, Lieutenant!
Exit Holodeck. You do this every day?
No, Commander. Usually my calisthenics are more intense, but those sessions are too personal to be shared.
I'll bet they are.
Computer. Programme complete. Save. Coming Commander?
Right behind you.
Captain's log, Stardate 42193.6. We are on a long reach toward the Morgana Quadrant, a section of the galaxy which has yet to be visited by a manned Federation vessel. We are using the time to further detail the charts of this region.
There it is again. An area of blackness.
It appears, then disappears, then reappears. No predictable pattern, no sequence.
On screen.
There it is.
I can't see anything. Magnify section two eight five.
There it is, sir. It's like a hole in space.
We're acquainted with the wormhole phenomenon, but this? This appears quite different. What do your sensors indicate?
Nothing, sir.
Nothing?
Mister Data, you must mean it's empty of matter. There's always some energy form at work.
Sir, our sensors are showing that to be an absence of everything. It is a void without matter or energy of any kind.
Yet this hole has a form, Data. It has height, width.
Perhaps. Perhaps not, sir.
That is hardly a scientific observation, Commander.
Captain, the most elementary and valuable statement in science, the beginning of wisdom, is I do not know. I do not know what that is, sir.
Captain, if this were any ordinary kind of hole in space wouldn't we be able to see what's behind it?
Counsellor?
I know what you're asking, but I feel nothing from it.
Data, is there any record anywhere of any occurrence even vaguely similar to this?
Accessing. Negative, sir. There is no record of any Federation vessel encountering anything remotely like this.
Indeed. I believe we have time to take a closer look, Number One.
Concur. Ensign, slow down to half impulse power. Adjust coordinates to intercept this, this whatever it is.
Scanning and recording as we go.
Aye, sir. Adjusting course to intercept in twelve minutes, sir.
Let's launch a probe into it.
Worf, prepare a scanner probe. Let's see what's in there.
This is close enough, Ensign. Hold this position.
Aye, sir. Holding this position.
You may fire the probe when ready, Mister Worf.
All the probe's systems are functioning perfectly.
It's gone.
Data, what happened?
Unknown, sir.
Recommend we go to a Yellow Alert, sir.
Why? Explain.
Sorry, sir. It's
Mister Worf, this starship operates best when my officers share with me what is their minds.
My thoughts were of an old Klingon legend of a gigantic black space creature which was said to devour entire vessels.
Devour vessels?
Sorry, Commander. I agree these are thoughts hardly worthy of a trained and practical Security Officer.
Mister Worf, will you launch another probe. This time a Class One with full sensor array.
Launching, sir.
Happened even more quickly.
Recommend we fire a photon torpedo, Captain.
Negative.
Captain, based on where the probes disappeared I have been able to plot the outer boundaries. I could move in closer.
Make it so, Mister Crusher. Thrusters only. Mister Data?
Still no readings of any kind, sir.
Number One?
I'm going with Worf on this one. Let's be careful.
All right, that's enough, Ensign. Come to full stop and hold these coordinates.
Aye, sir.
What's happened?
Data?
Whatever it is, sir, we seem to be inside it.
It enveloped us. It moved. All stations, report.
No response, Captain.
Captain's log, supplemental. While exploring a strange void in space without any form of matter or energy, we have apparently moved past its outer boundary and entered it. After a brief disruption, our ship's communications have returned to normal.
All stations have reported, Captain. There appears to be no immediate threat to our ship or the crew.
Let's hold this position for a while, Number One. This is worth studying.
Incredible. It's like looking into infinity, sir. Remember the course in ancient history at Starfleet Academy? About the time men still believed the Earth was flat?
And that the sun revolved around it.
And that if a ship sailed too far out into the ocean, it would fall off the edge of the world?
Beyond this place there be dragons. It's even said that crews threatened to hang their captain from the yard arm if he refused to turn back.
I'm sure no one here has that in mind, sir.
How comforting, Number One.
Captain, we have no communications outside of the void.
Complete your scans, Data. Let's not stay any longer than we have to.
Hello, Doctor. Have you been briefed on what's happened?
I heard, but I don't understand it, Captain.
I wish I could say I did. Increase magnification by ten. By one hundred.
Isn't this impossible, sir? I'm not a Bridge officer, but. Increase by one thousand, Mister Data. By ten thousand. It does know how to do these things, doesn't it?
Commander Data knows precisely what he is doing.
Forgive me, Mister Data. I'm not accustomed to working with non-living devices that. Forgive me again. Your service record says that you are alive. I must accept that.
Engineering!
Engineering.
Lieutenant, are all your systems functioning?
Yes, Captain. Wherever we are, it seems to have no effect on Engineering.
Thank you, Lieutenant. Data?
Difficult to make a judgment, sir, based on the absence of information.
Speculate.
This void has a total lack of dimension. Therefore, by any accepted standard, it does not exist, yet being within it denies that conclusion.
Might we have moved into another dimension?
Could a lack of dimension be another dimension in itself?
That's an interesting question.
For a later discussion. Number One, I think we should get on with our mission. Starfleet can send a science vessel back to investigate further. Move us back out of here.
Aye, sir. Wesley, reverse our direction, set a course for the Cornelian star system. Impulse power.
Aye, sir. Reversing direction. Course laid in.
Engage.
Your engines have engaged, haven't they, Ensign?
Aye, sir.
Lieutenant La Forge, I'd like you to monitor our velocity closely.
Is everything all right up there, Captain?
Are the engines operating normally?
Yes, sir. Everything looks fine down here.
We're increasing to warp two.
Aye, sir.
We should be seeing stars by now. Data, how far have we come?
Inertial guidance shows one point four parsecs travelled, Captain.
Ensign?
Confirmed, sir. Exactly what my readings say.
Engineering, transfer to Bridge. What's happening, sir? we should be clear.
We should be. We're on a reverse course.
Full stop, helm.
Full stop, sir.
According to this we're already well past the point at which we entered the void.
Except that we are still in it, sir. Captain, if we dropped a stationary beacon and travelled straight away from it, we would have a fixed point of reference to confirm speed and distance.
Make it so, Data. Lock onto the beacon. Keep it dead astern.
The beacon is in place, Captain.
Dead ahead. Impulse power.
The beacon is falling astern, Captain.
Engineering, report.
All systems functioning normally, sir.
Prepare to increase to warp two.
Aye, sir.
Captain, we are receiving a signal from dead ahead.
Maybe you've found the door out of this.
Closing on the new signal, sir.
Identify.
Captain, it is the stationary beacon we just released.
We must have come full circle, sir.
We couldn't have, sir. I've shown us steadily moving away from that beacon.
Full stop. Hold this position again.
Captain, sensors indicate a disturbance in sector one zero eight. Possibly a vessel.
Perhaps some answers at last. On screen.
The ship is equipped with a cloaking device.
Romulan!
It's closing.
Shields up. Go to Red Alert!
I'll be at my duty station.
Main viewer locked onto coordinates.
Arm the photon torpedoes, Mister Worf.
Hold for my orders.
There!
It's uncloaking.
Direct hit, sir. Our shields are weakening.
Warn them we'll return fire.
Transmitting. They've armed another full spread, sir.
Fire torpedoes.
Oh, that was too easy.
Captain, sensors can locate no debris from the Romulan ship.
Impossible.
Captain, there's another vessel approaching in sector zero nine one, mark two six.
On screen. Magnify.
It's a Federation ship. NCC one three zero five dash E. It's the Yamato, our sister ship.
The Yamato's nowhere near this quadrant.
Open a hailing frequency, Data.
USS Enterprise to USS Yamato. Respond, please. USS Enterprise calling USS Yamato. Respond, please, on this frequency. No response, Captain.
Make a full scan.
Life support system, engineering and propulsion all appear functional. But there are no life signs, sir.
Data, can we be getting a false reading?
Since we know nothing of these circumstances, it is at least conceivable, sir.
You look doubtful, sir.
I'm not anything now, Number One. I'm just a man who's looking for answers.
Like the rat said, 'Keep the cheese, I just want out of the trap.'
Captain, request permission to board on the Yamato with an away team. Perhaps something we can find on board in the logs will help us figure out what happened.
Granted. Minimum complement.
Worf, you're with me.
Captain's log, supplemental. We remain like a fly in amber, trapped in the void. We have encountered a vessel which appears to be the USS Yamato. All its systems are shown as functioning, yet it seems devoid of life. Commander Riker is leading an away team. Hopefully, the answer lies over there.
Have you got a lock on that other ship?
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir. No problems at all.
Can you put us on the bridge?
O'BRIEN:Anywhere you say, Commander.
I am acquainted with the Yamato, Commander. Recommend the aft station of their bridge. When in doubt, surprise them.
Them? Who's them?
Whoever may be there.
Our sensors indicate no life forms.
Still, the tactic is sound.
Agreed. Aft station, Lieutenant.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Phasers on stun. Energise.
This isn't the Bridge. Worf?
Halt! Don't fire.
I heard you screaming. I was coming to help.
You heard me? I heard you. Transporter Chief, where do you show us over here?
O'BRIEN:We show as approximately
Captain, do you read me?
We're having difficulties with our communications.
Number One, come in. Transporter Room, this is the Captain. We are out of contact with the away team. Beam them back immediately.
O'BRIEN:I've lost the lock on them.
Nothing on my communicator, sir.  Computer on.
Let's find a turbolift to the Bridge.
Transporter room, have you been able to establish a lock?
Emergency power engaged.
Initiate full check, all systems.
Engineering section, report. What is our situation?  Engineering? Captain, request permission to leave the Bridge.
Granted.
This isn't a Federation ship. These walls aren't tritanium. It's close, but it's material beyond our technology. Let's get to the Bridge. There's got to be an answer to all of this somewhere.
This Bridge should be four decks above us. What's going on here?
That's not where we came from.
Wait a minute.
Two Bridges?
If we go through there, where will we be?
On the Bridge.
But we are on the Bridge.
It's up to you, sir.
Let's see what happens.
Is it the same Bridge?
Or did we step from one Bridge onto another Bridge?
We've regained ship's communication, sir.
Captain, I have a star fix.
On screen.
It's an opening, sir.
Confirm, sir. Navigation is possible.
Should I set a course?
Transporter room, do you have a fix on the away team?
O'BRIEN:Negative, Captain.
Damn.
Sir.
Commander.
How did you? Where did you come from?
What's going on? A ship has one Bridge. One Bridge! One Riker, one Bridge!
Lieutenant!
This is impossible. Impossible!
Pull yourself together. Worf!
At ease, Lieutenant. At ease.
Captain, the star fix is fading.
DATA, lock on to the Yamato with a tractor beam. We leave together.
I cannot make the lock, sir.
Captain, the star fix is almost gone.
Let it go.
But, sir, we can get out.
Let it go.
O'BRIEN:Bridge.
O'BRIEN:I have re-established contact with the away team.
Beam them back immediately.
Captain.
Come in. Come in, Enterprise.
O'BRIEN:Hold position, away team.
O'BRIEN:I've got you. We're bringing you home.
Transporter room, hurry!
Captain, it's almost gone.
What the hell is going on?
Are you all right, Number One?
I've had it. Let's put all this technology to work, figure out what's going on, and get the hell out of here.
A ship that was almost the Yamato, existing in a hole in space, with no crew aboard. Now what is the purpose?
Add to it an attack by a nonexistent Romulan vessel. It does suggest an interesting question. Was our away team actually over there?
If we weren't over there, where the hell were we?
Commander, I have re-established the star fix.
Great. Set course. Velocity warp two.
Course and speed set.
Engage.
I have lost contact, sir.
What?
The star fix is gone.
Captain, it is not in the same sector, but another opening has appeared.
All right. Set a course for those stars, warp six.
Yes, sir. Warp six.
I've lost the signal, sir.
What's going on?
All stop.
Captain.
Yes, Mister Data, I can see it.
This game is now wearing very thin.
Let's just hold this position. Counsellor? You have said you sensed no intelligence in all of this. You haven't changed in that belief?
I'm not certain of that now, Captain. I do sense something unusual.
Perhaps a different level of consciousness?
Yes. Perhaps an intelligence so vast it eluded me.
Rats in a maze.
Exactly!
Explain.
Everything we've been through reminds me of a laboratory experiment. As if something was testing our responses to stimuli.
Are you suggesting that we're in some kind of laboratory?
Yes.
The opening seems closer, Captain.
I've had enough of being led about this way.
Agreed, Captain. Hold present position.
Good. Don't satisfy its curiosity.
Captain, look.
Why are you so alarmed when I've gone to such trouble to look just like you?
Captain, sensors show nothing out there. Absolutely nothing.
Sure is a damned ugly nothing.
I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise. representing a Federation of planets in this part of the galaxy. Can you identify whoever or whatever you are?
Nagilum.
Speaks right up for something your sensors say isn't there, Data.
We still have no idea what you represent.
Data.
Nagilum?
You are of different construction than the others. Interesting. Picard, Riker, Geordi, Haskell. What are you? Your construction also differs.
My construction?
Perhaps referring to your gender, Doctor?
Yes, well, there are minor differences. I'm what we call a female.
I understand. The masculine and the feminine.
It is the way in which we propagate our species.
Please, demonstrate how this is accomplished.
Not likely.
Whatever you are, your actions are not welcome.
Let me put up the shields, sir.
Sensors still show nothing out there.
Your life form surprises me more and more. Is it true you also have only a limited existence? Answer!
What information do you want? I don't understand the question.
You exist and then you cease to exist. Your minds call it death.
How interesting.
He's gone.
We cannot allow you to do that! We will fight you.
To understand death, I must amass information on every aspect of it. Every kind of dying. The experiments shouldn't take more than a third of your crew, maybe half.
Captain's log, Stardate 42194.7. It is obvious that whatever we have met sees no value in our kind of life form. How do we fight something that both is and is not there?
I know this much. We are unimportant to it.
In a battle for survival, Captain, thirty to fifty percent casualties
Would be appalling.
But within acceptable limits.
This is not a battle, Worf.
No. A laboratory experiment would be the closest comparison.
Is there any reason for not believing this Nagilum?
No.
All evidence indicates it is willing and able to do what it proposes.
Agreed. Under the circumstances, I think there is only one decision. I will not stand by while half of my crew is slaughtered.
Sir. I do not believe there is anything you can do to prevent it.
Yes, there is
What?
Destroy the Enterprise.
Isn't that a little like curing the disease by killing the patient?
It's better than standing around helplessly.
Why do get the feeling this was not the time to join this ship?
Recognise, Picard Jean-Luc. Recognise Riker, William T.
Initiate auto-destruct sequence.
Does Riker, William T. concur?
I do. Initiate auto-destruct sequence.
Desired time interval?
Stand by. Interesting question. How long to prepare to die?
What would be the least painful to our crew? Move to it quickly, or allow them time to prepare for it thoroughly? Well, twenty minutes? Nice round figure.
Initiate auto-destruct. Interval, twenty minutes.
Twenty minutes to auto-destruct. Nineteen minutes, fifty seconds
Come.
Our destroying ourselves won't change its mind, Captain. I would feel that.
You didn't mention you were that certain.
I was wrong not to tell you, Captain. And your decision may also be wrong.
Yes. Come in, please.
I have a question, sir.
Yes, Data. What is it?
What is death?
Oh, is that all? Well, Data, you're asking probably the most difficult of all questions. Some see it as a changing into an indestructible form, forever unchanging. They believe that the purpose of the entire universe is to then maintain that form in an Earth-like garden which will give delight and pleasure through all eternity. On the other hand, there are those who hold to the idea of our blinking into nothingness, with all our experiences, hopes and dreams merely a delusion.
Which do you believe, sir?
Considering the marvellous complexity of our universe, its clockwork perfection, its balances of this against that, matter, energy, gravitation, time, dimension, I believe that our existence must be more than either of these philosophies. That what we are goes beyond Euclidian and other practical measuring systems and that our existence is part of a reality beyond what we understand now as reality.
We should not let ourselves die, Jean-Luc.
I agree with her, Jean-Luc.
If only half of us live, then I'd rather take my chances on being one that does.
Yes. It is wrong of you to force us.
It is wrong.
Yes. This is very wrong. Neither of you should be reacting in this way. Computer, locate Commander Data for me.
Commander Data is on the Bridge.
It's not going to work, Nagilum.
Captain, we are clear. We are out of the void.
It's gone, Captain. We can abort the auto-destruct.
Hold, Number One.
But Captain
Hold.
One minute to auto-destruct.
We are out of the void, sir. You may stop auto-destruct.
Mister Crusher, any heading, warp six. Now!
Fifty seconds to auto-destruct. Forty seconds to auto-destruct.
Captain?
It could all be part of the illusion. Commander Data, report.
All navigational systems confirm we are at warp six on course, sir.
Counsellor Troi?
Captain, it has gone. I no longer feel its presence.
Twenty seconds to auto-destruct. Ten seconds to auto-destruct.
Captain.
Abort auto-destruct sequence.
Riker, William T. Do you concur?
Yes! Absolutely! I do indeed concur wholeheartedly!
Auto-destruct cancelled.
A simple yes would have sufficed, Number One.
I didn't want there to be any chance of a misunderstanding.
Of course. You have the Bridge.
He sure held that bluff till the last second, didn't he, sir?
Was he bluffing?
Well, Nagilum, I hope you got what you needed.
You have provided me with much more than I needed.
Why did you release us? You could have seen the way we face death.
It wasn't necessary. I have learned all I needed to know. Would you like me to share some of my conclusions?
I'm not interested.
Of course you are. You are too inquisitive not to want to know. You seem to find no tranquillity in anything. You struggle against the inevitable. You thrive on conflict. You are selfish, yet you value loyalty. You are rash, quick to judge, slow to change. It's amazing you've survived. Be that as it may, as species, we have no common ground. You are too aggressive. Too hostile. Too militant.
During this period, you too have been evaluated. It would seem that we have at least one thing in common.
Oh?
Curiosity.
The point is well taken, Captain. Perhaps that is a trait we share.
Then perhaps we'll meet again. But next time, it will be out here, among the stars.
Ensign, put us back on course. Warp three.
Yes, sir. Warp three.
And Ensign, if you encounter any holes, steer clear.
There you are. What's wrong?
Something jabbed me here in the calf.
O'Brien, Commander Riker's been injured. Lock on and bring him up.
O'BRIEN:Stand by.
Geordi, it's just
A scratch. Right. Sorry, Commander. We can't take any chances. We're the first survey team to set foot on this planet. We don't know what the risks are.
O'Brien, what's the hold up?
O'BRIEN:The transporter's detected unidentified microbes in Commander Riker's body.
Well, can't the bio-filter screen them out?
O'BRIEN:Apparently not.
O'BRIEN:But Doctor Pulaski has been notified.
Acknowledged.
I wasn't ready to leave here anyway.
O'BRIEN:Here's the biofilter's analysis of the microbes.
That's not much to go on.
O'BRIEN:I can override and beam Commander Riker aboard .
No. I'd better go down and make an evaluation there.
O'BRIEN:I hope these are the right coordinates. Just kidding, Doctor. I know how much you love the transporter.
About as much as I love comical Transporter Chiefs.
O'BRIEN:Ready?
Over here, Doctor.
Fill me in.
I was walking along minding my own business, doing a simple geological sweep. Something stuck me in the leg.
Any pain?
No. Just a little numb, that's all.
Do you know what it was that stuck you?
We've been looking for it. No luck.
Well, whatever it was, it left something behind. I'm going to take you up to Sickbay. O'Brien, this is Doctor Pulaski.
Medical override is authorised.
O'BRIEN:Acknowledged.
This is the strangest feeling. My whole leg just went dead.
Captain's log, Stardate 42976.1. During a geological survey on Surata Four, Commander Riker has become infected by an unidentified microbe.
Number One.
Captain.
Put your foot where it didn't belong?
The Doctor said she was getting bored. I just thought I'd give her a challenge.
That you did. The Commander's nervous system has been invaded by an unknown microorganism. Not a bacteria, not a virus, but with the elements of both. There's the point of entry. The microbes are infecting the great sciatic nerve, and they are multiplying at an incredible rate. There.
Can you remove it?
Not surgically. The organisms fuse to the nerve, intertwining at the molecular level.
That's why the transporter's biofilters weren't able to extract it.
There's no evidence of nerve damage, but the organisms are impeding nervous function.
My leg's still asleep.
Prognosis?
The infection is spreading. It will eventually reach the brain.
And if it interfered with neural activity there?
Commander Riker could die.
How can I help?
I need to know more about its composition.
And for that, you need a sample.
Exactly.
Commander Data, Mister La Forge, prepare to beam down to the planet.
Aye, sir.
I must reiterate, it would be better if I went alone.
Don't like my company?
Your company is not at issue. Your vulnerability to the microorganism is.
I'll watch where I step. Besides, how do we know that this bug doesn't like androids more than it likes humans?
Possible, but highly unlikely. In any event, why risk both of us?
Because I know exactly where Commander Riker was when it happened.
Mister O'Brien, energise.
He was right over here.
I am detecting no animal life within fifty kilometres. However, I am reading extensive animal remains, mostly fossilised.
A graveyard?
I do not know.
Data, that a look at this.
The structure is rhizomatous.
Careful.
I am always careful.
It appears to be dead.
I'm not so sure. I can see thermal variations. Let it go for a second, Data. Let's try something. Perhaps it likes humans more than androids.
If you are correct, you are placing yourself in grave danger.
I'm counting on those great android reflexes of yours.
That must be what we're looking for.
I would tend to agree.
Stand by, O'Brien. Got it. Energise!
Thanks, O'Brien. Another minute, and we'd have been fossils ourselves.
Not precisely, Geordi. True fossilisation requires several millennia.
Here's your sample, Captain.
Get it to Sickbay right away.
Report.
Captain, Commander Riker's injury was not accidental. Certain vines on the planet evidently seek out warm-blooded beings and deliberately infect them.
To what end?
Unknown, sir. It is conceivable there is a symbiotic relationship involved.
Go on.
There are numerous animal remains in the area, leading me to hypothesize that the vines could be predatory.
Vines infect animals in order to kill them?
It is possible. For Commander Riker's sake, I hope my hypothesis is in error.
Unfortunately, Mister Data, your hypotheses rarely are.
All negative.
Is there nothing that will cure this infection?
This microorganism is very mysterious. I can't even figure out what's keeping it alive.
Or how to kill it.
Oh, I can kill it but not without destroying the nerves it's inhabiting.
I know you're doing your best, Doctor.
My best may not be good enough.
Comfortable?
Why wouldn't I be comfortable? They're waiting on me hand and foot. I hope that they don't find out that I'm faking it.
I wish you were faking it. I've seen the thorn.
Yes, Doctor showed it to me, too. Rather harmless-looking thing, I thought.
And deadly. I'm sorry.
Well, these things happen.
When least expected.
I'm surprised they don't happen more often. After all, we are exploring the unknown.
And the unknown can be benign or malevolent.
Captain, one of the things I've learned anything on these voyages, on this ship, and from you, is that most life forms act out of an instinct for survival, not out of malice.
It's an important lesson, and I admire your lack of resentment, Number One.
If you drop a hammer on your foot, it's hardly useful to get mad at the hammer.
Anything?
Not yet.
What can I do?
You can get out of my hair.
Aye aye, Doctor.
This bug is persistent, I'll admit that. But I'm not worried. We Rikers are ornery, too. As a matter of fact, my great grandfather once got bit by a rattlesnake. After three days of intense pain, the snake died.
You're a very entertaining patient.
I try.
Yes. you're making quite an effort to be cheerful.
You, of all people, should know.
You feel what anyone in your position would feel.
As the First Officer on this ship, I have to set an example.
Even now?
Now more than ever. Deanna, facing death is the ultimate test of character. I don't want to die, but if I have to, I'd like to do it with a little pride.
And a lot of impudence.
You bet. Dying is bad enough but, to lose my sense of humour? Forget it.
Imzadi.
I haven't given up yet.
It's spread to the spinal column. It's weakening his autonomic nervous system. Judging by its present rate of growth and its infiltration pattern, the infection will spread to the brain within an hour.
Medical Officer:Medical log, Stardate 42976.3. I can't keep the alien infection from spreading to Commander Riker's brain. Once there, it will kill him by dampening neural impulses. The only way I can keep him alive is to force the neurons to stay active by stimulating them directly with electrical impulses.
Let's proceed.
Good. Stand by with five milligrams of tricordrazine in case of seizure. Here goes.
Tasha? Data? Geordi? Worf? Anybody?
We've stimulated random wave activity, but the patterns are dangerously erratic.
Hang on, Will. Hang on.
The wave patterns are still too irregular.
Why won't they stabilise?
Wait. I've found the right amplitude. There. The patterns are steadier.
Is the stimulation preventing the infection from taking hold?
For now. The vertex waves indicate a K-complex corresponding to an REM state.
He's dreaming.
Hello!
Marvellous. How easily humans do that. I still need much practice.
There are some puzzles down on the planet that the Captain wants answered. He suggested that I take you with me on the away team I'll be leading.
I shall endeavour to function adequately, sir.
Yes. When the captain suggested you, I looked up your record.
Yes, sir. A wise procedure, sir, always.
Then your rank of Lieutenant Commander is honorary?
No, sir. Starfleet class of '78. Honours in probability mechanics and exobiology.
But your files they say you're a
Machine? Correct, sir. Does that trouble you?
To be honest, yes, a little.
Understood, sir. Prejudice is very human.
Now that does trouble me. Do you consider yourself superior to us?
I am superior, sir, in many ways. But I would gladly give it up to be human.
Nice to meet you, Pinocchio. A joke.
Ah! Intriguing.
You're going to be an interesting companion, Mister Data.
What should I say? How do I act? What do I do?
Guinan, I need your help. Could you step over here a minute?
Sounds simple enough.
Now, the first words out of your mouth are the most important. You may want to start with something like this here. You are the most beautiful woman in the galaxy. But that might not work.
Yes. Yes, it would.
You don't know how long I've wanted to tell you that.
But you were afraid.
Yes.
Of me?
Of us. Of what we might become.
Commander?
Or that you might think that was a line.
Maybe I do think it's a line.
Then you think I'm not sincere?
I didn't say that. There's nothing wrong with a line. It's like a knock on the door.
Then you're inviting me in?
I'm not sending you away.
That's more than I expected.
Is it as much as you hoped?
To hope is to recognise the possibility. I had only dreams.
Dreams can be dangerous.
Not these dreams. I dream of a galaxy where your eyes are stars and the universe worships the night.
Careful. Putting me on a pedestal so high, you may not be able to reach me.
Then I'll learn how to fly. You are the heart in my day and the soul in my night.
I don't think this is my style.
Shut up, kid. Tell me more about my eyes.
I didn't want to leave without saying goodbye.
I don't like goodbyes. How about, until next time.
How about, until next time.
It's been a pleasure working with you, Commander.
The feeling is mutual, Counsellor.
I'm supposed to know how everyone feels, but I can't read you right now.
Perhaps your own feelings are getting in the way.
My job is to help others sort out their emotions. My own feelings are beside the point.
Not to me. Our feelings are what make us all human.
Are you feeling sad?
Yes, I am.
So am I.
He's relaxed. Experiencing feelings of warmth and friendship.
He's reliving memories. It's a natural side effect of neural stimulation. Look at this. The organisms' metabolism has changed. I wonder if the stimulation is affecting them somehow. I'm going to refocus the impulse pattern on the interpretative cortex.
To intensify his memories?
Exactly. We'll see if that has an effect on the microbes.
Everyone! We've brought the visitors.
Please, enjoy what we have.
Gentlemen, if this is what you call enhancement, you've got a gift for understatement. What's a knockout like you doing in a computer-generated joint like this?
Waiting for you.
Waiting for me? You can't be serious?
Oh yes, Will. I've never been more serious in my life.
Something wrong?
No, it's just that Commander Riker's emotions are rather passionate.
As in erotic?
Very much so.
A dream? Is that what this is? Is that what I am?
I know you are a computer-generated image, but your smell, your touch, the way you feel. Even the things you say and think seem so real.
Thank you.
How far can this relationship go? I mean, how real are you?
As real as you need me to be.
You resist. Don't you find me attractive?
Yes, I find you very attractive.
You attract me like no man ever has.
It's not my function to seduce or be seduced by the leader of another world.
It's not the reason.
No, it's not. But will you still respect me in the morning?
I hope so.
William, is something wrong?
What do you mean?
Do you not like girls?
Of course I do. Oh, is there a technique to this foot washing?
You generally start at the top and work your way down.
I think I can handle that.
I was hoping you might.
The organisms responded all right. Their growth rate has doubled.
Then all we've done is made things worse.
Now we know the organism's growth rate is related to the memories he's experiencing.
Or the emotions that they produce.
Different mental processes generate different chemicals. Perhaps the organisms are sensitive to brain endorphins.
Then if some types of endorphins attract them
Others will repel them. I'm going to change the differential current pattern and see what happens.
We're not going without our shuttle crew.
I warn you.
Enough! We have people who need attention. We won't hurt you, but we must help them.
Number One!
The creature attacked us. Lieutenant Yar is down.
It seems to feed on our phaser energy.
We had no effect on it.
What's Lieutenant Yar's condition? Doctor Crusher, report!
She's dead.
I'm losing life signs.
You must save him.
I'm sorry.
Growth rate has definitely slowed. What is he feeling? Can you tell?
Sadness.
Which is the opposite of before, and it's having the opposite effect on the infection.
Then your theory's correct. The organisms are sensitive to different types of endorphins.
And negative emotions
Such as sadness
Produce endorphins that inhibit the organisms' growth.
Then we've found a way to repel the infection.
Assuming we're not too late already.
How much time do we have?
I'm not sure. His vital signs are getting weaker. I don't want to risk another dose of tricordrazine unless I have to. I must refocus the pattern again. We need to isolate memories that generate stronger negative emotions. I know I can count on every Klingon warrior in this crew to serve and die in that battle. So I ask you again, Commander Riker. Where are your loyalties?
I have been assigned to serve this ship and to obey your orders. And I will do exactly that.
Will you take an oath to that effect?
I just did.
Do not believe him! He lies!
Speak in their language. This is your Second Officer, Lieutenant Klag.
Is there something you wanted to say to me, Lieutenant?
Yes sir. I do not believe you.
Then I take it you challenge my authority over you.
Correct.
And your position on this, Captain?
I would say it your first command decision.
Ready for your tour, Admiral?
Quite ready, Commander.
What's in the case?
Actually, I brought it for Doctor Crusher. But perhaps you would like you to see it first?
What is it?
A form of life. It was discovered accidentally by a survey team on an uncharted planet.
Why haven't we heard anything about that?
Oh, you'll be hearing about it shortly, but first there remains much scientific study to be done. After all, it is a superior form of life.
Superior?
Totally. Come, have a look.
I think I'll summon my Science Officer.
It won't like your Science Officer. It does like you! Vitamins. They do wonders for the body.
Riker to Security. Guest quarters seventeen. Emergency.
We've reduced the growth rate even further, but not enough. And his vital signs are deteriorating.
But we've isolated the specific areas to stimulate. The feelings were primal. Survival emotions.
They must be producing a type of endorphin that's poisonous to the organisms.
Can't you intensify that emotion?
I can refocus the impulse pattern even tighter. But I don't know if he can withstand it. He's extremely weak.
Do we have a choice?
No. If we don't neutralise the infection, within half an hour he'll be dead.
Medical Officer:Medical log, supplemental. Commander Riker's condition is still critical. I've discovered a way to reverse the infection's growth rate, but I may be too late.
He's getting weaker, isn't he?
Respiration shallow, heartbeat extremely irregular, but we can't delay any longer.
T'JON:You will take us to our planet and leave us there with our medicine or this person dies. Don't you see I have no choice? We were sent to bring the felicium back. The suffering on my planet is too great. People are dying. It doesn't matter whether we're entitled to it or not. We must have it.
Let him go.
T'JON:You will take us there now, or give us a shuttle. But we must have the medicine. If you refuse, this person will die.
I will not be coerced.
T'JON:I will do it. I will kill him.
Who are you?
Help! Data, something's got me!
Touch him and he dies.
No! No, don't!
Enterprise?
Armus has enveloped Commander Riker.
I'm beaming you up.
If any of you leave now, he dies.
And so do the survivors of the crash.
The growth rate's down to seven percent. The organisms are still impairing his neural functions. Respiration's erratic, pulse grossly irregular, blood pressure almost nil. Tricordrazine.
Can we tighten the pattern further?
Recognise Picard, Jean-Luc, Captain. Recognise Riker, William T, Commander.
Set auto-destruct sequence.
Does the First Officer concur?
Yes. Set auto-destruct sequence. Now.
Auto-destruct will detonate in four minutes and fifty-nine seconds.
I am Korris.
We'll handle the formalities later. Right now we have to get off this ship. Are there any others survivors?
No.
I believe I have found a quicker way out of here, sir.
Check him out.
He is alive, sir, but just barely.
Then pick the body and let's get out of here.
No. I will carry him.
As you wish.
Come on, let's go!
Tasha, go to transporter room three. I want you there when the away team returns.
Aye, sir.
Commander, we are out of time. This ship is blowing.
Transporter room, have you got a lock on us?
Too much interference. You have to get farther away from the Engineering section.
Sir, the Engineering section is critical. Destruction of the Batris is imminent.
They're out of options. Do it!
Now!
The growth rate's almost down to zero.
That's not good enough.
We seek peaceful co-existence.
Data, something's got me!
Sickbay to Bridge.
Yes, Doctor?
We've eradicated the infection.
I'm on my way.
You're still here?
I could ask you the same question.
How do you feel?
Beat. You wouldn't believe the dreams I was having.
Oh yes we would.
You'll be pleased to know that we've terminated the infection.
Great work, Doctor. Now, if I can get out of here, I'd like to get back
Lie still. I have a few dozen tests to run first.
Why? I feel fine.
There may be some residual memory loss. I just want to be sure you still know who you are.
Of course I know who I am. I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
I'm delighted that you're feeling better, Captain. The Admiral and I were worried about you.
Captain, I do not believe you have the authority to promote me to the rank of Admiral.
You don't believe in me.
I don't.
What evidence would you have of my reality beyond that of your senses?
I don't know.
Why do you doubt your senses?
Because a little thing affects them. A slight disorder of the stomach makes them cheats. You may be an undigested bit of beef, a blot of mustard, a crumb of cheese, a fragment of an underdone potato. Why, there's more of gravy than of grave about you, whatever you are. Humbug, I tell you. Humbug.
Freeze programme. Very well done, Data. Your performance skills really are improving.
Your courtesy is appreciated, sir. But I am aware that I do not effectively convey the fear called for in this scene.
Well, you've never known fear, Data. But as an acute observer of behaviour, you should be able to approximate it.
Sir, that is not an appropriate basis for an effective performance. Not by the standards set by my mentors.
Your mentors?
Yes, sir. I have studied the philosophies of virtually every known acting master. I find myself attracted to Stanislavsky, Adler, Garnav. Proponents of an acting technique known as the Method.
Method acting? I'm vaguely familiar with it, but why would you choose such an old-fashioned approach?
Perhaps because the technique requires an actor to seek his own emotional awareness to understand the character he plays.
But surely that's an impossible task for you, Data.
Sir, I have modified the Method for my own uses. Since I have no emotional awareness to create a performance, I am attempting to use performance to create emotional awareness. I believe if I can learn to duplicate the fear of Ebenezer Scrooge, I will be one step closer to truly understanding humanity.
Captain Picard, please report to the Bridge.
On my way, Number One. Data, the moment you decided to stop imitating other actors and create your own interpretation, you were already one step closer to understanding humanity.
We've received an emergency transmission from the science station on Ventax Two, sir.
What's the nature of the emergency?
Uncertain. The signal was interrupted.
Contact reestablished with Ventax Two, sir.
On screen.
I am Doctor Howard Clark, director of the science station here on Ventax Two. Thank you for responding.
Worf, can you improve our reception?
The trouble is at the transmission source, sir.
Doctor Clark, we are barely able maintain communication with you. Can you boost the level of your power source?
I'm afraid not, Captain. It's under attack.
Under attack?
There's a mob outside the door, trying to break into the station. The planet is in chaos. Lootings, fires, mass hysteria. These people are all convinced their world is coming to an end. Tomorrow. Please, we must have your immediate
Captain's log, stardate 44474.5. We have reached Ventax Two and are attempting to contact the Federation science station, which at last report was under siege by an angry mob.
They are transmitting again.
On screen, before we lose contact.
Enterprise, Enterprise! Do you read me? Emergency! We need help!
Doctor Clark, this is Captain Picard. We are ready to beam you and your staff on board the
They're in!
Transporter room three. Lock onto the science team and beam them aboard.
I've locked onto Doctor Clark. I can't pick out the others. It's a mess down there.
Then beam Doctor Clark aboard by himself.
Yes, Captain.
Mister Worf, will you escort him to my ready room.
Aye, sir.
Number One, try to make some sense out of this mess.
The people in Ventax Two live in an agrarian society. At least, they do now.
What do you mean, now?
It's an interesting anthropological question. One we were studying before the trouble began. In the distant past, the Ventaxian culture had achieved an extremely advanced scientific level, but a millennium ago they turned their backs on technology.
They reverted to a simpler existence?
And remained that way for centuries. First contact was made by a Klingon expedition seventy years ago. Since then, the new technology has been available to the Ventaxians. They simply are not interested in it. Virtually no social problems to be found on this planet, In fact, I would have described their society as idyllic until
Until what, Doctor?
It's hard to believe. Several years ago, Acost Jared, the Ventaxian head of state, began to grow increasingly obsessed with the legend of Ardra. With each passing day, he grew more anxious, and he talked about little else. Ardra is coming back. Ardra will be here soon. We must all leave before Ardra returns.
And who is this Ardra?
For all intents and purposes, the devil. Captain, these people actually believe they've sold their souls to the devil.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Have you located the science team, Number One?
Evidently they're being held hostage.
Hostage?
There's a Ventaxian leader on the viewscreen, name of Acost Jared.
Doctor.
Jared, you must secure the release of my people. I can't believe you would allow this.
Howard, my friend, you know how I abhor all acts of violence, but events are out of my control.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Is there nothing you can do?
As the hour of Ardra's return approaches, fear has overwhelmed my people. It has been a thousand years. The prophecies have come true.
Prophecies?
Ardra's arrival was supposed to be heralded by the shaking of the cities. Now there has been a series of geological tremors on the planet. Minor quakes, nothing extraordinary.
Poorly timed.
There is more. For several nights there have been visions of Ardra. Again, just as the contract said would occur before her return.
Visions? Do you mean dreams?
No. She has appeared. I myself have seen her.
Jared, tell your people, if the hostages are released, I am prepared to offer Federation assistance should this, this Ardra return.
I am afraid it will not matter. They know your weapons are useless against her, Captain. I will make inquiries concerning the hostages. The innocent should not suffer from our sins. But I can make no promises.
This situation is deteriorating, Captain. The people are approaching levels of anxiety that could lead to suicide.
Mister Data, what do we know about this Ardra?
She is a cornerstone of Ventaxian theology. It seems that Ardra came to Ventax Two and promised one thousand years of peace and prosperity, for a price. Upon her return, she would enslave the entire population. In Ventaxian culture, it is considered bad luck to speak her name out loud. CLARK There are ancient scrolls concerning Ardra that are stored in the Athenaeum vaults. Scholars study them. They have been of little public interest until recently
I think I should meet with this Acost Jared. He's still our best hope for the release of the hostages.
I'll arrange to have him transported on board.
No. I'm going down to the planet myself.
Sir, you run the risk of being taken as an additional hostage
Mister Worf, you and Mister Data will accompany me. Mister O'Brien can keep a lock on our communicators. He can pull us out if necessary.
Yes, sir.
Counsellor, I want you to come too.
Captain Picard, you shouldn't have come. Your life is in danger here.
You must calm your people. There is no reason for panic.
No reason?
If the tremors have frightened people, leading to this hysteria over Ardra, let us reassure them.
We have scanned the tectonic stress patterns of your planet's crust. There is no evidence that the quakes pose any kind of threat.
No, no, no, the threat is from Ardra. You cannot understand.
If you can at least help us locate our people.
She is here.
Nonsense. It is only
Time's up. I'm disappointed. I expected my tenants to take better care of my property.
Ardra, most powerful one, I am Jared, Leader of Ventax Two. I take responsibility for all that displeases you. Please, do not punish my people.
Punish? Who said anything about punishing? I merely expect your end of our contract to be upheld.
Thank you, Ardra.
And don't talk like some ancient prophet around me, with thees and thous and most powerful ones. It was appealing for a few centuries, but I bore easily. And stop cowering. When I want you on your knees, I'll let you know.  Much better. a fine example for the others. Who would you be?
I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Keep up the good work. Now, the first thing we'll need is an accounting of all you've been accumulating for me.  This form will provide guidelines for a full census of the population, with emphasis on productivity and economic forecasts.
Who are you?
My, you are forceful, aren't you? Good. I like my men to be forceful. At least at the start.
If your intent is to intimidate, you are not succeeding.
That's all right. I like a challenge.
An entire planet has been terrorised because of the suggestion that you're going to enslave the population.
Well, it's true. Of course, I wouldn't put it so melodramatically. It's just a standard contract with an unusually long term.
So you do purport to be the mythic figure Ardra?
I have many names, my pale friend. I'm Mendora in the Berussian Cluster. Torak to the Drellians. The Klingons call me Fek'lhr.
You are not Fek'lhr.
FEK'LHR:Ah, but I am I am the Guardian of Gre'thor. Where the dishonoured go when they die.
But here on Ventax Two, I am called Ardra. The same Ardra who negotiated a contract with these people ten centuries ago today. Oh, you doubt me. A non-believer. Really, Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise, no doubt you have travelled the galaxy, encountered a diverse universe of creatures. Is there no room for the likes of me?
I have encountered many who more credibly could be called the devil than you.
The devil! Now there's one I haven't heard in a long time.
You claim you visited this planet a thousand years ago and negotiated a contract?
That's correct.
I would like to see that contract.
The scrolls of Ardra, Captain.
A long-winded description of a very simple business arrangement. I did away with their wars, famine and economic ruin, and provided them a thousand years of paradise. My terms were clearly stated. They went into this with their eyes open. I'm sure you'll find everything is in order.
You won't mind if I don't take your word for it? Jared, with your permission, I'd like Mister Data will review these scrolls thoroughly.
It is no longer my decision, Captain.
I have intrigued you, haven't I, Picard?
I am only here to secure the release of the Federation hostages.
Hostages? Is this true?
Yes, Ardra. Panic gripped the people as the time of your return grew closer.
Yes, I do have that effect on people. See that the hostages are released. Now.
Immediately.
Let us not cloud this with bit players, Picard. You will not leave because you find me irresistible.
Enterprise, advise Doctor Clark that the hostages are being released.
This is Clark. You did it, Captain. Thank goodness.
Goodness had nothing to do with it. Three to beam up. Mister Data will remain on the surface. Data, I want a complete report on the contents of these documents. I refuse to abandon this planet to that woman. Energise.
Could she be another refugee from the Q continuum?
For that matter, could she be Q?
Q would never bother with contracts.
Or economic forecasts.
I noticed that too, Counsellor. I had the distinct impression of in the presence of a flim-flam artist.
But her powers?
Her powers are, at the best, unclear. Think about it, Mister Worf. Transporter technology can make things appear and disappear. The illusion that she can transform herself into a Klingon creature could be created by holographic projection.
And creating a minor tremor could be the result of a low frequency tractor beam projected against the tectonic plates.
We are capable of recreating all of these events. It's just that she dresses them up and she delivers them with more dramatic flair.
Like a magician.
Exactly.
She has an incredibly focused mind. It was virtually impossible to sense any deception. Or anything else, for that matter.
The best magicians will never let you see what's up their sleeve, Counsellor.
She must be tapping into some sort of power source to produce these effects. She's not hiding that up her sleeve.
Number One, I want you and Mister Worf to run high resolution scans of this star system. Look for a ship, a base of operations, anything large enough to generate that power. Mister La Forge, accompany Doctor Clark back to the science station. See if you can trace the origin of these tremors.
Your chair offers a lovely view of my planet, Picard. Come, sit with me.
Either leave my Bridge or I will remove you by force.
By force? You disappoint me. You didn't strike me as that sort, Picard, But by all means, try.
Mister Worf.
I was really hoping you'd try it yourself.
Transporter room three, lock on to the intruder and transport her to the planet surface.
Aye, sir.
Ensign, put up the shields until further notice.
Yes, sir, Captain. Whatever you say.
We are not impressed by your magic tricks.
I pity you. We live in a universe of magic, which evidently you cannot see. Ah, my pale friend has returned. Have you finished examining the contract?
I have, sir.
Report, Mister Data.
The contract agrees to deliver the people of Ventax Two into the personal servitude of Ardra after one thousand years of peace. I have compared the terms to the body of laws which govern the planet. The language of the agreement is correct in every detail, sir.
Such speed and accuracy. You're much too talented to be human.
I am an android.
Android. Of course. How wonderful. An unexpected bonus.
Bonus?
Yes. When the contract came to term, I gained clear title to the planet, anything on the surface, in the air or in orbit. So you see, the Enterprise belongs to me now as well.
I'm afraid the contract could be interpreted in that way, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. Although I consider this woman's claim upon my ship to be an empty threat, it has further inspired my determination to expose her for the fraud she is.
Come.
You wished to see me, sir?
Yes, Mister Data. A wise man once said, there is a sucker born every minute.
Barnum, sir. PT.
I've been examining the dynamics of what used to be called the con game. Quite fascinating. Worthy of your study, Data.
Sir, do you believe Ardra is, to use the vernacular, a con artist?
Yes, I do, Data. And I believe it is our job to out-con the con artist.
Sir, I must point out that the Ventaxians did have one thousand years of peace and tranquility as promised by Ardra.
We can only speculate what occurred on that planet a thousand years ago. Maybe a Ventaxian leader saw the destruction of his society at hand and he conceived this Contract of Ardra to motivate change. Or maybe there was an Ardra of some sort who is the basis of this mythology. Who knows? The point is that somehow a fundamental theology was created which transformed this society, but in the process of change, created this latent fear which has been passed down through generations. Data, from your own experience of performing Ebenezer Scrooge, you're aware how fear can be a very powerful motivator.
Indeed, sir. In the story, the spirits used fear to motivate Scrooge to reform his character.
And in the hands of a con artist, fear can be used to motivate obedience, capitulation, the exploitation of innocent people. And that is what I believe has happened here. I intend to prove that. I need to find a loophole, some way of challenging the validity of this contract.
Sir, the language of the contract seems carefully chosen to avoid any loopholes.
Check it again, Mister Data, and check every Ventaxian legal precedent for the last one thousand years. We'll talk again in the morning.
Aye, sir,
Picard to Bridge. Intruder alert. Picard to Bridge.
Oh, I've arranged for a bit of privacy.
Just the two of us.
This is becoming very tiresome.
Oh, come now, Picard. You know you find me tantalising. Give in to your desires.
You know, there's nothing about you I find tantalising. On the contrary, I find you obvious and vulgar.
Easily fixed.  I can be your ideal woman, Picard. Prim and proper. And chaste, until I succumb to your charms. Or would your fantasies turn more toward a professional woman, one perhaps who wears a Starfleet uniform? Perhaps I could even be
Someone close at hand and yet unattainable. I can do anything for you, Captain. Anything you could ever imagine.
I could give you a night that would light fire in your dreams until you die and you would reject me?
Oh, yes.
You shall regret that.
I think not.
Oh, but you will.
Captain Picard? Captain, I wasn't expecting you here.
Neither was I.
La Forge to Enterprise.
Go ahead.
Worf, Captain Picard is here.
You'd better transport him back on board.
The Captain? But I have no
It's all right, Mister Worf.
Ardra somehow transported me here. Will you beam me directly to my quarters.
Aye, sir. We're locked on to you.
Transporter is malfunctioning, Captain.
Some sort of interference. Checking.
Just have Mister Data fetch me in a shuttle. And have him bring along a uniform.
Did you say uniform?
Yes, I did.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge and Doctor Clark have made no headway. Commander Riker and Lieutenant Worf have picked nothing up anything on their scans.
Sir, I believe I have found an obscure precedent in Ventaxian law which may be of interest.
Yes?
The case involves a contract dispute over services rendered by a Klingon craftsman on the construction of a Ventaxian home. Because the dispute involved an alien culture, the parties decided that arbitration rather than the courts, should resolve the issue. Both sides agreed to choose an arbiter. It is the only known case involving an alien claimant.
That's exactly what I needed. Well done, Data.
Shuttlecraft One to Enterprise. Prepare for docking sequence
Proceed, Shuttle One.
Enterprise. Enterprise, do you read me? Enterprise, come in.
I cannot locate the Enterprise anywhere within one light year of the planet, sir.
I don't believe Ardra is capable of transporting the Enterprise a light year away. Keep hailing them, Mister Data. Repeat on all frequencies.
Hey, I think we've found something here. There's a sudden jump in Z-particle readings just about the time the Enterprise disappeared.
Where did it originate?
It was too brief to pinpoint.
But it could suggest a hidden power source.
Gentlemen, we need to find that source if we are to defeat this woman.
Well, if you can get her to perform a few more magic tricks like that one, we just might be able to track it down.
So, I trust you have a bit more respect for me now.
What have you done with my ship?
I've done nothing with your ship. My ship is safely in my possession.
I do not recognise your claim on the Enterprise. Nor on this world, for that matter. In accordance with Ventaxian legal precedent, I call for an arbitration.
An arbitration? There's nothing here to arbitrate.
Oh, but there is. You're a fraud, madame, and I intend to prove that you could not have affected the changes that took place on this planet.
Do you not believe what you see with your own eyes? Your ship is gone, Captain.
An illusion. Magicians have been making things of all sorts disappear for ages.
You underestimate me. But then, most people do, until it's too late.
If you are who you say you are, then you have nothing to lose.
I also have nothing to gain. I already have possession of this planet and your ship.
I am prepared to offer an added incentive. If you win, I'll take you to the ruins of Ligillium.
The Zaterl Emerald? You know where it is?
Yes, I do.
Oh, you are too clever. But I have enough jewels. If you wish this foolish arbitration, I will choose my own prize.
And what would that be?
You. By all rights, your body is already mine, but I want more. I want your heart, your mind, your soul, and I want you to give them to me without resistance, of your own free will. So, do you still wish to pursue this most dangerous game?
I agree to your terms.
Oh, Picard, I will enjoy you morning, noon and night.
But we must agree to an arbiter.
Very well. I choose Mister Data. Any objections?
But Mister Data is a member of my crew.
Of my crew. And he's an android. He is incapable of deceit or bias. He has no feelings to get in the way of his judgment.
Ardra, before he responds, may I have a word in private with Captain Picard?
Sir, I request you reject me as arbitrator.
Why?
Ardra is right. If I am chosen, I will perform my duties without bias or sentiment. I cannot guarantee I will deliver a verdict in your favour.
Data, where else on this planet can I find someone she cannot intimidate?
Sir, I will have to follow the rules of conduct for a Ventaxian jurist.
I understand. You'll make a fine judge.
A thousand years ago our planet was dying. Overcrowded and dangerous city states warred unceasingly with each other. The air and water were polluted with industrial waste and there was a constant threat of starvation and epidemic.
And then what happened?
And then you came.
Objection. There is no conclusive evidence that this woman ever visited the planet a thousand years ago.
I suppose you want a thousand year old witness?
That would be acceptable.
Jared. In the contract, does it specify how you would know me when I return?
Yes by the date.
Anything else?
by the shaking of the cities, and by the visions.
And all of these occurred on schedule?
Yes.
Thank you. Your honour, I submit that I have established my identity as stated by the contract.
Captain Picard, my interpretation of Ventaxian law suggests under these circumstances, this is acceptable. Your objection is overruled.
But, your honour!
Sir, I have ruled. Please sit down. You may proceed.
Thank you, your Honour. Now, when I first set foot on Ventax Two, what did I offer your people?
According to the scrolls, you offered us a thousand years of peace and prosperity, if we would promise to surrender ourselves to you at the end of the term.
Now why do you think they would strike such a bargain?
We had nothing to lose. There was no hope in sight.
Until I came along.
Objection!
I withdraw the observation. No further questions.
Your Honour, nothing in this testament proves that Ardra had the power to affect the lives of the Ventaxians. My opponent has failed to prove her case and I move that her claim be summarily dismissed.
I find no cause to invalidate the contract at this time. The arbitration will continue.
Your Honour, Captain Picard as a new visitor to my planet has been a consistent doubter of my abilities. I would like to ask him a few questions, if I may.
It is highly irregular to question the opposing advocate, but I see no reason to deny it. Proceed.
Please don't take any offence at these questions, you know how fond I am of you.
Objection.
Sustained. The advocate will refrain from expressing personal affections for her opponent.
You do not believe my powers are real, do you.
No, I don't.
Then, sir, may I ask you to explain this.
You are out of order.
Or this?
The advocate will refrain from making her opponent disappear.
Or this?
Can you explain it, Picard?
Any more disruptions and I will rule you in contempt of court. Is that understood?
I am sorry, your Honour, but can you explain it, Picard? Yes or no.
No.
I rest my case, your Honour.
The decay rate of these Z-particles makes it almost impossible to trace the source.
I'm correlating particle trajectories. They're beginning to align. Wait a minute. I have coordinates thirty four degrees north, sixty two degrees east, at an altitude of two hundred ten kilometres.
That would put it in orbit above the western magnetic pole, Running visual scan. Nothing.
This time, I don't buy the magic. Something's got to be there.
Jared, you've described quite thoroughly the history of your people before and after Ardra's first visit. But I am a little unclear about the change itself. Did Ardra simply snap her fingers and transform the planet into this paradise?
No, the changes occurred gradually over a long period of time.
Did she personally form the government that so peacefully ruled this planet for a millennium?
No, historical records indicate a council was convened to assess our options. They drew up a new constitution which the population later ratified.
I see. So she advised this council?
No.
No? Then she must have destroyed all the weapons on the planet.
No, our leaders did that. And they signed a treaty of non-aggression.
Well then, let's move on to the environmental gains on Ventax Two. How were those accomplished
We shifted our economy from an industrial to an agrarian base. It was more ecologically sound.
But Ardra must have purified the polluted water and air?
No, the record shows there were a series of initiatives covering everything from atmospheric contaminants to waste disposal.
Did she not even pick up one piece of trash?
Ardra had left Ventax Two before the environmental reforms began.
Forgive me, but it sounds as if with a great deal of hard work and courage, your ancestors changed this world all by themselves.
Objection. The advocate is drawing conclusions.
Sustained. I will draw my own conclusions, if you do not mind. Sir.
No further questions.
Rebuttal?
Just two questions. Is there any doubt in your mind, any doubt at all, that if I had not intervened, the terrible conditions here would have continued? I remind you that you're under oath.
No doubt at all.
Then, as former head of state for the Ventaxian people, you are satisfied that I fulfilled my part of the bargain?
Yes, Ardra.
Thank you. Your Honour, what more can be said? Both sides agree the terms of the contract have been fulfilled.
Captain Picard, do you have any further evidence to present before I render judgment?
I believe my associate, Mister La Forge, may be bringing the answer to that question. I request a recess.
Hi, Data.
Geordi. One hour recess is granted.
Mister La Forge, my reputation as a litigator, not to mention my immortal soul, is in serious jeopardy.
Well, whatever's been going on over here gave us exactly what we needed.
Have you identified the source of her power?
A cloaked ship.
She has a Romulan cloaking device?
More likely a bad copy of one. We picked it up through a wavelength stretchout.
The Enterprise?
Exactly where it's supposed to be. Ardra extended her cloaking shields around it, set up a subspace damping field to interfere with normal operations. I've isolated the frequency spread and penetrated the field.
Can you make contact?
Already have.
This is what I want to do, but we have less than an hour.
Jared, you're a wise and experienced leader, and I assume you trust your senses?
Yes, I would say so.
And all your senses tell you that this woman here is the most powerful force on this planet, don't they?
Yes.
Then what would you say if I were to tell you that she has no powers whatsoever?
But we have seen her powers here.
That's right, and you will again.
Oh, yes. Ardra's magic. Jared, would you believe me if I told you that I could steal her powers and perform the same magical acts as she?
I'm sorry, Captain Picard, but you are not Ardra.
No, that's true. I'm not Ardra. but I can create tremors just as she did.
Objection, your honour!
I think he deserves some leeway. Overruled. But that will be quite enough, Captain.
Of course. Ardra, will you would do the honours and stop the tremors?
Er, of course.
Is something the matter?
I like the tremors.
Well, I don't.
You Recognise the old bag of tricks? What about this one?  Come back, Ardra, if you can. No? Fine, allow me
Of all the impudence.
Impudence?
FEK'LHR:Impudence is pretending to be Fek'lhr of Klingon.
Your leeway has run out, Captain.
Your Honour, I appreciate your indulgence. Allow me to explain. A team from the Enterprise has taken control of this woman's ship now in orbit around Ventax Two. Thank you for your help, Number One.
Glad to be of service, sir.
They have been monitoring me on my communicator, executing a prearranged programme on her ship's computer, a fairly ingenious combination of force-field projection, holography and transporter effects. Ardra controls her magic literally by the blink of an eye. Centuries old technology. An implant which permits the movements of her eye to choose and activate each illusion. Ardra once told us that she is known by many names. Well, at least in that she was being honest. Her crew has admitted that she is known by twenty three aliases in this sector alone.
You had no right
Deceiving innocent people with her petty schemes for years. Ventax Two must have offered her the greatest opportunity of her nefarious career. She learned of the myth of Ardra, studied it and expertly played on your fears that your people were ready to virtually surrender to her.
Your Honour, under the circumstances, I believe it is only fair that I release the Ventaxians from their obligation and I will let them keep the peace they have, and I will just be on my way.
With the advocate's withdrawal, the contract is hereby dissolved. This arbitration is adjourned.
Thank you, Captain Picard. You saved our lives.
No, Jared. As I've tried to tell you, you saved your own lives a long time ago.
Congratulations, sir.
Your Honour.
You would have had a lot more fun if you'd lost. Till we meet again, Jean-Luc Picard of the Starship Enterprise.
There she is.
Enlarge. What is their course?
They are now angling through that solar system, Captain.
Identify.
Listed as Delphi Ardu, sir. Eleven planets, unexplored.
Stay with them, La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Sensors read a power surge from their last manoeuvre, Captain.
They are dropping to subwarp speed.
Reduce to impulse power.
Sensor record fluctuations in the energy readings from it, Captain.
Possibility, a malfunction in their engines, sir.
Breaks my heart.
In visual range, Captain.
Fully enlarge.
Hello, stranger.
Very impressive design.
Anything on that design, Data?
Nothing specific, sir. As you know, Ferengi technology is estimated to be generally equal to our own.
But that does not mean identical, however.
Correct, sir. We are no doubt advanced in some areas, they in others.
Showing another power surge, sir.
They are firing on us.
Damage report?
Shields holding.
Mostly electromagnetic, sir. Fusion generator and batteries down by thirty percent.
Our impulse engines are surging now.
They're firing again.
Deflector shield power weakening, Captain. Phasers ready. Photon torpedoes ready.
Do we return their fire, sir?
Negative, Number One. They're just reacting to our close pursuit. Fall back a bit but stay with them.
They are slowing too, sir.
They may be turning to fight.
Open hailing freq.  Why are we gaining on them? Don't anticipate.
I'm not, sir. Something's wrong.
Sir, something is dragging us forward.
I read that, too. Lieutenant Yar, what do your sensors show?
Not certain, sir. I'm getting very confusing readings.
Captain, this shouldn't be. Our ship's power systems are failing.
Deflector shield failing. Phasers going inoperative, Captain.
Captain, something is completely immobilising us.
Immobilised by the damn Ferengi.
We need more information. What the hell are they are using?
Obviously we've underestimated their technology, Captain.
Considerably. It appears the Ferengi have us right where they want us. In their sights. Are you searching all frequencies? Any sign of any kind of messages?
Negative, sir.
Weapons report, Lieutenant.
I have phasers and torpedoes armed, but I show insufficient power to fire them.
Engineering, give me status on power recovery. Engineering, come in. Why aren't they answering? La Forge.
Sir.
Get me a full report from Engineering.
Aye, sir.
It's impossible they could be draining all power from all systems.
Counsellor?
I'm sensing nothing from them Captain. Which could mean they can shield their thoughts and emotions from others.
It still makes it our move.
Sir, they may know as little about us as we do about them.
Except that they know they've got us in deep trouble.
If so, the question becomes how will they use that knowledge? Data, do you have any information touching this on any file?
None, sir. Only hearsay and third hand reports, most of which conflict.
Which reports do not conflict?
That the Ferengi are, well, the best description may be traders.
What kind of traders?
A comparison modern scholars have drawn from Earth history likens the Ferengi to the ocean-going Yankee traders of eighteenth and nineteenth century America, sir.
From the history of my forebears. Yankee traders.
Who in this case sail the galaxy in search of mercantile and territorial opportunity.
And are those scholars saying the Ferengi may not unlike us?
Hardly, sir. I believe this analogy refers to the worst quality of capitalists. The Ferengi are believed to conduct their affairs of commerce on the ancient principle caveat emptor. Let the buyer beware.
Yankee traders. I like the sound of that.
Well, sir, I doubt they wear red, white and blue, or look anything like Uncle Sam.
Engineering? Join La Forge down below in Engineering, Number One.
Aye, sir.
Without warp capacity, we're just a floating target.
Uncle who?
What have bright, primary colours got to do with it?
I understand the allusion. Colours representing countries at a time when they competed with each other. Red, white and blue for the United States. Whereas the French more properly used the same colours in the order of blue, white and red.
And the German nation red, black and gold. The Italians green, white and red. The British
That's enough, Data.
It was you who
We're discussing the Ferengi. I wish I had some clue as to what they will do next.
Given what is now happening to our ship, sir, their weapons could be vastly superior to ours.
Yes, Data, that is a natural assumption. Engineering?
Bottom line, La Forge.
It's not good, sir. The Ferengi forcefield that holds this ship compensates almost as fast as we can increase power.
Almost?
Well, there's a point three hundred seventy two millisecond delay between use of our power and the neutralising counter force of the Ferengi. See, we push and they push back in equal force, sir.
What's our acceleration delay between slow-reverse impulse and top warp speed?
That's point three-hundred milliseconds. There's  Ah, I see where you're going. We shift down and then kick hard into warp nine. Yeah! Come back fighting! whooey!
Can we do it, Geordi?
Ask me after it's done, sir.  I want a slow reverse into drop off over five minutes. We'll show them what this baby can do, sir.
Give me everything you've got.
Aye, aye, sir.
In a sudden, abrupt power surge to high warp speed, Captain, we may be able to break loose from that Ferengi forcefield.
I wonder what they're thinking over there.
They're wondering what we're going to do next.
I say fight, sir. There's nothing shameful in falling before a superior enemy.
And nothing shameful in a strategic retreat, either.
All systems ready, Captain. And communication now restored to Engineering.
Excellent, La Forge. Now let's, er, let's throw them off guard. Lieutenant Yar. Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
At least we won't begin with weakness. Attention Ferengi starship! This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise. In the name of the United Federation of Planets, I demand you return the T9 energy converter you removed from Gamma Tauri Four. Send that in all language forms.
All language forms, sir.
Sometimes, Riker, the best way to win a fight is not to be there.
Yes, sir. He will triumph who knows when to fight and when not to fight.
Glad the Academy's still teaches the strategies of Sun Tzu. This delay had better prove out, LaForge.
Point three hundred milliseconds, sir.
Let's blast full power into warp nine. Ready?
On your command, Captain.
On a count of three. Stand by on phasers. One, set warp to nine. Two, divert shield power to the main engines. Three.
Merde. Shields up.
Captain, I think you had better see this.
What's wrong?
Someone is reading every file, every bit of information stored in the Enterprise memory banks.
They can do that?
And more, perhaps.
Captain, if I may recommend? With our attention on the Ferengi vessel, we have ignored the planet.
Data, consult the charts on this planet. See what we've got on it. Conference evaluation.
So, while we still have some power left, it is time for difficult decisions. Opinions please.
I say put all available power into a full-out combined phaser and photon torpedo salvo. Destroy their ability to sustain this forcefield, sir.
Yes! Hit them hard and hit them fast.
Impractical and provocative. Even assuming that we have the power to sustain such a tactic.
But Captain, isn't firing on us an act of war?
The facts are the Ferengis did fire at us, but we were chasing them. Since then, all they've done is searched our computers, trying to learn who and what we are.
Your point, Counsellor?
Let's talk to them.
It's been tried. No response.
But did we tell them anything they wanted to hear?
La Forge? Other opinions? Thank you for your advice.
Will? I haven't had your assessment.
I believe we've covered every available alternatives, Captain. Are there other options that you want to analyse?
The only one remaining is the one that needs no conversation. The only one we must avoid.
Sir?
The one that leads to total annihilation.
Open hailing frequencies.
Open, sir.
Attention, Ferengi starship. This is Captain Picard. It is obvious that we are in a situation here which needs resolving, and we are willing to do whatever is required, whatever is necessary. I would like, I would request, that you present your terms to us.
Captain's log, stardate 41386.5. It is with a heavy heart that I have offered to meet whatever reasonable and necessary terms are demanded by the Ferengi. I fear for my people and my vessel in the event the unknown Ferengi ask the unreasonable. How can I oppose even unreasonable demands?
It's moving, sir.
We ask to surrender and now they fire on us?
Ready torpedoes, sir? We have enough power for a few of them.
Ready, but hold on ready. Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Ferengi vessel, we are awaiting your response.
Suggest first strike, sir. Our shields now only have sixty three seconds of power left before lowering.
If the Ferengi ship's sensors can read us, sir, they will be waiting until we are most vulnerable.
I'm afraid I agree, Captain. They have not responded.
We'll wait a bit more, Number One.
Fifty seconds.
Patience. Patience.
The quicker we can come to terms, the better, NCC 1701-D.
Who is speaking?
I am Tarr. DaiMon of the Ferengi. You wish to discuss surrender, Captain Picard?
What I said, DaiMon Tarr, is
Unconditional surrender, I warn you, is totally unacceptable! We will die to the last one of us before such dishonour!
Hailing frequencies closed, sir.
Something has seized their ship too. They're in the same predicament as us.  Launch a sensor probe. Set it to search for the source of whatever this something is that is holding both ships. Go back to hailing frequency, fast. And I regret, DaiMon Tarr, that I can no longer negotiate unless it is conducted visually.
Your complete message not received, Enterprise, but visual communication is against our custom.
And it is against Starfleet orders to accept a surrender otherwise. Do you withdraw your surrender?
You give us no choice, Enterprise. May we have a visual on you as well?
Agreed, DaiMon Tarr. You should be able to view us now. Are we on your screen?
Yes. The ugliness of the human was not an exaggeration. I do not know how your twisted alien culture has paralysed our vessel, but I concede your Enterprise is superior. We will return your worthless T9 device and we offer the life of our second officers as required by the Ferengi code.
Fortunately, Starfleet has no such rules involving our second officers.
Is this to your satisfaction, Picard Captain?
Your offer may be inadequate, but I will discuss it with my staff. Stand by for further communications.
Matthew! Pola! You know this area is off limits. Come on, come on.  Boys will be boys, Captain.
Lieutenant, have you launched the probe?
Aye, sir. We should getting those readings soon.
Well, if we're not holding the Ferengi and they're not holding us, who the hell is?
The probe will give us some of those answers, sir.
Data, you were going to show us something.
As requested, Captain, library computer information on this planet. It has been charted only from long range scans. It is Class M, but shows no indications of life forms, sentient or otherwise. However, you may find this of interest. Resolving it into our language.
The centre of a huge space federation, a population of trillions.
Trillions? I've never heard the word Tkon before.
Understandable. It has been extinct six hundred thousand of our  of our years. These planets were once outposts of that empire.
Data, what are you doing?
Apologies, Captain. I seem to have reached an odd functional impasse. I am stuck.
Then get unstuck and continue with the briefing.
Yes, sir. That is what I am trying to do, sir, but the solution eludes me.
My hero.
Continue, Commander.
Intriguing. It describes the Empire as being highly advanced and powerful, and capable of actually moving stars.
Stars whose planets are their defence system?
Correct, sir. Outposts. The planet below was possibly one of them.
Excuse the interruption, Captain, but this may be worth it. We're now receiving a signal from the probe.
We'll take it here.
Incredible!
There's our mysterious something, Captain. It is a forcefield of some kind.
Reaching up from the planet surface. Amazing power. Data, what does the legend say about the end of the Tkon Empire?
Their sun went supernova, sir.
Could this planet have escaped that?
This planet may have been the most distant outpost, sir, but it shows no life form readings.
We should take a look at it, Number One. Stand by with an away team.
And if the Ferengi also realise the forcefield emanates from the planet, sir?
That's a complication. Maybe we should ask them to join us in this.
Team up with the Ferengi, sir?
We've been ordered to learn all we can about them. Do you know a better way?
Data.
Captain's log, supplemental. In orbit of a mysterious planet, whose unexplained forcefield has seized us with a power almost beyond imagination. If there is a solution to this, it almost certainly will involve cooperation from the Ferengi.
Ship's power drain is critical, Captain. I must now shut down our shields to maintain life support systems.
Understood. Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Ferengi vessel from Enterprise, come in.
Your alien images again shock us.
With regard to the surrender, DaiMon Tarr. The facts are somewhat different.
Our own probe has already shown us your trickery, human. We withdraw our surrender.
Agreed. Perhaps you would agree to a more productive relationship?
I prefer a more profitable one, human.
Yankee trader.
Explain what means yankee traders?
He heard that.
He recognises your interest in profit. Or is that an incorrect assumption?
We seek only what is equitable. What do you seek? Why did you begin by attacking us?
We did not attack you. We gave chase in order to recover a Federation-owned energy device which
Which we know is ours. Your barbarous Federation placed it on one of our planets!
On the contrary, Gamma Tauri Four is recognised by all civilised members of
The Ferengi are not uncivilised, human! Are you suggesting otherwise?
All I'm saying is that you removed something which clearly did not belong to you.
Are you now calling us thieves?!
On the contrary, I have no wish to discuss issues of property or of territory, when our mutual problem remains. Like it or not, we are both trapped by this energy draining forcefield from the planet.
On that matter there can be no argument.
I would like to propose a swap.
And what is a swap?
It's a trade, an exchange.
Yes, trade, human. What do you offer?
We will tell you what we know about the planet, and in trade, you will give us your information.
Ridiculous. How will we know you will not withhold information?
We must trust each other, Tarr.
Amusing, human. Trust each other?
I propose that we test this relationship by cooperating in a joint exploration of the planet surface.
And what profit is in this, Picard Captain?
The profit, DaiMon Tarr, of saving all our lives.
We will agree, no doubt foolishly. But you are warned that any further trickery on your part will be met with no mercy.
Agreed. If you care to join us, we have a well-proven transporter device
We have a matter-energy device of our own. We will beam a science team of three to whatever co-ordinates you propose.
Excellent. We will transmit the information shortly. Enterprise out.
Hailing frequencies off.
I would log that agreement as promising, at least.
I wonder, Captain. I'm not usually one for distrust at first sight, but this may be an exception.
Especially in view of the fact the image he transmitted, sir, was somehow distorted.
I sensed the same thing, Captain. He's hiding something.
With this power drain we can't delay. Now, I'd like some additional help in case we run into trouble. Can you spare Worf?
Take him. And be careful, Number One.
With this power drain, we may have trouble communicating with the Enterprise, sir.
Understood. Anything else?
Due to this forcefield, there is presently no way to beam us back, sir.
You had to ask.
Understood. Energise.
Tasha? Data? Geordi? Worf? Anybody?!
Data?
What are you doing up there?
Most intriguing, sir. I assume a problem of inaccurately transmitted programme coordinates due to the force field around the ship, sir. Are we alone, sir?
Unfortunately. Let's find the others. What do you make of these?
Crystalline. Mostly inert. Nothing to write home about.
Excuse me?
Slang, sir. I did use it correctly, did I not?
They've got to be around here somewhere.
What's that?
What?
That! Geordi!
Are you conscious?
Do I look conscious?
What are you doing?
I'm resting, sir. My foot's stuck. Up there. I materialized upside down above the planet surface.
Tricorder's useless, sir. Communication's gone too. Fortunately you did not break any
Data, who's that?
Who are you?
Captain's log, supplemental. It is now six hours since our away team beamed down to the planet surface. On the Enterprise, our condition is rapidly worsening. Ordinarily, with reserve power alone, we could maintain life support for several months. But the force holding has closed down all engines and is draining our reserve power too.
It's getting much, much colder, sir. How far down is it likely to go?
A lot. Even in orbital space it'll get below minus two hundred degrees.
We won't have to worry much past minus seventy or so.
Feels like that right now. Good. Thank you.
If he moves, kill him.
Letek, has what we've done broken our agreement with their captain?
We will accuse the humans of preparing to ambush us. It will be our word against theirs and who is more trustworthy, Mordoc?  It looks like gold. Tastes like gold.
It is gold.
Accursed planet!
It's nothing compared to what our Captain will do when he finds out you've broken our landing party agreement.
What part of the agreement? You appeared and attacked us. Are you one of their assassins?
I'm Commander William Riker, First Officer of the USS Enterprise. You have a lot to learn.
I've got this one!
Careful, Commander, they're much stronger than
Pygmy cretins!
Kill them.
Hideous monsters!
No!  Good, you've heard of phasers. Now, over there.
Is this a female?
A human female, Letek?
Yes, it is true. You work with females, arm them, and force them to wear clothing.
Sickening.
I've diverted the reserve power to the family decks. They'll last longest. Is there anything else we can do, Doctor? Where's Wesley?
He's in our quarters. I was tempted to give him a sedative.
You shouldn't.
I know, but he's my son. I love him.
He has the right to meet death awake.
Is that a male perspective?
Rubbish
Hold it right there! Stop. Stop!
Phasers on stun.
Already set.
What's going on?
What is this?
I believe we can deduce that these crystalline tree shapes are actually energy collectors.
Along the same principle as that which is draining energy from our ships.
But the Ferengi weapons were working when we first arrived.
Which means something new has happened.
I'm finally beginning to understand what my eyes have been showing me. It's patterns of force everywhere. This entire planet has been turned into a power accumulator.
And these?
It's the whole point of this place. I can see the planet's power emanating from. Commander.
Be you barbarians? Speak!
Who meets the challenge? Who will it be?
Him.
You have awakened Portal six three. Do you petition to enter the Empire?
Who asks the question?
A guardian of the Tkon Empire.
Biped. Excellent.
Why should we petition to entry to an empire that no longer exists?
Why do you attempt deception? The Empire is forever.
Your empire fell prey to a supernova.
We are forever.
Data, Please repeat the file.
It is a matter of record, Portal. In the Age of Makto, the central star of the Tkon Empire destabilised and
There has never been an Age of Makto.
In fact, there have been many ages which have come and passed since Makto.
This is the Age of Bastu!
I'm afraid not. According to the Tkon use of galactic motionary startime charts, after Bastu came Cimi, Xora, Makto
Enough! Absurdities!
You must have been asleep, Portal, for hundreds of thousands of our years.
Deception is the way of the human. We Ferengi will gladly make a petition.
We invite your petition.
Speak.
We wish to offer our services to serve the Tkon Empire at no profit. Return control of our starship to us and we will happily destroy the human criminals and their vessel which attacked us without provocation. They came to loot your empire, but we intercepted them.
You are accused of deceit and treachery. Do you give yourself up for judgement?
Yes. If you believe those accusations, then you certainly should act on them.
And there is even more. We can prove that the humans are destroyers of legal commerce, and that they selfishly withhold vital technology from backward worlds.
And necessary defensive weapons, too. We Ferengi now challenge this human madness.
I admit we withheld modern technology from some worlds.
You see? They are demented. Their values are insane. You cannot believe the business opportunities they have destroyed.
Proof of their barbarism. They adorn themselves with gold, a despicable use of a valuable metal. And they shamelessly clothe their females.
Inviting others to unclothe them. The very depth of perversion.
Paws off, Ferengi.
No female, human or Ferengi, can order Mordoc around! Submit!
Just try it, shorty.
At ease, Lieutenant!
And we still have more faults
They should add that Starfleet has permitted several civilisations to fall. We have at times allowed the strong and violent to overcome the weak.
They admit their crimes! Hear them! They admit the evil that they do!
Barbarian!
Yes, you show wisdom.
Barbarians all! But this one first, in the fashion the Empire has always challenged savages.
No! For battle, come to me!
No! That's an order.
You have a single chance for life. One only. What is the answer to my challenge? I offer a thought. He will triumph who knows when to fight and when not to fight. You are being tested, Riker! What is the answer?
How do you know my name?
Ahhh. You are facing fate with composure. But what is the answer to my challenge?
Fear is the true enemy, the only enemy.
Unlike these little ones who close their minds, your mind holds interesting thoughts. Know your enemy and know yourself, and you will always be victorious. Why that thought? And who is this Sun Tzu you revere?
An old Chinese philosopher from ancient Earth history.
You must tell me more of this wisdom, so much like our own.
Gladly. But first our starship. Can you release it?
It is released. All power is restored.
Not a moment too soon, Jean. I mean, Captain.
I admit I had my doubts as your ships battled each other in overt acts of belligerence. Normally, I would have destroyed all of you and your ships, but something confused me.
Which was?
First, you wanted to murder each other. Then you were willing to help each other.
What of our vessel? We knew the same answer.
The truth is, I gave those words to this human.
What of them? Shall I destroy them?
Then they would learn nothing.
A most interesting conclusion. But what if they will never learn, Riker?
Is this a test also?
In life, one is always tested.
I find them very much as we were a several hundred years ago, but possessing the technology they have now, they're very dangerous .
Untrue. We seek friendship with you.
But we can hardly hate what we once were. They may grow and learn.
And learn ways to destroy you.
Our values require us to face that possibility. What of you, with your empire gone?
The universe exists to me to create life. I shall sleep, until needed again.
Compliments, Lieutenant.
Thank you.
Lieutenant Worf.
You've done well.
Something to write home about.
Something to write home about? Data, that's very human.
The T9 energy converter has been beamed aboard and secured, sir. The Ferengi complained bitterly, but one final roar from Portal convinced them.
I commend your performance, Number One.
One final request, sir. Permission to beam a box of Data's Chinese finger puzzles over to the Ferengi. A thank you for all they tried to do.
Make it so.
Attention personnel on decks fourteen and fifteen. Your transporter room assignment has been changed. Report to transporter room three.
Captain. We're still behind schedule on decks seven and eight. Shall I tell Arkaria Base there'll be a delay?
No. Open up the transporters in Cargo bay two and divert everyone from deck seven to there. That should put it back on track.
Right.
All beta shift Engineering personnel are requested to report to main Engineering prior to disembarking.
Captain. Arkaria Base does not have the medical storage units I have requested. I have seven living tissue samples that won't survive the baryon sweep anymore than you or I would. I've tried to reason with them, but
All right, all right. Have Commander LaForge transport a stasis unit from the astrophysics lab. You should be able to convert it to store tissue samples.
Thank you, Captain.
All science personnel. Please check in with your section chief for station-side duty assignments.
Captain.  I was just heading for deck seven. I've put the auto-shutdown sequence on hold until we get back on schedule.
Oh, I think we can resume the sequence. Counsellor Troi is taking care of the situation on deck seven.
Aye, sir.
Captain.
Bridge.
It has been quite a day, has it not?
Yes, it has.
However, a change of routine is often invigorating and can be a welcome diversion after a long assignment.
Exactly.
I understand that Arkaria has some very interesting weather patterns.
Mister Data, are you all right?
Yes, sir. I am attempting to fill a silent moment with non-relevant conversation.
Small talk.
Yes, sir. I have found that humans often use small talk during awkward moments. Therefore, I have written a new subroutine for that purpose. How did I do?
Perhaps it was a little too non-relevant. But if you really are interested in small talk, then you should keep your eye on Commander Hutchinson at the reception this afternoon. He's a master.
Thank you, sir. I will.
Captain.
Captain.
After you, sir.
No, after you.
No sir. I believe you spoke first.
Gentlemen, gentlemen, we're running out of time. Mister Worf?
The computer needs your authorisation to disable command functions during the baryon sweep.
Are we ready, Commander La Forge?
Almost. I've requested two additional field diverters. One for the computer core and one for the Bridge. They haven't been installed yet.
Additional units?
Yes, sir. We've logged in five years more warp hours than most ships do in ten, so our baryon particle levels are high. I'm a little concerned that when the Remmler Array starts to sweep the ship it'll have to use a stronger beam than normal in order to get rid of all the radiation.
And that might overload the field diverters protecting our key systems. How long until the new ones are in place?
I'd say about twenty minutes.
Very well. Computer, disable all command functions in thirty minutes. Authorisation, Picard gamma six zero seven three.
Authorisation acknowledged.
Captain, incoming message. It's the station administrator, Mister Orton.
In my Ready room, Mister Worf.
Captain. Request permission to be excused from Commander Hutchinson's reception.
Permission granted. I wish I could excuse myself as well.
Captain, permission to be
Mister La Forge, I cannot excuse my entire senior staff. Mister Worf beat you to it.
Go ahead, Mister Orton.
Captain, if you're on schedule, I'd like to confirm that we'll begin the baryon sweep at fifteen hundred hours, approximately one hour from now.
Confirmed.
Commander Hutchinson also wanted me to make sure that you'll be able to attend his reception this afternoon.
Tell him I'm looking forward to it.
He'll be delighted to hear that. Arkaria Base out.
Tell Arkaria base that we're almost finished here.
We're going to need two more conduits.
I need to run a diagnostic on the diverter.
Get the diverter aligned so that we can begin the isolation procedure.
Where's the ODN interface?
Beverly. Lovely as ever. How do you manage it?
It's good to see you again.
It's been far too long. What is it, four years? Now I want to hear everything that happened after you left Starfleet Medical. And I have so much to tell you. Oh, that must be Commander Riker. Excuse me.
Of course.
Pardon me.
You must be Will Riker.
I must be.
Calvin Hutchinson. Call me Hutch. Calvin, awful name, I've never forgiven my parents. As soon as I saw you, I knew you had to be the Enterprise's First Officer.
Oh?
Of course. Your reputation proceeds you. Flashing blue eyes, square jaw. Quite the ladies man I hear. Now don't be modest, Will. May I call you Will?
Sure.
I also hear that you're a musician. I certainly hope you'll play something for us. It's not often we get to entertain the command crew of the flagship. Oh, and speaking of command. Hello, Captain Picard.
Commander.
I was just telling your First Officer what a real pleasure it is to have all of you here. So, how are you anyway?
Very well, thank you.
It is very good to see you both again. Beverly. May I call you Beverly? Beverly, have you noticed that the mean temperature here on Arkaria is slightly higher normal for human comfort levels? I have found that humans prefer a body temperature of twenty one degrees Celsius in order to operate most efficiently. However, there are several cultures who actually prefer that their body temperature is identical to the temperature of the room in which they are standing. The Sheliak, for example.
I'm telling you, you have never seen anything like this. There were thousands of these creatures. The whole northern sky turned dark. I
Oh, er, Geordi, Deanna. I don't think you've met our host. This is Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge, Counsellor Deanna Troi. This is Commander Hutchinson.
Oh, please, call me Hutch.
Hello.
I was just telling your captain about some of the fascinating sights here on Arkaria. Either of you interested in ornithology?
Er, well.
The mating habits of the Arkarian horn fowl are quite interesting. If the weather were better, we could take horses to the southern promontory and visit the nesting grounds.
Horses?
Yes. We have a network of trails through the plains. Unfortunately, it's not very pleasant right now. Cold, muddy. Not a soul for kilometres.
Sounds perfect. Mister La Forge, how long before the baryon sweep begins on the Enterprise?
About twenty five minutes, sir.
Then I have enough time to back to the ship and get my saddle.
Your saddle?
Yes. A saddle is a very personal thing. It has to be broken in, used, cared for.
You keep a saddle on board the Enterprise?
Oh yes, yes. I never know when I'll have the opportunity to ride.
I see.
It's perfectly normal. Most serious riders do have their own saddles.
Of course.
Absolutely.
Well, if you'll excuse me.
Amazing man. You know, he reminds me of another officer I knew years ago. A Captain Edwell. Now he was fascinating. Born on Gaspar Seven, but you wouldn't know it from the way he looked.
Auto-shutdown sequence in progress. Defensive systems offline. Baryon sweep begins in eight minutes.
What are you doing?
Someone left this ODN junction box open. I thought your crew was supposed to be off the ship once the field diverters were in place.
The diverters have to be synchronised. I was laser bonding a backup link.
I see. Well, I'd better let you finish up so you can get off the ship.
Excuse me a minute.
Auto-shutdown sequence in progress. Primary power offline in one minute.
Get Pomet started on it right away.
Primary power offline in thirty seconds.
Final warning. Primary power offline in ten seconds.
Hmm. Yes. I find it fascinating that your family chose to drop the prefix Pel from your surname. It was my understanding that Pel Orton is a more noble appellation on Arkaria than simply Orton.
Yes.
Perhaps the recent Arkarian trend toward a more egalitarian society is partly responsible, eh?
Perhaps.
The crew of the Magellan actually put on a talent show here. Captain Conklin did a poetry reading, if you can imagine that.
I'm trying to.
Did I ever tell you how I came to be stationed here? It's a fascinating story. I was serving on Admiral Mitchell's staff on Starbase ninety seven. Awful place, by the way.
Have you met our Commander Data?
As a matter of fact, I find it oddly amusing.
No, I don't think so.
I'll introduce you.
There are several cultures in this sector with extremely similar etymological histories. For example
Mister Data, I don't know if you've had a chance to meet our host, Commander Hutchinson. Call him Hutch. Lieutenant Commander Data, our second officer.
A pleasure.
The pleasure is mine, Hutch. I have been meaning to compliment you on your choice of colours here.
Oh, you really think so? It wasn't easy making a final decision, let me tell you.
I can well imagine. The light in this room would make colour selection exceptionally problematic.
Precisely.
Thank you.
You're welcome. I'm not sure which one to feel sorry for.
Mister Orton?
You'll excuse me, Commander.
Geordi, what happened to the Captain?
Oh, he went back to the ship to get his saddle.
His saddle?
Any serious rider would have his own saddle.
Oh.
Probably he went right to the stables. I bet he's ten kilometres from here already.
Lucky him. Thank you.
Kelsey to Devor. Devor, this is Kelsey. Reply. Devor, do you read me? Kelsey to Kiros.
This is Kiros.
Devor isn't responding. There must be too much interference from the baryon sweep. Go find him and see if he finished by passing the regulator on deck seven, then meet us in main Engineering.
Understood.
Hey. Hey. Who are you? What are you doing on my ship?
The baryon sweep uses a high-frequency plasma field. Your phaser won't work.
You're probably right. But I'd like to bet this will. A laser welder can be deadly. What's going on in main Engineering? I suggest that you cooperate.
You're Starfleet. You won't kill me.
You sure?
Seems you're right.
Yes, but Tyrellian laser art is very similar in both form and composition.
Of course. You know, funny you should mention that. I used to be stationed on Tyrellia.
Really? Did you know that there are currently five Tyrellians serving aboard the Enterprise.
That's fascinating. Not too many people know this, but Tyrellia is one of only three known inhabited worlds without a magnetic pole.
I was aware of that. But are you aware that Tyrellia is one of seven known planets with no atmosphere whatsoever.
Really?
They're still at it.
Non-stop. I have to admit it has a certain strange fascination. How long can two people talk about nothing?
Is something wrong?
I don't know. I was just getting some very strange energy readings from your table here.
I'm sure it's nothing serious. Perhaps the heating element under the table is malfunctioning.
Maybe I should take a look at it for you.
I'm sure we can handle this, whatever it is, Commander. There's no need to concern yourself.
Well, maybe I should look at the heating element. I mean, in case it
It's all right. Please, don't worry.
What was all that about?
I assure you it's all right. We'll look into it. You don't have to concern yourself.
Orton, now!
What is going on?
Stay right where you are.
Reduce the plasma pressure to zero point six percent nominal.
Zero point six.
How does the conduit look?
It's clear.
All right. The main plasma flow has been shunted to the aft conduit. We're ready here.
Okay. That should do it. I think.
Be sure, Neil.
Yes. Yes, that does it. All right. Transfer five hundred milligrams from the reserve system to the engine core.
Perfect.
Adequate. Disable the containment overrides and get the interlocks off the magnetic seal. Pomet, prepare the transport assembly. Keep watching the power flow. It might
Keep working. Where did he come from?
I found him on deck seven.
Who are you?
My name is Mot. I'm the barber.
The barber? What the hell are you doing here? Everyone was supposed to be evacuated to the surface.
Yes, I know. But I wanted to go riding, but I didn't have my saddle, so I went back to get it and
Your saddle?
Yes, that's right. It's on deck seven. I left it in the corridor. And then the power went out and I got lost
All right, all right, shut up. Shut up! Any sign of Devor?
No.
Satler. Get down here and keep an eye on our barber. All right, go see if you can find Devor. Make sure nothing's wrong.
Sit down.
All right. Just don't point that thing at me.
Just do what I tell you, and you won't have to worry.
How long until you're ready?
Forty, maybe fifty minutes.
The baryon sweep hits this compartment in thirty minutes.
The field diverter will protect us.
It's not us I'm worried about, it's that storage unit. I want the trilithium resin in there and secured before the sweep gets here. I don't want to take any chances.
Understood.
They haven't tried to communicate with the outside.
No demands, no political statements, no theft. They must want something.
Orton is not as calm as he looks. He's very agitated and nervous, as if something's gone wrong.
It is possible that Geordi upset their timetable when he saw the hidden weapons.
Orton may be improvising. Maybe he didn't plan to take us hostage so early and now he doesn't know what to do.
If they do not have a plan for this contingency, we may have the initiative.
Maybe, but we need to figure out how to use it. How is he?
There's no permanent damage. I've adjusted the optical transducer in his visor to block some of the pain receptors in his brain. It's only partially effective. I need to get him to a medical facility.
I doubt if they'll agree to that. But maybe if we tell them Geordi's dying, they would give us access to a medical kit. We might be able to use some of the tools to make a weapon.
Perhaps we can use the visor as a weapon. If the optical transducer were modified, we might be able to generate a hypersonic pulse.
A hypersonic pulse would overload the audio receptors of everyone in the room. It would cause immediate unconsciousness.
Can you make the adjustments on the visor by yourself? It'll look suspicious if you're both working on it.
I'll try. I might need Geordi to help me through some of it.
All right. Be as casual as you can. Let us know when you're ready.
Ready.
Begin draining the trilithium at one hundred milligrams per minute.
Neil, what's going on? Neil, get over here. Put that down.
Don't worry, I've got it. I'll be right there.
The primary inducer is completely fused. There's no way to fix it. Without the diverter, we don't have any protection from the baryon sweep.
I know that. How long before the baryon sweep gets here?
About twelve minutes. We should go to Ten Forward. That's the last place on the ship that'll be swept by the baryon field.
All right, we're leaving. But we're taking the trilithium with us.
What? Do you know how volatile trilithium is? We can't just start hauling it through the ship.
I'll, I'll try to make some modifications.
Satler's dead. He ran into the baryon sweep.
What about Mot?
I don't know. But I don't think he's a barber. I found this in the Jefferies Tube.
Kelsey to Kiros.
This is Kiros.
We have a problem. There's a Starfleet officer still on board. He's killed Satler and he may have killed Devor. He also destroyed the diverter in Engineering so we have to leave here before the baryon sweep enters this section.
What about the trilithium resin?
We're taking it with us to Ten Forward. There should be enough time before
Kelsey. Don't be a fool.
You know better than to try and move trilithium resin.
Mister Mot. Or should I call you Lieutenant? Lieutenant Commander perhaps?
You may call me whatever you wish.
Moving trilithium resin requires very specific equipment. You can't simply improvise something.
I wouldn't need to improvise if you hadn't damaged our field diverter. But if you're so concerned about the trilithium
I suggest you stop interfering with us
Before you set off an explosion that would destroy the Enterprise and you.
I would rather destroy the ship than allow that material to fall into the hands of terrorists.
What makes you think I'm a terrorist?
Trilithium resin is a highly toxic waste product produced by our engines.
It's only possible use could be as a weapon.
You might be right, Mister Mot, but we've been planning this for a long time, and I doubt that you'll really be able to stop us.
Or even slow us down.
There. Three hundred milligrams of trilithium. I'm using a dynamic stabiliser to act as a control rod. There. That should keep the resin stable enough for transport.
Come on! Don't be so tense, Neil. If something goes wrong, you won't have time to worry about it. Let's go.
Three more decks, then we take corridor fifteen B all the way to Ten Forward.
What's wrong?
We have to find another way up. The rungs are cut.
That wasn't very clever, Mister Mot.
If you knew where we were, you should have attacked us. Now we'll just take another route. One you might not be able
To predict.
There are only so many ways to Ten Forward. Ten Forward is the logical place to be if you want to stay ahead of the baryon sweep.
That sweep is just as big a threat to you as it is to us. In fact, if I were you, Mister Mot
I'd be trying to find a way off this ship.
I plan on leaving the same way you do. On your ship.
What ship?
Come on, Kelsey.
If you've been planning this so long, you must have a way of getting off the Enterprise and leaving this system. I think you have a ship coming for you. I plan to be on it.
It's a small ship, Mot. I don't think there's going to be room for both of us.
I'm sorry to hear that. I'll send your regrets.
How is he, Doctor?
He's in a lot of pain, but I think he should be fine. He needs some water. Is that all right?
We're almost ready. When we set the visor to emit the hypersonic pulse, there'll be a short burst of light. We need a distraction.
They need a distraction.
How long?
Just a few seconds.
I think I can distract Orton for a few seconds.
I don't think Orton's in a talking mood, Will.
You just have to know how to talk to him. Orton, I think we need to discuss the situation.
There is nothing to discuss. Sit down.
There's a lot to discuss. Can't we be reasonable?
I am not interested in hearing your hostage negotiation tactics, Commander.
It can't hurt you to listen, can it?
All right.
Thank you. Now, the first thing I think we need to discuss is this.
Hold it. Put your weapon down. Kelsey, this is Kiros. I'm on deck ten.
I have Mott.
Is he alive?
Yes.
Good. Meet us at intersection forty one.
Understood.
This way. Move.
Give me the trilithium.
How much farther do we have to go?
Not far. With all the modifications you've made to this unit, are we going to have any troubles removing the trilithium?
No. Just remove the control rod, drain the unit. There shouldn't be any problem.
That's all I wanted to know.
Well, not as clever as you thought. Where's Pomet?
He shot him with some kind of an arrow.
He's not dead.
Well, he will be soon. The sweep's nearly here. We don't have time to go back for him.
What about Neil?
The sweep got him. Let's go.
I thought you were just going to talk to him.
I did. He just didn't like what I had to say.
That was a perimeter warning from the Remmler Array. A small ship is approaching. I believe Mister Orton has dropped his defence shields.
This must be the sign they were waiting for. Mister Data, you will be the only one unaffected by the hypersonic burst. As soon as every else is unconscious, I need you to get to the computer panel and stop that ship somehow.
I will try, sir.
Now.
Kelsey, perhaps we can work out a deal.
You're the only one who needs a deal, Mot.
My name isn't Mot. It's Jean-Luc Picard.
Captain Picard. This is all beginning to make sense.
Leave the trilithium here and take me with you. You can use me as a hostage instead of threatening
I'm not a terrorist Captain, nor do I have a political agenda, although I know some people who do have agendas. And they are very interested in this little container.
Profit. This is all about profit.
I prefer to think of it as commerce. Open the door. Now go through, slowly.
I guess, I'll be the one to send your regrets.
Picard to Arkaria base. Deactivate the baryon sweep. Arkaria Base, this is Captain Picard on board the Enterprise. Deactivate the baryon sweep!
Arkaria Base, this is Captain Picard. Deactivate the baryon sweep immediately!
Data to Captain Picard. Do you read me, sir?
Picard here.
Are you all right, Captain?
Yes, Mister Data.
Sir, an unidentified
Scout ship has just beamed someone off the Enterprise.
Do you know anything about it?
I know they won't get very far.
Hold still. You have got a nasty little cut here.
Any luck?
I'm sorry, Captain. I don't know what could have happened to it.
Hold still. I can't heal this cleanly if you don't stop fidgeting.
I've had three security teams search deck seven. They couldn't find anything.
There.
I found it. Someone put it in a maintenance locker.
Thank you.
Captain, you keep a saddle on board?
Mister Worf, I'm surprised at you.
Anyone who is an experienced rider naturally has his own saddle.
It's perfectly normal.
Actually, it came in handy. I only wish I'd had the opportunity to use it on a horse.
Of course.
You were like a brother to me. Do you remember? We used played in the park near the lake.
Yes, of course. Every summer, you came to Bergerac.
You used to make swords out of the reeds, and when you cut your hand you would come running to me, and I would say, Let me see. Oh! How did you do that?
Playing near the Porte de Nesle.
And how many did you plat against?
No more than a hundred.
Tell me!
No.
Let it go.
What?
Let it go.
Let it go. Let it go. You tell me what you were going to say. Do you dare?
I do dare. I love someone.
Ah!
He does not know.
Ah!
Not yet. But he is proud, noble, brave and beautiful.
Beautiful?
What's the matter?
With me? Nothing. It is my hand. He is in the Guards?
Since this morning. Baron Christien de Neuvillette. In your own regiment.
Ah.
Promise me. Promise me to be his friend.
I promise.
Oh, I love you. I must go now. Oh, and tell him to write me. A hundred men! What courage!
Oh, but I have done better since.
Bravo!
Wonderful! Wonderful.
Lieutenant Barclay's performance was adequate, but clearly not rooted in The Method approach. I do not understand why.
Data, because it's polite.
Good job, Reg. And only what, six weeks of lessons.
Good job, period.
We have a patient teacher.
Ah, Worf, I have an opening in my workshop.
Well done.
Thank you, Counsellor.
You've come a long way, Reg.
After more rehearsals than I can count.
I don't just mean your acting ability. It takes a great deal of courage to put yourself on display like that.
You think so?
There was a time when nothing could have dragged you onto a stage in front of an audience. You've made tremendous progress.
I, I guess.
Don't you think so?
Well, I just feel more more comfortable playing somebody else. Maybe all this is not any better than escaping into a holodeck fantasy.
I disagree. This isn't fantasy, it's theatre. You used to withdraw onto the holodeck. You isolated yourself inside your own imagination, avoiding contact with real people. Look at yourself now. Look at all the other people you're with. You're not just acting, you're interacting. Give yourself some credit, Mister Barclay.
Maybe you're right.
Captain's log, stardate 44704.2. We have arrived at the Argus Array, a remote subspace telescope at the very edge of Federation space. The unmanned structure mysteriously stopped relaying its data nearly two months ago.
The fusion reactors that power the array are extremely unstable. There is a high risk of overload.
What about the computer systems?
They do not seem to be functioning at all, sir.
Captain, I am picking up an unidentified device one point eight kilometres from the array.
On screen. Magnify.
That's some kind of probe. I'll bet that's what damaged the array.
Is it emitting any signals, Lieutenant?
Negative, sir. I show no activity.
Mister La Forge, why not go out and take a closer look.
Aye, sir. Lieutenant Barclay, report to the main shuttlebay.
Enterprise, this is shuttle five in position, ready to begin a short-range scan.
Proceed, shuttle five.
Reg, why don't we begin with the passive high-res series, all right?
Electromagnetic band?
Give it a try.
I'm picking up visual wavelengths only. Between forty five hundred and seven thousand angstroms.
Let's try the neutron densitometer.
Nothing.
Hmm. Doesn't seem to want to give up any secrets. Let's go to active scan.
No, no modulation.
Really? You are definitely not from our neighbourhood. Increase to three point zero.
Commander?
Yeah, Reg?
Thanks for assigning me to this mission.
Don't mention it. You're one of my top engineers. It's about time you got in on some of the interesting stuff. This, this is why I'm in Starfleet.
There's still no modulation.
Hit it with a positron emission.
What was that? Computer's down, Reg. Reg?
Captain's log, supplemental. An intense energy surge from the alien probe has severely disabled the shuttle's onboard computer. The away team has been transported directly to Sickbay, where Lieutenant Barclay remains under observation.
Any indication of the probe's energy source, Data?
No, sir. Power emissions do not match any known radiation patterns. We have not encountered this technology before, sir.
Very well. Isolate the probe and place it in tow. We'll take it to Science Station four oh two in the Kohlan system.
Captain, the probe has begun to move. It is approaching the Enterprise.
Shields up.
Aye, sir.
There was enough energy in that flash to overload your optic nerves. It knocked you unconscious.
My visor must have filtered it out.
Exactly. But there was no apparent retinal damage and the cornea looks fine. But I'm still waiting for a full sero-amino readout. I'll call you when it comes in.  I'd like this done as quickly as possible, Ensign.
You shouldn't have to wait too long for the results.
What do you mean?
Couldn't you use a global mode in your scanner? It would be a lot faster.
That's not possible. We're talking about human cells here, not isolinear circuits. I think you'd better stick to engineering, Lieutenant.
A cell has a an electromagnetic signature just like a circuit element does. Theoretically, it should work with just a few adjustments. I could set it up for you, if you'd like.
Probe now closing at fifteen point three metres per second. Collision course.
Captain, sensors are reading no particulate emissions or subspace field distortions.
Then how is it able to move?
Method of propulsion is unknown, sir.
Ensign, take us away from it. One quarter impulse.
Aye, sir.
The probe is matching our speed and course.
Captain, an energy field is forming around the device. Intensity is three point two terawatts and increasing.
Sir, the shuttlecraft shields did not provide sufficient protection for its computer. Our computer may also be vulnerable. I recommend withdrawal to a safe distance.
Ensign Anaya, full about. Half impulse.
One half impulse.
The probe is following.
Options, Number One?
We can't use photon torpedoes. An explosion this close could cripple us.
Sir, recommend full phasers.
Proceed.
Firing phasers.
No effect, Captain.
The probe's field intensity is continuing to build, sir. We are in danger.
Riker to La Forge. Can you increase phaser power?
Attempting to now, Commander. Isolate phasers eighty to one twenty. Shunt all the plasma
To the emitters. Yes, sir, I'm already on it. Ready.
Phasers are as hot as we can make them, Captain.
Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
Nothing.
Go to warp two.
Aye, sir. Warp two.
The probe is still with us, sir.
At warp two?
Yes, sir.
Captain, the probe's energy output is overloading our shields. Failure anticipated in forty seven seconds.
I'm willing to entertain suggestions.
Captain, we're dropping to impulse.
Commander, warp power has been transferred to the shield grid.
Yeah, but by whom?
Barclay, what are you doing?
Lieutenant Barclay to Captain Picard. You can fire photon torpedoes.
Maximum yield, full spread.
We're too close.
I'm certain the shields will hold.
Mister La Forge?
I don't know how he did it, but shield strength has been increased by three hundred percent.
It should be enough, Captain.
Mister Worf. Photon torpedoes. Maximum yield, full spread.
Aye.
Thank you, Mister Barclay.
You're welcome, Captain. Barclay out. I'm sorry if I overstepped my authority.
Don't mention it.
Captain's log, stardate 44705.3. The Enterprise has destroyed the alien probe, but now we are left with the difficult task of repairing the Argus Telescope. Failure to do so would represent an incalculable scientific loss.
Mister Barclay. Everyone's still trying to figure out exactly how you did it.
Well, it just occurred to me that I could set up a frequency harmonic between the deflector and the shield grid using the warp field generator as a power flow anti-attenuator, and that of course naturally created an amplification of the inherent energy output.
Uh huh. I see that.
I'm glad you could join us, Mister Barclay. Your report, Mister La Forge.
Each of the telescope's subspace antenna clusters is powered by its own fusion reactor, but a single computer controls them all.
So all eighteen reactors were affected when the computer was damaged?
That's right. They're starting to overload, and could eventually go critical. The explosion would destroy the Array, and I wouldn't want to be next door when that happens.
A standard isolation procedure would be advisable.
I agree. We'll cut off each reactor from the damaged control system and repair them one by one.
How long will that take?
Two to three weeks at least.
All right, Mister La Forge.
I don't agree. We could repair all of the reactors simultaneously instead of one by one.
Simultaneously? All eighteen?
Yes, sir.
But the Argus computer is inoperable.
Not entirely. The core memory is still intact, and we could programme a completely new control system.
An interesting suggestion, Lieutenant. However, that approach would require much more time than our original plan. At least seven weeks.
I could have it ready for you in two days.
What?
If you could assist me in the morning, Commander.
Sure, Reg.
The moon, yes, that'll be my home, my paradise. I shall find there all the souls I love. Socrates, Galileo. And when I arrive they will question my worthiness. What the devil is he doing there among us? Philosopher, scientist, poet, musician, duellist! Here lies Hercule Savinien De Cyrano de Bergerac. I would not have you weep any less for that charming, good, and handsome Christien. I only ask this, that as the great cold surrounds my bones, you allow a double meaning for your mourning veil. And when you let fall your tears fall for him, some few will be for me.
That was a real improvement.
Same time, day after tomorrow?
Same time.
Reg? May I join you?
Of course, please. Sit down, Counsellor.
Hard at work?
I'm getting prepared for tomorrow's meeting in Engineering. We're planning our repair strategy.
I really enjoyed the scene you just performed.
You're a very forgiving audience.
Not at all. I thought you were brilliant. You've changed.
Is that a professional opinion?
Pure observation.
No, it's true. I can't explain it. In the last few days I've found confidence I never knew was there.
I'm proud of you, Reg. I'm glad for you, too. Well, I'd better be going.
Must you?
I think so.
Wouldn't you like to take a walk with me through the arboretum? The zalnias should be in bloom.
Reg, as your former counsellor, I don't think it would be appropriate.
I don't need a counsellor. What I need is the company of a charming, intelligent woman.
Goodnight, Mister Barclay.
Where's Lieutenant Barclay?
I stopped by his quarters on my way over. He wasn't there.
Computer, location of Lieutenant Barclay.
Lieutenant Barclay is on holodeck three.
G sub I, J of t as t approaches infinity.
G of t over G naught.
So it is, so it is.
I still don't see how you're going to incorporate quantum principle into general relativity without adjusting the cosmological constant a lot more than you're doing here.
If we increase the value as you suggest, we must face the possibility of twenty six dimensions, instead of ten.
I don't think I could deal with that.
I certainly could not.
If the semiset curved into the subatomic, the infinities might cancel each other out.
Gruss Gott. They just might.
We had a meeting at oh seven hundred.
I'm sorry, Commander. Thank you, Professor. End programme.
What was that all about?
I had some ideas late last night. I needed to consult with the computer about some quantum electrodynamic calculations. A holodeck Einstein programme seemed like the best way. I guess I went a little overboard.
A little? Most of the stuff on that blackboard was way out of my league. And yours too.
Not really. I just haven't thought along those lines before. It's all pretty evident now, and if you were to put your mind to it I'm sure
Reg, ever since our run in with that probe, something's different about you.
What, because I'm beginning to behave like the rest of the crew? With confidence in what I'm doing?
You just spent the entire night arguing grand unification theories with Albert Einstein!
Yes, but
Reg, something's happened to you, and we can't ignore that.
Yes. I've finally become the person I've always wanted to be. Do we have to ask why?
Yeah, I think we do.
Incredible! The production of neurotransmitters in your brain has jumped by over five hundred percent. Pre and postsynaptic membranes have increased permeability to match it. I couldn't even guess at your IQ level now.
Probably somewhere between twelve hundred and fourteen fifty.
But that isn't all. The corpus callosum, the connecting bridge between both sides of the brain, it is so active now that the hemispheres are essentially behaving as one.
So, it's not just raw intelligence we're talking about here.
No. Creativity, resourcefulness, inspiration, imagination, they've all been enhanced. Lieutenant, you could very well be the most advanced human being who has ever lived.
Whatever that alien probe did to him, Barclay now seems to know more about the internal workings of the Enterprise than anyone else on board.
The question is, how are we going to deal with it.
We could confine him to his quarters.
How can we do that? What's he done? We're talking about locking a man up for being too smart.
If he's been influenced by an alien, wouldn't that put us all at risk?
Not necessarily. It might be something as simple as an allergic reaction to a bee sting.
Has Mister Barclay done anything that could be considered potentially threatening?
Well, he did make a pass at me last night.  A good one.
I'd hardly consider that a threat.
No, but it's certainly unusual behaviour for Barclay.
There's something else, Captain. He taught violin technique at the music school last night.
I didn't know Barclay played the violin.
He didn't, not until last night.
Look, if we want to save the array, we need Barclay. It's as simple as that.
Until he does something more menacing, I see no reason why we should prevent him from continuing his work.
Larson to Commander La Forge.
Go ahead, Lieutenant.
We're having trouble containing reactor nine, sir. It's starting to chain.
I'm on my way.
You said he made a pass at you, but you failed to mention whether he was successful or not.
Thermal levels up one hundred seventy seven percent. Comparable increase in neutron emissions.
Is the interface between the computer and the array still in operation?
Yes, but our computer is too slow to direct the repairs. The parameters are changing too quickly for it to keep up.
Then we'll have to try a remote shutdown from here.
Transmitting commands to the array now, sir. Starting close down sequence.
Brower, increase the intake of liquid helium three into the reactor wall. We've got to cool it off.
Transmitting commands. Thermal levels increasing, sir.
What happened?
Unclear. The interface isn't fast enough.
Commander La Forge. Overload indications on Argus generator five, seven and fourteen.
Damn!
I can't do anything from here. I have to find a better interface.
La Forge to Bridge. We're looking at a cascade reactor failure on the Argus.
I don't think we're going to pull this one out.
Reactor Nine will reach critical in ten minutes, forty three seconds. The subsequent explosion will create a chain reaction along the entire length of the Array, sir.
Ensign, standby for a jump to warp two.
Yes, Sir.
La Forge, you've got ten minutes. Mister Worf, Red alert.
Aye, Commander.
Computer, begin new programme. Create as follows, workstation chair.  Now, create a standard alphanumeric console positioned for left hand. Now an iconic display console positioned for right hand. Tie both consoles into the Enterprise main computer core, utilising neural-scan interface.
There is no such device on file.
No problem. Here's how you build it.
Argus reactor nine twenty eight seconds to critical.
Get us out of here.
Warp two, Ensign.
Yes, sir. Helm's not responding.
Captain, we have lost computer control.
What?
Twelve seconds to critical.
Go to manual.
I'm attempting that, sir
There's not enough time.
Computer is coming back online, sir.
Captain, the Argus reactors are shutting down. We are no longer in danger, sir.
What happened?
Unknown, sir.
Geordi, what did you do?
It wasn't me, sir.
Computer, how were the Argus reactors shut down?
A neural interface was created to expedite the repairs.
Barclay?
Computer, respond.
I am responding, sir. I'm sorry if I caused you any alarm. It was necessary in order to secure the Array.
Barclay!
Barclay, what's going on? Barclay!
Yes, Commander, it's me.
I'm sorry, Captain, I was only trying to help. Our computer was too slow to compensate for the overload on the Array. So I created an interface that communicated my thoughts directly to the central processing unit.
Exactly what does that mean?
My body is as you see it here, but much of my higher brain functions and memory have been transferred to the starboard computer core.
Mister Barclay, remove yourself from the computer system. Leave the holodeck.
I'm afraid I can't, sir.
Why not?
My primary cerebral functions are now operating almost entirely from within the computer. They have expanded to such a degree that it would be impossible to return to the confines of my human brain. Any attempt to do so would mean my death.
That's it. I've disconnected the visual and audio pickups. We can talk without being monitored by the computer.
By Barclay.
Report, Mister La Forge.
It is now almost impossible to tell where Barclay ends and the computer begins. He's actually rewriting the isolinear chips each time he extends himself a little further.
How do we get him out of there?
We don't. Not without killing him.
This is an intolerable situation. I have no wish to harm him, but I cannot allow Mister Barclay to continue to act as the computer. I don't care how smart he is.
Lieutenant Barclay has not yet extended himself into the Engineering subsystems. It may be possible to establish an ODN bypass directly to the Bridge.
That still won't give us control of the ship.
No, but it would give us access to the propulsion systems. Enough to get us to the next Starbase.
How long would it take to set that up?
A few hours.
Make it so.
Commander La Forge?
Yeah, Reg?
I thought you would be in your quarters.
No, I'm just catching up on some work, you know? That level three diagnostic we talked about. How're you doing?
I wish I could convey to you what it's like for me now. What I've become.
Yeah? Try.
I can conceive almost infinite possibilities, and can fully explore each of them in a nanosecond. I perceive the universe as a single equation, and it is so simple, I understand.
You understand?
Everything.
Well, do you understand how this happened to you?
I believe it is a gift. That I have been chosen to fulfill a great purpose.
Ah ha.
Do you suppose all of this has changed the way people think about me?
To tell you the truth, Reg, we don't know what to think.
I've been concerned about that, but soon everyone will understand what I can do for humanity.
What do you mean?
We have always perceived the maximum speed of the Enterprise as a function of warp, but I know now there are no limits. We will explore new worlds that we could never before have reached in our lifetime.
I will take us to them.
Captain, I am picking up subspace distortion.
Mister Data?
This disturbance is the result of a highly charged graviton field emanating from our warp nacelles. It is creating a severe bias in the subspace continuum.
Mister Barclay, are you responsible for this graviton field disturbance?
Yes, sir, I'm altering subspace in a way that's never been conceived of before. I'm fairly certain it will allow us to travel half-way across the galaxy in a matter of only
Mister Barclay, I want you to stop this experiment for now.
Captain, if you'd only allow me to show
Mister Barclay, this is a direct order. Discontinue whatever it is you're doing.
I really would rather not, sir. I'm positive that you'll be pleased with the result once I've finished showing
Audio is disconnected. We may speak freely.
How soon before the ODN process is in place?
I have been monitoring Geordi's progress. It will be operational in seventeen minutes.
Captain, let me go to the holodeck and try and talk to him.
Sir, the subspace distortion continues to increase.
Hello, Deanna.
Reg.
I'm sorry that we can't take that walk in the Arboretum.
So am I. Reg, you've frightened all of us. I'm sure that wasn't your intent.
Young children are sometimes frightened of the world. That doesn't mean that their parents should let them stay in their cribs.
Are we children to you now?
I can see so much more than you are capable of. You should trust that. Deanna, I've always wanted to earn your respect.
You've got it. From all of us. We don't need any more convincing. Please, obey the Captain's orders. Stop whatever it is you're doing.
You must trust me.
How can we trust an officer who doesn't follow orders?
Trust me.
The Captain will do everything in his power to stop you.
Picard to La Forge. Status?
Ready, Captain.
Proceed.
Acknowledged.
Commander?
What?
You're too late.
Captain, we have not regained control of the propulsion systems. The ODN bypass to the Bridge has been blocked.
Barclay!
Yes, Commander Riker?
Whatever it is you're doing out there, you've got to stop it.
Sir, we're going in.
Mister Barclay, respond at once!
Audio's disconnected.
Lieutenant, take a security team to holodeck three. Disconnect Mister Barclay from the computer.
Aye, Captain.
I want you to know, Lieutenant Worf, that I understand your duty in this matter.
Phasers. Maximum setting.
And that I in no way will take your actions personally.
Conduits.
La Forge? Initiate stabilisation procedure!
Resetting stabilisers to match subspace flow matrix. Stand by.
He is protected by a force field. We could not disconnect him.
Mister Data?
We are experiencing a quantum-model oscillation delay, doubling in intensity every twelve point three seconds. Bio-cellular disruption is imminent.
Sir!
Where are we, Ensign?
Unless something's wrong with our sensors, sir, we're almost thirty thousand light years from where we were.
The centre of the galaxy.
Sir, our heading's been altered. Approaching planetary cluster.
Captain, all systems are back under helm control. The computer has returned to normal functioning.
Captain!
Emotive. Electro-chemical stimulus response. Cranial plate, bipedal locomotion, endoskeletal. Contiguous external integument.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Hierarchical collective command structure.
Who are you?
Interrogative.
I am interrogative, yes, and I would appreciate an explanation.
I think I can help you with that, Captain.
Mister Barclay. I thought it would be fatal if you left the holodeck.
The Cytherians have reintegrated me, sir.
Cytherians.
The probe was designed to instruct outsiders on how to reach this system. The technologies aren't always compatible. They failed with the Argus computer, and with the computer on board the shuttle, but they were able to reprogram me.
What do you want of us?
The same as you.
Mister Barclay?
You're both on the same mission, Captain.
Mission?
Yes, sir. The Cytherians are exploring the galaxy just as we are. The only difference is that they never leave their home. They bring others here. Their only wish, an exchange of knowledge. They want to know us.
Captain's log, stardate 44721.9. After ten days in the company of the Cytherians, the Enterprise has been safely returned to Federation space. We bring back knowledge of their race that will take our scholars decades to examine. Lieutenant Barclay is apparently no worse for his experience.
So how much do you remember?
I remember doing everything. I just don't remember how or why.
How do you feel now?
Smaller.
Just plain old Barclay, huh.
Always seems to come back to that, doesn't it.
You know. almost everyone has a moment in their lives when they exceed their own limits, achieve what seems to be impossible.
The tricky part is what happens afterwards.
You almost always feel a sense of loss, but it is possible to carry something of that experience through the rest of your life in ways that you aren't even aware of now.
I think I know what you're saying.
Either way, Reg, you're an important part of this crew. In fact, I could really use your help with that level three diagnostic.
Sure.
Excuse me, Commander, but I believe Mister Barclay and I had a date scheduled, for a walk in the Arboretum?
The diagnostic can wait. I'll see you later.
You really, you really don't have to do that.
I know.
May I? Checkmate in nine moves.
I didn't know you played chess.
I don't.
The satellite's trajectory is continuing to deteriorate, Captain. This orbit will put it within five hundred kilometres of the planet surface.
We're predicting the atmospheric drag will bring it down on the next orbit.
Have you been able to find any explanation for this?
No, Doctor. It is a most unusual phenomenon.
Won't the moon disintegrate prior to impact?
No, it has a ferrous crystalline structure and it will be able to withstand tidal forces, Captain
Could we blow it into pieces?
The total mass of the moon would remain the same, Commander, and the impact of thousands of fragments would spread destruction over an even wider area.
How long before impact?
Twenty nine hours, sir. Projecting it somewhere on the western continent. That would destroy an area eight hundred kilometres in radius.
That damage would be insignificant, Captain, compared to the seismic repercussions massive landquakes, and tsunami.
The force would raise a cloud of dust around the planet, leading to a significant temperature reduction. We could be looking at our own ice age.
Mister La Forge, is there any way that the Enterprise could coax that satellite
Back where it belongs?
We'd need to apply a delta vee of about four kilometres per second. Even with warp power to the tractor beam, it would mean exceeding recommended impulse engine output by at least forty-seven percent. It'd be like
An ant pushing a tricycle. A slim chance at best.
Given a choice between slim and none, I'll take slim any day.
Make it so.
Lieutenant Worf, contact all ships in this sector to rendezvous and join us in relief efforts.
We'll keep you informed of our progress. Picard out.
Can you give us any more, Geordi?
Not without burning out the tractor beam emitter. The circuits are already beyond the thermal limit.
Delta vee is ninety two metres per second. The mass is too great. We are having an effect but it is negligible.
What is that?
Unable to identify source.
Impulse engines passing safety limits. We're seconds
From automatic shutdown.
Reduce engine power. Tractor beam off.
Lieutenant Worf, what the hell do the sensors say?
The sound is not registering, Commander.
Q!
Red alert.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are no closer to finding a solution to the deteriorating orbit of the Bre'el Four moon, but with the arrival of Q, we now have a good idea of the cause.
Our options?
We've done everything by the book and a little extra. We need more time or more power, and we're short on both. I'll take a look and see if there are any rules I haven't broken.
Keep me advised.
We know you're behind this, Q.
These aren't my colours. And what are you blathering about, Riker?
What kind of twisted pleasure does it give you to bring terror into their lives?
Whose lives?
The millions of people down there who are watching as their moon falls out of the sky.
I haven't the vaguest idea what you're talking about and I have a much more serious problem. I'm no longer a member of the Continuum. My superiors have decided to punish me.
And punish us as well, it would seem.
They said I've spread chaos through the universe, and they've stripped me of all my powers. You don't believe me, do you? Do you think I would humiliate myself like this?
If it served your purpose, yes.
It's the truth. I stand before you defrocked. Condemned to be a member of this lowest of species. A normal, imperfect, lumpen human being.
They made you human as part of your punishment?
No, it was my request. I could have chosen to exist as a Markoffian sea lizard or a Belzoidian flea. Anything I wished as long as it was mortal. And since I only had a fraction of a second to mull and I chose this and asked them to bring me here.
Why?
Because in all the universe you're the closest thing I have to a friend, Jean-Luc.
Sir, he is reading as fully human.
What, is there an echo in here?
I am sensing an emotional presence, Captain. I would normally describe it as being terrified.
How rude.
what is it you want, Q?
Your compassion. All right, Sanctuary on this ship, dreary as it may sound to both of us.
Return that moon to its orbit.
I have no powers. Q the ordinary.
Q the liar. Q the misanthrope.
Q the miserable. Q the desperate. What must I do to convince you people?
Die.
Oh, very clever, Worf. Eat any good books lately?
Fine. You want to be treated as a human?
Absolutely.
All right. Mister Worf, throw him in the brig.
Delighted, Captain.
You can't do this to me, Jean-Luc.
You will walk or I will carry you.
Given the option, I'll walk. You've disappointed me, Jean-Luc. I'm very disappointed. Hey, I'm claustrophobic, I don't like it in here.
It was a mistake. I never should have picked human. I knew it the minute I said it. To think of the future in this shell. Forced to cover myself with fabric because of some outdated human morality. To say nothing of being too hot or too cold, growing feeble with age, losing my hair, catching a disease, being ticklish, sneezing, having an itch, a pimple, bad breath. Having to bathe.
Too bad.
Klingon. I should have said Klingon. In my heart of hearts, I am a Klingon, Worf.
Sorry. So you understand I could never survive in confinement. I mean, this is cruel and unusual punishment. The universe has been my back yard. As a fellow Klingon, if you would speak to the Captain on my behalf, I would be eternally grateful. which doesn't mean as much as it used to, I admit.
Be quiet! Or disappear back where you came from.
I can't disappear any more than you could win a beauty contest.
If I ask a very simple question, do you think you might be able to answer it without it troubling your intellect too much?
Ready? Here goes. Would I permit you to lock me away if I still had all my powers?
You have fooled us too often, Q.
Perspicacity incarnate. Please don't feel compelled now to tell me the story of the boy who cried Worf.
Computer, activate force field.
I demand to be let out of here, immediately. Do you hear me? You will deactivate this cell immediately! Romulan!
I should have said Romulan, that Klingon goat!
The question is, what sort of jaded game is he up to this time?
Maybe he just wants a big laugh. He'll take Bre'el Four to the edge of disaster, and then pull the moon back.
Or he may have nothing to do with it at all.
You honestly think Q is telling the truth?
Oh, I agree this is highly unlikely, but we have to proceed with our current dilemma as though Q is powerless to prevent it, don't we?
And there he sits, and he watches us struggle.
I don't see that we have any choice. Mister Worf, will you hail the Bre'el Four science station,
They're standing by, Captain.
Yes, Captain Picard.
I'm sorry, but I have to report that our first attempt to restore the moon to its proper orbit has failed.
We have less than twenty five hours before impact, Captain.
Our Chief Engineer is working on ways to reinforce our tractor beam.
So there is a hope, but if you have an evacuation plan
We have already started moving people from the coastal areas of the western continent.
We are going to make another attempt shortly. Picard out.
I've got to tell you Geordi is not at all optimistic.
What the devil?
Data?
Sensors are showing broadband emissions, including Berthold rays
Lethal?
No, Commander. Overall exposure is less than seventy five rems. Very low intensity, more like a soft medical scan. I would speculate we are being probed.
By whom?
The sensors cannot identify the point of origin. It seems to be coming from all around us.
Ah, you've come to apologise. How nice. All's forgiven. No offense taken.
Enough. Q, what exactly is going on.
Well, how can I know what's going on? I've been in this dungeon of yours, alone, helpless, bored to tears.
We have a moon inexplicably falling out of orbit, and just now this ship was probed with Berthold radiation.
I wasn't aware of this. Truthfully, Jean-Luc. I have been entirely preoccupied by a most frightening experience of my own. A couple of hours ago, I realising that my body was no longer functioning properly. I felt weak. I could no longer stand. The life was oozing out of me. I lost consciousness.
You fell asleep.
Terrifying. How can you stand it day after day?
You get used to it.
What other dangers await me? I'm not prepared for this. I need guidance.
Q, I'm not going to play along with this. If you want to continue this charade, you can do it alone.
Jean-Luc, wait!  This is getting on my nerves, now that I have them. You have a moon in a deteriorating orbit. I've known moons through the universe. Big ones, small ones. I'm an expert. I could help you with this one, if you let me out of here.
Q, there are millions of lives at risk. If you have the power to
I don't have any powers. But I have the knowledge, locked up in this puny brain. You cannot afford to not take that advantage, can you?
Mister Data, report to detention cell three.
On my way, sir.
Computer, remove the forcefield. If you are human, which I seriously doubt, you will have to work hard to earn our trust.
I'm not worried about that, Jean-Luc. You only dislike me. There are others in the cosmos who truly despise me.
Mister Data, you are hereby assigned to Q for the remainder of his stay. You will escort him to Mister La Forge in Engineering.
Aye, sir.
Can I have a Starfleet uniform? What are you looking at?
I was considering the possibility that you are telling the truth, that you really are human.
It's the ghastly truth, Mister Data. I can now stub my toe with the best of them.
An irony. It means that you have achieved in disgrace what I have always aspired to be.
Humans are such commonplace little creatures. They roam the galaxy looking for something, they know not what.
The human race has an enduring desire for knowledge, and for new opportunities to improve itself.
There's certainly room for improvement, but the truth is, Data, they are a minor species in the grand scheme. Not worth your envy.
Oh, I do not feel envy.
Well, that's good.
I feel nothing at all. That is part of my dilemma. I have the curiosity of humans, but there are questions I will never have the answer to. What is it like to laugh, or cry, or to experience any human emotions.
Well, if you ask me, these human emotions are not what they're cracked up to be.
The moon will hit its perigee in ten hours. Now, we match its trajectory, increase emitter coolant rate so we can apply continuous warp-equivalent power nine to the tractor beam. We can push it for nearly seven hours and I think that just might do it. But, there's a problem.
The Enterprise will be dangerously close to the atmosphere.
That's the problem.
This is incredible.
You see something here, Q?
I think I just hurt my back. I'm feeling pain. I don't like it. What's the right thing to say? Ow?
LAFORGE + DATA:Ow.
Ow! I can't straighten up.
Medical assistance to Engineering.
Q, I've got a few people down on Bre'el Four who are going to be hurt
Yes, yes, your marvellous plan will not only tear the moon to pieces but your precious ship as well.
You got a better idea?
I would certainly begin by examining the cause and not the symptom.
We've done that, Q, and there's no way to
This is obviously the result of a large celestial object passing through at near right angles to the plane of the star system. Probably a black hole.
Can you recommend a way to counter the effect?
Simple. Change the gravitational constant of the universe.
What?
Change the gravitational constant of the universe, thereby altering the mass of the asteroid.
Redefine gravity? How am I supposed to do that?
You just do it. Where's that Doctor, anyway?
Geordi is trying to say that changing the gravitational constant of the universe is beyond our capabilities.
Oh. In that case, never mind.
Ah, Doctor Crusher. I see Starfleet has shipped you back into exile.
Q says he has hurt his back.
Ah ha. Well, if I didn't see it with my own eyes, I wouldn't believe it. According to this, he has classic back trauma. Muscle spasms.
I've been under a lot of pressure lately. Family problems.
Well. don't expect too much sympathy from me. You've been a pain in our backside often enough.
Your bedside manner is admirable, Doctor. I'm sure your patients recover quickly just to get away from you.
You know, this might work. We can't change the gravitational constant of the universe, but if we wrap a low level warp field around that moon, we could reduce its gravitational constant. Make it lighter so we can push it.
Glad I could help. Ow. I think.
Now what?
There's something wrong with my stomach.
It hurts?
It's making noises.
Maybe you're hungry.
I've never eaten before. What do I ask for?
The choice of meal is determined by individual taste.
What do you like?
Although I do not require sustenance, I occasionally ingest semi-organic nutrient suspension in a silicon-based liquid medium.
Is it good?
It would be more accurate to say it is good for me, as it lubricates my bio-functions.
It doesn't sound very appealing. What else is there?
A wide variety of items. The replicator can make anything you desire.
How do I know what I desire?
I have observed that the selection of food is often influenced by the mood of the person ordering.
I'm in a dreadful mood. Get me something appropriate.
When Counsellor Troi is unhappy, she usually eats something chocolate.
Chocolate?
A chocolate sundae, for example. Although I do not speak from personal experience, I have seen it have a profound psychological impact.
I'll have ten chocolate sundaes.
Ten?
I've never seen anyone eat ten chocolate sundaes.
I'm in a really bad mood, and since I've never eaten before, I should be very hungry.
This is not a moment I've been looking forward to.
I hear they drummed you out of the Continuum.
I like to think of it as a significant career change.
Just one of the boys, ay?
One of the boys with an IQ of two thousand and five.
The Captain and many of the crew are not yet convinced he is truly human.
Really?
Argh!
Seems human enough to me.
This is a dangerous creature. You have no idea. Why Picard would make her a member of the crew and not me
It must be terribly frightening for you, to be totally defenceless after all of those centuries being omnipotent.
I'm warning you. I still have friends in high places.
Frightening one race after the other, teasing them like frightened animals, and you enjoying every moment of your victims fears.
From now on I'll do missionary work, okay?
That would be a most noble cause, Q.
You could learn a lot from this one.
Sure, the robot who teaches the course in humanities.
I am an android, not a robot.
I beg your pardon.
I'd enjoy that, and you'd better get used to it.
What?
Begging. You're a pitiful excuse for a human. The only way you're going to survive is by the charity of others.
I'm not hungry.
Captain, sensors are picking up a cloud of energetic plasma. Bearing, three-four one mark two zero. Range, twelve kilometres and closing.
On screen.
Energy patterns are reading as highly organized.
A lifeform?
Attempt to make contact, Mister Worf.
Receiving a signal, sir. On speaker.
Computer, analyse signal
Signal patterns indicate intelligence. Unable to derive necessary referents to establish translation matrix.
What's that? I don't know.
Calamarain.
Captain, we're being hit by a field of energetic tachyons penetrating the hull. Location, deck ten, forward.
Red alert.
Geordi, increase power to shields.
Increasing power by twenty percent
No effect
Increasing to forty percent.
Still no effect
Adjusting shield harmonics, diverting power to the forward grids.
The added harmonics are blocking the tachyon field.
Help me! Somebody, help me!
How the mighty have fallen.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have sustained light damage from an attack by an alien species known as the Calamarain. They apparently have a grievance with Q. No doubt one of many lifeforms that do.
The Calamarain are not very hospitable creatures. They exist as swirls of ionised gas.
What did you do to them, Q?
Nothing bizarre, nothing grotesque.
You tormented them.
A subjective term, Riker. One creature's torment, is another creature's delight. They simply have no sense of humour, a character flaw with which you can personally identify.
I say we turn him over to them.
Oh, I take it back. You do have a sense of humour. A dreadful one at that.
I'm serious.
Of course. You knew this would happen, didn't you?
One can never anticipate the Calamarain. They're very intelligent, but very flighty.
Yes, but you must have so many enemies. Certainly you knew that once you became mortal some of them might look you up.
It had occurred to me.
And for all your protestations of friendship, your real reason for being here is protection.
You're very smart, Jean-Luc, but I know human beings. They're all sopping over with compassion and forgiveness. They can't wait to absolve almost any offence. It's an inherent weakness in the breed.
On the contrary, it is a strength.
You call it what you will, but I think you'll protect me even though I've tortured you now and again.
Fighting off all the species you've insulted would be a full time mission. That's not the one I signed up for.
Indeed. Human or not, I want no part of you. We will deposit you at the first starbase. Let them deal with you.
But I could be a valuable member of the team. I'm human, I can learn.
He has provided important theoretical guidance for Geordi's analysis of the Bre'el satellite, Captain.
It seems you have an advocate, Q.
I am merely stating a fact, Counsellor.
Mister La Forge, your status?
I've been putting together a programme to extend the forward lobe of the warp field. The field coils
Aren't designed to envelop such a large volume. But I'm attempting to modify their alignment parameters.
Maintaining field integrity will be difficult, Geordi.
I'm pretty sure we can do it manually. The moon will come to its perigee in fourteen minutes.
Mister Data, you will escort Q to Engineering. You will assist Mister La Forge. Mister Worf, hail the Bre'el Four science station.
Aye, sir.
Picard thinks I can't cut it on his starship. I can do anything his little trained minions can do.
I do not perceive your skills to be in doubt, Q. The Captain is more concerned with your ability to interact successfully with his little trained minions.
Human interpersonal relationships are more complex. Your experiences may not have adequately prepared you.
I'm not interested in human interpersonal relationships. I just want to prove to Picard that I'm indispensable.
Engineering. To function aboard a starship, or in any human activity, you must learn to form relationships.
It's so hard.
And of more immediate importance is your ability to work within groups.
I'm not good in groups. It's difficult working in a group when you're omnipotent.
The tides reached ten metres on the last orbit. They are already beginning to swell again. We have a lot of frightened people down here, Captain.
Your moon has begun moving toward its perigee. We're prepared to make our attempt.
Our population has already taken shelter, but I'm afraid no shelter will be adequate if you fail. Especially for the people on the western continent.
Whatever the results, we know you've done your best, Picard. It's appreciated.
We'll keep you advised, Doctor. Picard out.
Captain, sensors are picking up an increased energy output from the Calamarain.
La Forge to Bridge.
The moon has reached its minimum orbital distance. It's time, Captain.
We'll have to lower shields.
Proceed. Mister Worf, keep a close eye on Q's friends out there.
Understood.
All right, everyone, this is what we're going to be doing.
Q, everybody already knows what they're going to do, except for you, Now here's what I need.
La Forge, obviously my knowledge and experience far exceed yours by about a billion times. So, if you'll just step aside gracefully.
Q, your experience will be most valuable to me if you can manually control the field integrity.
Don't be foolish. That would be a waste of my talents.
Q, get to the controls or get the hell out of here. Data, you're my liaison to the Bridge. I'll need you with me.
Who does he think he is, giving me orders.
Geordi thinks he is in command here, and he is correct.
Engineering, holding at station keeping, range six hundred and forty metres.
Containment fields to flight tolerance.
Warp core to ninety percent.
Engage field coils. Tractor beam to stand by. Field output?  Field output?
Two seventeen.
Impulse engines to full. Ready to engage tractor beam.
Lowering shields. Engage tractor beam.
Extending warp field forward.
Engineering, is that the forward limit?
Yes, Captain. We are unable to encompass the entire moon.
Do you recommend that we proceed?
The two parts of the moon will have different inertial densities.
Stand by, Captain. I can adjust the field symmetry to compensate.
I doubt it.
You don't know what this ship can do, Mister. Yes, Captain, I still believe it'll work. Increasing power and warp field and tractor beam.
And if you're wrong, the moon will crumble due to subspace compression. Don't say I didn't warn you.
Shut up, Q.
I will not be spoken to in this manner!
Data.
Q, I strongly suggest that you cooperate.
Inertial mass of the moon is decreasing to approximately two point five million metric tonnes.
It's working. We can move it. Firing impulse engines.
Captain, the moon's trajectory has moved point three percent. Point-four percent.
Emergency! Shields up.
Disengage tractor beam.
Calamarain attacking.  Shields holding. Tachyon field repelled.
Captain, the impact of the blast is pushing us into the upper atmosphere.
Hull temperature rising. Two thousand degrees.
Two thousand five hundred degrees.
Moving to full impulse power.
Calamarain resuming attack.
They've overpowered the shields. Hull penetration, deck thirty six, Engineering.
Geordi, can you direct any more power to the shields?
We need all the power we have to get out of the atmosphere, Commander.
Try activating the structural integrity field.
It's not working. Structural field harmonics on manual.
La Forge. Hull temperature falling. We're in the clear.
Diverting power to forward sections now.
That charge nearly knocked out his positronic net.
What can you do for him?
We can try to discharge and reset the motor pathways, recouple the autonomic nodes.
There's overpressure in his fluidic systems. Thermal shock. If he was mortal, he'd be dead.
Let us not overstate the matter here, Doctor. I'm mortal and I survived. The cheers are overwhelming.
Q, you exceed your own standards of self-preoccupation. You have no concern for an officer who may have saved your life.
He's strong, he'll survive.
Osmotic pressure still rising. Maybe we can by-pass the flow regulator.
It would be helpful if everybody just got out of here now.
Stay with Q.
We'll let you know as soon as there's anything to tell you.
Geordi? The moon's trajectory?
All we did was buy ourselves another orbit, at most. We can try again when the moon comes back to its perigee.
And when we drop our shields, the Calamarains go after Q again.
Commander, he's not worth it.
Come.
You're right, of course. I am extraordinarily selfish. But it has served me so well in the past.
It will not serve you here.
Don't be so hard on me, Jean-Luc. You've been a mortal all your life. You know all about dying. I've never given it a second thought. Or a first one, for that matter. I could have been killed. If it hadn't been for Data and that one brief delay he created, I would have been gone. No more me. And no one would have missed me, would they? Data may have sacrificed himself for me. Why?
That is his special nature. He learned the lessons of humanity well.
When I ask myself if I would have done the same for him, And I am forced to answer no, I feel, I feel ashamed.
Q, I'm not your father confessor. You will receive no absolution from me. You have brought nothing but pain and suffering to this crew. And I'm still not entirely convinced that all this isn't your latest attempt at a puerile joke.
It is a joke. A joke on me. The joke of the universe. The king who would be man. As I learn more and more what it is to be human, I am more and more convinced that I would never make a good one. I don't have what it takes. Without my powers, I'm frightened of everything. I'm a coward, and I'm miserable, and I can't go on this way.
He's going to be all right.
We're recalibrating his language circuits, so he can't talk yet.
There are creatures in the universe who would consider you the ultimate achievement, android. No feelings, no emotions, no pain. And yet you covet those qualities of humanity. Believe me, you're missing nothing. But if it means anything to you, you're a better human than I.
Where's the main shuttlebay?
Main shuttlebay is located on deck four.
Take me there.
Captain, an unscheduled shuttle has just been launched.
On main viewer. Hailing frequency.
Frequencies open.
Shuttle occupant, identify yourself.
Don't try to talk me out of it, Jean-Luc.
Q, return to the ship immediately.
I just can't get used to following orders.
Captain, the plasma cloud is moving toward the shuttle.
It's easier this way. They won't bother you after I'm gone.
Engineering, prepare to extend shields.
Please, don't fall back on your tired clich of charging to the rescue just in the nick of time. I don't want to be rescued. My life as a human being has been a dismal failure. Perhaps my death will have a little dignity.
Q, there is no dignity in this suicide.
Yes, I suppose you're right. Death of a coward, then. So be it. But as a human, I would have died of boredom.
This goes against my better judgment. Transporter room three, lock on to shuttle one. Beam it back into it's bay.
Aye, Captain.
It's a perfectly good shuttlecraft.
Captain, unable to transport. For some reason, I can't lock on to the shuttlecraft.
Worf, are you sensing any sort of interference from the Calamarain?
No, sir, but they are still moving toward the shuttle.
Geordi, extend shields around shuttle one.
Extending shields.
Commander, the shields are frozen.
Cause?
Unknown.
Lock on tractor beam.
Tractor beam is not functioning either.
What the hell is going on?
Q2:Not bad, Q. Not great. But not bad.
Q!
Q2:Sacrificing yourself for these humans? Do I detect a little selfless act?
You flatter me. I was only trying to put a quick end to a miserable existence.
Q2:What a dreadful colour.
Yeah. What are you doing here?
Q2:I've been keeping track of you.
I always felt you were in my corner.
Q2:Actually, I was the one who got you kicked out. You know, you're incorrigible, Q. A lost cause. I can't go to a single solar system without having to apologise for you, and I'm tired of it.
I wasn't the one who misplaced the entire Deltived asteroid belt.
Q2:Hey, this isn't about me. I've got better places to be. But somebody had to keep an eye on you to make sure you still didn't find a way to cause trouble. Even as a member of this limited species.
Well, I hope I've been entertaining you.
Q2:Barely. But I find these humans rather interesting. I'm beginning to understand what you see in them. After all the things that you've done, they're still intent on keeping you safe.
A genetic weakness of the race.
Q2:And they're still at it. They just tried to beam you up, back, whatever it is they call it.
Really?
Q2:I stopped them.
Well, if the Calamarains hurry up and finish me off, we can get you back on your way.
Q2:Afraid I had to put them on hold too. You see, there's still this matter of the selfless act. You and I both know that the Calamarain would have eventually destroyed the Enterprise to get to you. And that's really why you left, right?
It was a teeny bit selfless, wasn't it?
Q2:And there's my problem. See, I can't back to the Continuum and tell them you committed a selfless act just before the end. If I do there's going to be questions and explanations for centuries.
I've learned my lesson, Q.
Q2:Remember who you're talking to. All knowing, all seeing. Fine, you got your powers back. Try and stay out of trouble.
So they wanted to destroy me, did they?
If you think I tormented you in the past, my little friends, wait until you see what I do with you now.
Q2:Q?
I was just seeing if you were still watching.
Captain, the aliens have disappeared, and so has the shuttle.
Scan the sector.
I have, sir.
Well, I suppose that is the end of Q.
Au contraire, mon capitaine! He's back!
I'm forgiven. My brothers and sisters of the Continuum have taken me back. I'm immortal again. Omnipotent again.
Swell.
Don't fret, Riker. My good fortune is your good fortune.
I don't need your fantasy women.
Oh, you're so stolid, Commander. You weren't like that before the beard. Very well.
Q!
But I feel like celebrating.
I don't.
All right.
All of it.
Now, at the risk of being rude.
Yes, once again I've overstayed my welcome. As a human, I was ill-equipped to thank you, but as myself you have my everlasting gratitude. Until next time. Ah, but before I go, there's a debt I wish to repay to my professor of the humanities. Data, I've decided to give you something very, very special.
If your intention is to make me human, Q.
No, no, no, no, no, no. I would never curse you by making you human. Think of it as a going away present.
Data? Data, why are you laughing?
I do not know. But it was a wonderful feeling.
Captain, Bre'el Four is hailing us.
On screen, Lieutenant.
Captain Picard you've done it
I'm sorry?
The moon. It's back to its normal orbit. How ever you did it, thank you.
Let's see it, Worf.
Mister Data, your analysis?
The moon's altitude is fifty five thousand kilometres. Projected orbit is circular. There is no further danger to the planet.
Ensign, set course for Station Nigala Four.
Aye, sir.
Perhaps there's a residue of humanity in Q after all. Ensign, en
Don't bet on it, Picard.
No question about it. She was bluffing, Worf.
Bluffing is not one of Counsellor Troi's strong suits.
I'm still reading some chlorinide leakage, but I can't pin it down.
Maybe up here.
It would have been unwise to call. Yes. My hand was not strong enough.
You had jacks and eights, she bluffed you with a pair of sixes.
How did you know what I had?
Let's just say I had a special insight into the cards. Maybe next time you should bring a deck that's not transparent to infrared light. Not to worry, Worf. I only peek after the hand is over. Still nothing. I'll get a dynoscan. We'll try again.
Commander, is that what you wanted?
Yes. If anything changes, you let me know. Ensign, run a dynoscan.
Look out!
Worf!
Commander, what happened?
La Forge to Sickbay! Medical emergency in cargo bay three!
What happened?
The containers you were checking fell on you. You're lucky to be alive.
Doctor, I will not attempt to leave Sickbay without your approval. The restraining field is not necessary.
Worf, there is no restraining field.
But I can't move my legs.
I know. You can't move because one of the containers shattered seven of your vertebrae and crushed your spinal cord. I'm afraid there's no way we can repair this kind of injury.
Captain's log, stardate 45587.3. Lieutenant Worf has been removed from active duty following a severe injury. Although a neuro-specialist has arrived, Doctor Crusher believes his paralysis may be permanent.
Welcome to the Enterprise, Doctor Russell. I'm Beverly Crusher.
A pleasure. I have some equipment aboard the Potemkin. Would you please have it sent to one of your medical labs.
Of course. Send it to medlab four.
Yes, Doctor.
Before we get down to business, I just wanted to say that I had the pleasure of reading your paper on cybernetic regeneration recently.
Really? You're the first person to mention it.
I thought it was brilliant.
Your ideas on bio-active interfaces border on revolutionary. It's going to be a genuine pleasure working with you.
Thank you. Have you had a chance to review Worf's case history yet?
Only briefly. I must admit, I was a little shocked to find the state of Klingon neurological medicine to be so primitive.
It's a cultural bias. When I contacted the Klingon Medical Division, they informed me that they usually let the patient die in a case like this. As a result they've done almost no research on neurological trauma.
We'll be in uncharted waters.
Worf is having a hard time dealing with his injuries. He's always been a difficult patient, but now. He's a little tough at first, but I'm sure you'll get to like him after you get to
Doctor, I know that as a starship doctor, you have to maintain close ties with patients, but I think it would be best if I maintain a discreet distance. That way, I can give you a completely objective opinion regarding treatment.
Yes. You're probably right.
Good. Well, I believe you said I'll be working in medlab four?
Right. This way.
You look pretty good for someone who's been eating sickbay food for three days.
Please, sit down, Commander. Thank you for agreeing to see me in this condition.
I'm not a Klingon. I don't think there's any shame in someone being injured.
I am not merely injured, Commander. Doctor Crusher believes my paralysis to be permanent.
I'm sorry.
I have a personal favour to ask.
Name it.
I want you to assist me in performing the Hegh'bat ceremony. I want you to help me die.
What?
When a Klingon can no longer stand and face his enemies as a warrior, when he becomes a burden to his friends and family, it is time for the Hegh'bat. Time for him to die.
There must be other options.
No, there are not. I will not live as an object of pity or shame. My life as a Klingon is over.
Mister Worf, I will not help a friend commit suicide.
You and I have served together for many years. Fought side by side I know you to be a brave and honourable man. If you truly consider me a friend, help me now. Help me end my life as I have lived it, with dignity and honour. Please.
The cortical spinal tract has continued to deteriorate over the last seventy two hours despite CPK enzymatic therapy.
What about alkysine treatment?
Ineffective.
Overdesigned. Klingon anatomy. Twenty three ribs, two livers, eight-chambered heart, double-lined neural pia mater. I've never seen so many unnecessary redundancies in one body.
Unnecessary? The Klingons refer to it as the brak'lul. Almost every vital function in their bodies has a built-in redundancy in case any primary organ or system fails.
It's a good design in theory, but in practice, all the extra organs means just that much more can go wrong. Let me show you something. I've been experimenting with DNA based generators. This is a genetronic replicator. It reads the DNA coding of damaged organs, translates that into a specific set of replicant instructions and then begins to grow a replacement.
I've read of some of the preliminary work you've done.
The early results have been very encouraging. Beverly, the genetronic replicator can create a completely new neural conduit for your Lieutenant Worf.
Replace his entire spinal column?
Exactly. Instead of splicing and pasting together broken connections like a couple of glorified tailors, we create a new living system.
I had no idea you were already using this on humanoids.
I haven't been. This'll be the first time.
First time?
I've done dozens of holosimulations. The success rate is up to thirty seven percent.
Even a holographic patient would balk at those odds.
Sooner or later, it has to be tried on a living patient.
You're talking about a spinal column. Even before we could replace it, we have to remove the existing one, and we don't know enough about Klingon neurological medicine to re-attach it. If something goes wrong, he'll die. I agree it has remarkable potential, but you're still in the most preliminary stages of research. No, I'm afraid I can't justify the risk to Worf. We'll have to do with more conventional approaches.
You're probably right. It's too radical an approach.
Doctor Crusher, please report to the Bridge.
On my way.
Doctor, the transport ship Denver has struck a gravitic mine left over from the Cardassian war. They've sustained heavy damage.
Their last message said they were attempting to crash land on one of the planets in the Mericor system. We should arrive in just under seven hours.
How many people were aboard?
The Denver's standard crew complement is twenty three, but they were transporting five hundred seventeen colonists to the Beloti sector.
I'll need to convert all three shuttlebays to emergency triage centres. I also want all civilians with medical training to report for duty.
Make it so.
Captain, may I speak with you in private?
Of course, Number One. You have the Bridge, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
I have always tried to keep an open mind, not to judge someone else's culture by my own, but for me to be a part of this ceremony.
I understand from Doctor Crusher that Worf will never regain the use of his legs.
That doesn't mean his life is over.
That's a very human perspective, Will. For a Klingon in Worf's position, his life is over.
I can't accept that.
Will, if you were dying, if you were terminally ill with an incurable disease and facing the remaining few days of your life in pain, wouldn't you come to look on death as a release?
Worf isn't dying and he is not in pain. He could live a long life
You or I could learn to live with that disability, but not Worf. His life ended when those containers fell on him. We don't have to agree with it, we don't have to understand it, but we do have to respect his beliefs.
I can respect his beliefs, but he is asking me to take an active role in his committing suicide.
He's asking for your help because you're his friend. That means that you're going to have to make your decision based on that friendship.
Which leaves me back where I started.
Will. Look, I'm sorry, I cannot help you to make this decision, but I can tell you this. Klingons choose their friends with great care. If he didn't know he could count on you, he never would have asked.
Why won't you let me see him?
Alexander, I told you it's not my decision. Your father doesn't want to
I don't believe you. My father wants to see me. You're the one keeping me away from him!
I think you know that's not true.
Then why can't I see him?
Come here. He's been injured, and he's embarrassed. And to have anyone see him now would make him feel worse, even if it were you.
This is part of that Klingon stuff, isn't it. My mother always said that Klingons had a lot of dumb ideas about honour.
Alexander, that Klingon stuff is very important to your father.
Well, it isn't very important to me. I don't care about being Klingon, I just want to see my father.
It's been a long day. Why don't you get ready for bed and we'll talk about this again in the morning.
Alexander is scared, confused, hurt, all because his father is refusing to see him.
You know why I left those instructions.
Yes I do. It's not the Klingon way, right?
It is a question of honour, and I would ask you that you respect my wishes in this matter, Counsellor.
All I care about at this moment is a little boy who's terrified he's going to lose his father.
Maybe it's time you stopped lying here worrying about your honour, and started thinking about someone else, like your son.
Would you like us to come back later?
No. Please come in, Doctor.
This is Doctor Toby Russell. She's from the Adelman Neurological Institute. She specialises in spinal injuries like yours. We've discussed a variety of surgical procedures. I'm afraid none of them will repair the spinal cord, but we have found a way for you to regain much of your mobility. We can implant a series of neural transducers in your lower torso and legs. They're designed to pick up the electrical impulses from your brain and stimulate the corresponding muscles. With a little work, you can eventually regain sixty to seventy percent of your motor control.
The first step would be to fit your legs with motor assist units like this one. They're a training device. Once you've mastered using them, we can move on to the implants.
Now try to move your leg.
No, no, that's good for a first try. It will take some time before you get used to manipulating the
No!  I will not live like that.
These are very sophisticated devices. With enough time, they will give you
Sixty percent of my mobility. No, I will not be seen lurching through corridors like some half-Klingon machine, the object of ridicule and disgust.
Perhaps this all seems a bit frightening to you know. I want you to take some time before making a decision. Think about it.
There is one other option I'd like you to consider. It's called genetronic replication. It's still in the experimental stage, but if it works, it will restore virtually all of your mobility and without the need for artificial implants.
I thought we had discussed genetronics.
We did.
I also thought we'd decided against recommending it.
You heard him. He'd rather die than live with the implants. I just gave him a better option than suicide.
He's grasping for straws and you're giving him one. Now instead of dealing with his paralysis, he's going to be thinking about this miracle cure of yours.
There's a real chance this could work. And if it does, it'll be a major breakthrough in neurogenetics that will change a lot of people's lives.
You're using the desperation of an injured man as an excuse to try a procedure that you couldn't do under normal circumstances. I checked with Starfleet Medical. They have turned down your request to test genetronics on humanoids three times already.
Are you really going to hide behind the rules of some bureaucracy? Beverly, your patient's life is at stake here.
Look, before you do any of this
Picard to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead, Captain.
We've located the survivors from the Denver.
We're ready down here. We have triage teams standing by.
Very well. We'll begin transporting the survivors on board immediately. Bridge out.
Beverly, could you use an extra pair of hands?
Absolutely.
Father?
Come in, Alexander.
Deanna said you hurt your back, that you couldn't walk.
I am still struggling with my injury.
I was worried about you.
There is much to discuss. There will be difficult times ahead. You must be strong.
I understand.
Good. As Klingons, we must always be prepared for any
Father!
Take him away.
Worf, let me help you.
Leave!
Alexander, go on. It'll be all right. I'll take care of your father.
Use this to cauterise the tissue.
Yes, Doctor.
What happened here?
He went into neural metaphasic shock.
From leporazine? That's unusual.
He couldn't take leporazine, his blood pressure was too low. I had to try a different treatment.
A morathial series?
No. I tried a new rybo-therapy I've been working with. It's called borathium. I've had some very good results.
You used this man to test one of your theories?
Borathium is decades ahead of leporazine and morathial.
Morathial would have saved his life.
His injuries were so severe I don't think any conventional treatment could've saved him.
The point is, you didn't even try standard treatments.
I made the choice I thought gave him the best chance of surviving. Isn't that what you would have done?
I think you used this situation in order to test one of your theories just like you're trying to do with Worf.
That's what this is really about, isn't it? Lieutenant Worf. I'm offering him a chance to recover fully. A chance you can't give him.
What this is about is the kind of medicine you seem to practice.
I make no excuses for my approach to medicine. I don't like losing a patient any more than you do. But I'm looking down a long road, Doctor. This man didn't die for nothing. The data that I gathered is invaluable. It will eventually help save thousands of lives.
I doubt if that will be any comfort his family.
Let me ask you this. If some years from now, borathium therapy were to save the life of someone you loved, would you still condemn me?
I will not be drawn into a hypothetical argument, Doctor. Your research on this ship is over. You're relieved of all medical duties until further notice. Is that clear?
Perfectly.
Doctor? I'm on my way to look in on your patient.
Be my guest. Just don't expect a lot of conversation. He's in full Klingon mode. Honourable, strong and closed minded.
I understand that you've relieved Doctor Russell of duty.
That's right. She's irresponsible. I won't have her practicing medicine on this ship.
Beverly, maybe you should consider letting her go ahead with this genetronic procedure.
How can you say that? She has a theory, based on a little empirical knowledge and a lot of supposition.
If he can't make a full recovery, Worf will to kill himself.
Not in my Sickbay, he won't. I'll put him in a restraining field and post security around his door before I let him commit suicide.
And how long will you keep him there? A week? A month? A year?
If I have to. Suicide is not an option. Putting aside for a moment the fact that a paraplegic can live a very full life, there is also a conventional therapy that could restore much of his mobility.
But not all of it.
No, not all of it! There are some things I can't fix. Klingon or no, he is going to have to accept his condition.
Beverly, he can't make the journey you're asking of him. You want him to go from contemplating suicide to accepting his condition and living with the disability, but it's too far. The road between covers a lifetime of values, beliefs. He can't do it, Beverly. But perhaps he can come part of the way. Maybe he can be persuaded to forgo the ritual in order to take the chance at regaining the kind of life he needs. A Klingon may not be good at accepting defeat, but he knows all about taking risks.
The first tenet of good medicine is never make the patient any worse. Right now, Worf is alive and functioning. If he goes into that operation, he could come out a corpse.
This may not be good medicine, but for Worf, it may be his only choice.
I am ready, Commander.
I've been studying this ritual of yours. Do you know what I've decided? I think it's despicable. I hate everything about it. The casual disregard for life, the way it tries to cloak suicide in some glorious notion of honour. I may have to respect your beliefs, but I don't have to like them.
It is not something I expect you to understand.
No. All you really expect me to do is bring you the knife and then walk away, so you can kill yourself in peace. Well, I'm not going to make it that easy for you.
It is not easy for me. But each of us must die in our own time, and my time
Remember Sandoval? Hit by a disruptor blast two years ago. She lived for about a week. Fang-lee? Marla Aster? Tasha Yar? How many men and women, how many friends have we watched die? I've lost count. Every one of them, every single one fought for life until the very end.
I do not welcome death, Commander.
Are you sure? Because I get the sense you're feeling pretty noble about the whole thing. Look at me, aren't I courageous? Aren't I an honourable Klingon? Let me remind you of something. A Klingon does not put his desires above those of his family or his friends. How many people on this ship consider you a friend? How many owe you their lives? Have you ever thought about how you've affected the people around you? How we might feel about your dying?
Will you, or will you not, help me with the Hegh'bat?
You are my friend, and in spite of everything I've said, if it were my place, I would probably help you. But I've been studying Klingon ritual and Klingon law, and I've discovered that it's not my place to fill that role. According to tradition, that honour falls to a family member. Preferably the oldest son.
That is impossible. He is a child.
The son of a Klingon is a man the day he can first hold a blade. True?
Alexander is not fully Klingon he is part human.
That's an excuse. What you really mean is it would be too hard for you to look at your son and tell him to bring you the knife. Watch you stab it into your heart, then pull the knife from your chest and wipe your blood on his sleeve. That's the rite of death, isn't it? Well, I'm sorry, Mister Worf. I can't help you. There's only one person on this ship who can.
You said you wanted to see me?
I need you to help me.
Anything, Father.
I have taught you about Klingon customs, the beliefs which we value. According to tradition, I must take my life after suffering this kind of injury. But I have decided to break with tradition. I have decided to live.
I'm glad, Father.
I must still undergo a dangerous operation. I may still die, but it will not be by my own hand. Return this to our quarters.
Yes, sir.
Chief Medical Officer:Chief Medical Officer Chief Medical Officer's log, supplemental. After further consultation with Starfleet Medical, and a great deal of soul searching, I have reluctantly granted Lieutenant Worf's request to undergo the genetronic procedure.
We started doing multiplications today. The teacher said I'm faster than anybody else in my class.
We will speak again soon.
Yes, Father.
If I die, he must be cared for.
I'll make sure he reaches your parents' home safely.
No. They are elderly. They cannot care for Alexander. Counsellor, I have a serious request to make of you. Would you consider?
You want me to raise Alexander?
I have come to have a great respect for you, Deanna. You have been most helpful in guiding me since Alexander's arrival. I can't imagine anyone who would be a better parent to my son. If it is too much to ask.
I'd be honoured.
I am ready.
Focus the drechtal beams on the anterior and posterior spinal roots.
Focused.
Initiate.
All neural connections below the first cervical vertebrae have been separated.
Microtome. I'm severing the brain stem now.
Cerebral cortex placed on life support at zero eight thirty one hours. Three hours twenty six minutes remaining until onset of primary brain dysfunction.
Okay, let's remove the support frame.
Exoscalpel.
I've notified Starfleet that our survey of sector three seven six two eight will be delayed at least a week while we drop off survivors from the Denver.
Good. I understand from Mister La Forge there's a minor fluctuation in the starboard warp coil.
I've scheduled a stress simulation routine for this afternoon to check it out. Has there been any word?
No.
Preliminary genetronic scans are complete.
Initiating DNA sequencer.
Reading the initial sequences at ten to the ninth base pairs per second.
Once we're past the first two levels, we'll begin the encoding sequence. Increase TCH levels to
What's happened?
The scanner is having trouble reading the Klingon dorsal root ganglia.
Did this show up in your simulations?
Yes, but I thought I'd made sufficient adjustments. Bring me the detronal scanner. I can scan the ganglia manually. It'll just take a little longer.
One hour forty three minutes until primary brain dysfunction.
Retract the paraspinal muscle.
Got it. Watch the proximal nerve endings.
I see them. Make sure the cranial segment is at least fifteen centimetres from the brain stem.
I'm reading a slight fluctuation in the isocortex.
Twenty cc's inoprovaline.
Okay. Release retractors on the paraspinal. How much longer can we keep him on life support?
Twenty seven minutes.
Cover. Close, please.
Ready.
Tissue growth proceeding at anticipated rates. No initial signs of rejection.
Okay. Ready. Terminate life support.
Life support disengaged.
Neural connections appear stable.
Looking good so far.
Fluctuations in the isocortex.
Forty cc's inoprovaline.
Synaptic response falling.
BP dropping. Now sixty over ten. VeK'tal response falling rapidly.
Increase oxygen mixture to ninety five percent.
Beginning direct synaptic stimulation.
Respiration is shallow and rapid. No response in the isocortex.
Seventy five cc's inoprovaline.
Heart rate is erratic.
He's going into cardiac arrest.
All right, let's go to chloromydride. Fifteen cc's.
We're losing him. No BP, no pulse. Brain activity?
Showing no higher brain functions.
All right twenty five cc's cordrazine.
That'll kill him.
Looks like we've done a pretty good job of that already, Doctor.
No BP, no pulse. No activity in the isocortex.
Cortical stimulator. Now. Again. Again. Again. Again.
Doctor.
All right, make a note in the log. Death occurred at twelve hundred forty hours.
It was all going so well. No anomalies during replication, no initial rejection.
No.
Alexander, I am so sorry.
I want to see him.
Alex.
No! I want to see him.
Activate biomonitors. Twenty five cc's polyadrenaline.
What's going on?
I'm not sure, but if I'm right, one of those unnecessary redundancies
Doctor!
I don't believe it. Begin cardio-aid and ventilation. That's amazing. There must be a back-up for his synaptic functions as well.
Vital signs are stabilising.
Begin rybo-synetic therapy. Increase oxygen mixture to ninety percent. Let's prepare a thalamic booster series.
Well, I'd say your patient's recovery is going well. You're not even going to acknowledge what I did for him, are you. You just can't admit that it was my research that made this possible.
I am delighted that Worf is going to recover. You gambled, he won. Not all of your patients are so lucky. You scare me, Doctor. You risk your patient's lives and justify it in the name of research. Genuine research takes time. Sometimes a lifetime of painstaking, detailed work in order to get any results. Not for you. You take short cuts, right through living tissue. You put your research ahead of your patient's lives, and as far as I'm concerned that's a violation of our most sacred trust. I'm sure your work will be hailed as a stunning breakthrough. Enjoy your laurels, Doctor. I'm not sure I could.
This is going to take time, Worf. Your muscles are still sorting out their new signals. Don't rush it.
Alexander, remember what we talked about? Your father wants to do this by himself.
It's all right, Counsellor. I would appreciate some help from my son. We will work together.
Yes, sir.
O'BRIEN:If it's a boy, Michael, after my father.
Wait a minute. We decided on Hiro, after my father.
O'BRIEN:We talked about this last night.
That's right, and we decided on Hiro.
Wait. I've got it. William. It's a great name. William O'Brien. It's got a nice ring to it.
It's all right. He's just doing somersaults. Here, feel.
Right there.
He's going to be a hell of a gymnast.
May I?
Sure. There, feel it? When he's not turning, he's kicking and punching. When I want to sleep, he wants to wake up. At this point, I just wish it were over.
O'BRIEN:I have to go. I've got a transporter simulation on the bridge. Bye-bye, Michael.
No.
Come on, Geordi.
No.
Just try it once. It is not as hard as you think. I'm telling you, you will be terrific.
All right.  I am the very model of a modern major general, I've information vegetable, animal and mineral. I can't do this.
Yes you can!
I cannot sing in front of people.
You were terrific! You were a little off pitch, but I think I can take care of that. Okay, La Forge as a modern major general.
Captain, I'd like to introduce you to the winners of the primary school science fair. This is Marissa, Jay Gordon, and Patterson. They're here for their tour.
Hello.
Can we see the battle bridge and torpedo bay?
No, I'm afraid not. But we will be visiting the hydroponics and astrophysics laboratories.
I'm sure you'll have a wonderful time.
Well. If you'll come with me.
O'BRIEN:I'm not sure who to feel sorry for, the Captain or the kids.
I want you to know we're very proud of the science fair winners. Perhaps some of you will choose to pursue a career in Starfleet. Well, then. What did you do for your science projects?
I planted radishes in this special dirt and they came up all weird!
I see. That's very, very commendable. And you?
JAY GORDON:An analysis of the life span of the swarming moths of Gonal Four. They only live for twenty hours, then they all die.
How interesting. And you
We're falling!
What happened?
Sensors are picking up subspace distortions and high energy particles directly to starboard.
Looks like we ran into a quantum filament. Damage report?
O'BRIEN:We've lost primary life support. Switching to secondary systems. Impulse and warp engines are offline.
There's another filament moving toward us, sir.
All decks brace for impact!
O'BRIEN:Counsellor?
I'm all right. Medical team to the Bridge. Troi to Sickbay. Counsellor Troi to Captain Picard. Troi to Engineering. Counsellor Troi to any crew member, please acknowledge.
Medical team to the Bridge.
O'BRIEN:The computer's down. It looks like we still have impulse power but not much else.
Lieutenant Monroe!
Chief O'Brien. The turbolifts aren't working. We're trapped up here.
Are you, are you children all right?
Bridge, this is Picard. This is the Captain. Can anyone hear me?
Why don't they answer?
I don't know.
JAY GORDON:They're all dead.
They're not dead. Communication is down, that's all.
JAY GORDON:We're going to die, too.
We most certainly are not. Now listen to me. No one here is going to die. The bridge will be sending a rescue party as soon as possible. So I want you all to stop crying. Everything is going to be all right.
O'BRIEN:This is the Federation Starship Enterprise calling any vessel within range. We are in distress and need assistance. Please respond. I'm still not sure we're even transmitting. I'll set the message on auto repeat and see if we get a response.
O'BRIEN:Are you all right?
I'm alive. What the hell happened?
O'BRIEN:We were hit by a quantum filament. Most of our systems are down and we haven't been able to contact anyone off the bridge.
Well, don't count on leaving through there. An emergency bulkhead closed just beneath that lift.
O'BRIEN:Confinement mode.
Right. Isolation protocol.
I'm not really familiar with that protocol.
O'BRIEN:If the computer senses a hull breach, it automatically closes emergency bulkheads to isolate the breach. Until we can clear those bulkheads, we'll be cut off from the rest of the ship.
I have partial sensors back online. I'm picking up sporadic life signs throughout the saucer section. There are definitely survivors.
O'BRIEN:What about Ten Forward?
Ten Forward?
O'BRIEN:My wife's there.
I'm sorry, Chief. The readings are not that specific.
Can you scan the drive section?
I'm not reading any life signs in the drive section.
Could the sensors be malfunctioning?
There's no way to know. Without the main computer, I can't run a full diagnostic.
O'BRIEN:Can you sense anything, Counsellor?
There are a lot of people still alive. Many of them are hurt but I can't tell where they are.
We need to start emergency procedures. Who's the duty officer?
O'BRIEN:Lieutenant Monroe was in command, but she's dead. I believe Counsellor Troi is the senior officer on the deck.
Counsellor Troi?
O'BRIEN:She carries the rank of Lieutenant Commander.
I'd appreciate some suggestions.
O'BRIEN:I recommend we initiate emergency procedure alpha two. Bypass computer control and place all systems on manual override.
Very well.
O'BRIEN:Aye, aye, sir.
May I suggest that our next priority be to stabilise life support and try to re-establish intership communications?
Yes. Mister Mandel, I'd like you to assist Ensign Ro.
Yes, sir.
How do you feel?
Okay. A little foggy.
Just lie still for a while. We'll get you to Sickbay as soon as we can.
Okay.
Report.
I have surveyed all the turbolifts and service crawlways on this deck. Access to the Bridge has been completely severed by emergency bulkheads.
Sickbay?
Heavy damage to section twenty three A has cut off access to Sickbay. I have ordered a security team to bring casualties here until further notice.
I think we should assume the worst, that everyone on the Bridge is dead. There's no one is in control of the ship.
In that circumstance, re-establishing control should be our top priority.
Agreed. Can we get to Engineering?
Yes, sir. The most direct route is blocked, but I believe we can use a starboard service crawlway.
Okay, you and I will try to get there. Mister Worf, this room is going to fill with wounded in a few minutes and they're going to need help. I want you to stay in charge here.
Yes, sir.
Let's go.
Over here.
Yes, sir.
Okay. Clear the power shunt.
The shunt is cleared.
Right. And bypass the flow current, and . The computer still won't release the doors.
Can we force them open?
Yes, we can try. There's an emergency hand actuator.
Geordi?
Yes?
This wall is hot.
Where?
I'm all right, but I think we've got a new problem. One of the energy conduits must've ruptured and ignited the polyduranide inside the bulkhead. That's a plasma fire.
It's putting out a lot of radiation. We can't stay in here very long.
We've got a bigger problem than that. The quaratum in these containers is used in emergency thruster packs. It's normally pretty stable stuff but when you expose quaratum to radiation, it has a way of exploding.
The external power is cut off.
JAY GORDON:We're going to die.
What was that?
I don't know.
Your name is Marissa. Is that right? Well, Marissa, I'm going to need a first officer to help me. You're the oldest and so that makes you my Number One.
Number One?
That's what I always called my first officer. So, here.
There. Now, Number One, we need a crew to help us get that hatch off. Don't you think that Jay here would make an excellent science officer? What do you say, Jay? Will you join our crew?
JAY GORDON:It's Jay Gordon.
Of course. Forgive me, Jay Gordon.
JAY GORDON:I accept.
There.
Can I be an officer, too?
Well, let me see. Your science project involved radishes, did it not?
Yes, sir.
Then I shall appoint you my executive officer in charge of radishes.
There. Right, then let's get to work.
Thirteen sixty five baker. That should put us right behind shuttlebay two.
That is correct, sir. We have approximately fifty two metres remaining in this crawlway before we can safely exit into a main corridor.
Coolant leak!
We can withstand this level of radiation for another three or four hours without any permanent damage. We'll need a few days of hyronalin treatments.
What are the radiation levels in the quaratum?
They're at eighty three rads and rising at a rate of about four rads per minute.
That stuff gets unstable at around three hundred and fifty rads. I still haven't been able to get any power to this transporter.
The radiation levels is about twenty percent lower at this end of the bay. Let's move the containers over to here.
That's a good idea. It should buy us some time. You know we're going to have to do this by hand. With all the radiation floating around in here we can't trust the antigrav units.
O'BRIEN:There. Just before the second time we were hit. See the subspace distortion?
Yes. How big is a quantum filament?
O'BRIEN:It can be hundreds of metres long, but it has almost no mass, which makes it very difficult to detect.
So, it's like a cosmic string?
O'BRIEN:No. that's a completely different phenomenon.
O'BRIEN:How did you do that?
I diverted power from the phaser array and I dumped it into the engineering control system.
O'BRIEN:You what?
Engineering station's online, Counsellor.
O'BRIEN:But that's a completely improper procedure. You can't just dump that much raw energy into a bridge terminal without blowing
We're not going to get out of this by playing it safe.
What is our engine status, Ensign?
We've got half impulse power available, but I'm getting some odd readings from the warp drive. I'm reading a spike in the warp field array. It looks like a containment deviation.
O'BRIEN:Switch to primary bypass.
Nothing. Field strength's at forty percent and falling. We've got a problem. The quantum resonance of the filament caused a polarity shift in the antimatter containment field.
O'BRIEN:When the filament hit us, the ship was momentarily charged, as if it had come into contact with a live electrical wire.
That weakened the containment field surrounding the antimatter pods. The field strength is at forty percent and it is still falling.
O'BRIEN:If it falls to fifteen percent the field will collapse and we'll have a containment breach.
Which means?
Which means the ship will explode.
Commander, the current cannot be off down from this relay box.
We can't just sit here.
If the energy flowing through that arc were interrupted by a nonconductive material, it is likely the circuit would be broken.
I don't see any material in here that could handle that much current.
Commander, much of my bodyframe is made up of tripolymers, a non conductive material.
Are you suggesting we use your own body?
Yes, sir.
Data, there's half a million amps flowing through that arc. Could your body handle that much current?
The power surge would cause a system failure in my internal processors and melt my primary power couplings. However, there is a chance that the damage would not be irreparable.
No.
Commander, our options are very limited.
First of all, android or not, I wouldn't ask anyone to take that kind of risk. Second, if the computer is not working in Engineering, I'm going to need your help to get control of the ship.
My positronic brain has several layers of shielding to protect me from power surges. It would be possible for you to remove my cranial unit and take it with you.
Let me get this straight. You want me to take off your head?
Yes, sir. Is something wrong, sir?
Well, Data, would you be all right?
My memory core and neural nets are self-contained. I would be fine, sir.
Well, like you said, our choices are very limited.
Data? Data! Data.
A remarkable experience, Commander.
Are you all right? Did the shielding work?
Apparently so, sir. My neural nets are still fully operational. You may begin by opening the ventral access panel located two centimetres beneath my right ear.
Can you climb up?
JAY GORDON:Yes, I think so.
Good. Now look down the sides of the lift. Can you see two big clamps?
JAY GORDON:Yes, I see them.
Can you see if those clamps are attached to long beams inside big grooves?
JAY GORDON:Yes. But one of them looks broken. It's half out of the groove.
All right. Come down.
All right. Number One, those big clamps are part of the emergency system. If something goes wrong, they're designed to hold the turbolift in place. But it would seem that they're damaged.
Is that why we keep shaking?
That's right. Now, when they give way, we shall fall. So you've got to get your crew out of here before that happens. Now, there is a ladder along the wall of the shaft. You can climb up that until you come to an open doorway.
What about you?
My ankle is broken. I will just slow you down when you need to move quickly. Now, you are the leader. And that's an order.
We have to climb up the shaft.
I want to stay here with you, Captain.
Patterson, you're an officer. You have to obey orders.
I don't want to be an officer any more. I want to stay here with you.
JAY GORDON:If the captain stays here, we won't make it. We'll all die.
We don't have time to argue. You must go now.
The crew has decided to stick together. We all go or we all stay.
All right. I'll try. But I want you to know this is mutiny. Now, Number One, look at that control panel. Now, the yellow control pad, hit that once. Now the one below it, hit twice. Now that should release the panel underneath.
Yes, it did.
Now, you can pull it away.
Okay.
Good. Now, that bundle of wires, that's optical cabling. See how much of that you can pull out.
The levels are still rising. There must be some way to put that fire out.
The energy's being fed by the ship's internal power grid and we can't even get near that. The only way to stop it would be to eliminate its supply of oxygen. Wait a minute. Doctor, I've got an idea. It's kind or wild, but we just might be able to kill two birds with one stone.
Let's hear it.
Okay. We open the external door. That would depressurise the cargo bay and suck all of those containers out into space. At the same time, the lack of oxygen should put out the plasma fire.
What about us?
We just need to find something in here to hold onto while the air is evacuating. Then, we close the door, repressurise the bay.
What about this?
Yeah, that ought to do it.
There that should do it.
There will be a sharp pain as I set the bone. Prepare yourself. Good. Good, you bore that well.
Keiko?
I'm all right. I think.
Perhaps you should lie down.
Oh, oh, oh. I'm having contractions.
I believe that is not uncommon in the late months of pregnancy.
No, I mean contractions. I'm going into labour.
You cannot. This this is not a good time, Keiko.
It's not open for debate. Like it or not, this baby is coming.
O'BRIEN:If the containment field strength continues to drop at its present rate, we still have at least two hours before it becomes critical.
But you're ignoring the fact that the power coupling is also damaged. If that coupling overheats, the field strength could drop a lot faster. We could have a containment breach in a matter of minutes.
What do you suggest?
We should separate the saucer now, and put as much distance as possible between us and the drive section.
O'BRIEN:Excuse me, sir, but that's damn cold blooded. What about the people down there?
There's no evidence that anyone is still alive in the drive section.
O'BRIEN:No evidence they're dead, either. If you were trapped down there, would you like us to just cut you loose and leave?
No, of course not. But I also wouldn't expect the bridge crew to risk the safety of the ship and hundreds of lives in a futile effort to rescue me.
You said there was no way to stabilise the containment field from the Bridge. Could it be done from Engineering?
O'BRIEN:Yes, but my readings indicate there's no power down there. They don't even have monitors to tell them there's a problem.
Could we divert energy from the Bridge to those monitors?
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
I'll say it again. There is no reason to believe that anyone is alive in Engineering. We're wasting time even talking about this. We have to separate the ship now.
I believe there are still people alive down there and I'm going to give them every chance. Assuming they're alive, they'll be hoping there's someone up here who can help them. So we'll help them. Chief, divert the necessary power to Engineering.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
I remind you, Counsellor, that power coupling could overheat at any moment. By not separating the ship now, you may be responsible for all our deaths.
Thank you, Ensign. Proceed.
I can't open this door. We're going to have to climb up to the next deck.
What if that one doesn't open either?
JAY GORDON:Then we'll never get out.
Quiet, both of you. That's an order.
We're going up. Ready?
Ready, sir.
The lift's falling! Hang on!
We're all right. We're going to keep on climbing. Just don't look down.
JAY GORDON:What's wrong?
He's scared.
We're right with you, Patterson. You're not going to fall. Everything will be all right if you just keep climbing. What we need is a climbing song. Marissa, is there a song you sing at school?
The Laughing Vulcan and His Dog?
I'm afraid I don't know that one. I know. Frere Jacques. That's a song I used to sing when I was at school. Patterson, do you know that one? Good. It goes like this. Frere Jacques, Frere Jacques, dormez vous? Dormez vous?
Sonnez les matines, sonnez les matines, ding ding dong, ding ding dong.
Very good. Now, keep singing.
Frere Jacques, frere Jacques, dormez vous? Dormez vous? Sonnez les matines, sonnez les matines. Ding ding dong, ding ding dong. Frere Jacques, frere Jacques, dormez vous? Dormez vous? Sonnez les matines, sonnez les matines. Ding ding dong, ding ding dong. Frere Jacques, frere Jacques
Your contractions are now only thirty seconds apart. Dilation has gone to seven centimetres since the onset of labour. That did not take long.
That's easy for you to say.
You are doing very well. I am sure the child will arrive soon.
Worf, has the baby turned?
Turned?
So the head is down. Doctor Crusher told me a few days ago that it hadn't. She wasn't worried because I still had a month to go.
I am not certain. Can't you tell?
Worf, have you ever done this before?, delivered a baby?
Yes. No. I have taken the Starfleet Emergency Medical Course. In a computerised simulation, I assisted in the delivery of a human baby.
Sometimes it doesn't go by the book, Worf.
I am sure everything will be fine.
Once the air is vented, the first thing you'll feel is extreme pressure in your lungs. You have to resist the temptation to exhale. Next, our hands and feet will get cold, then numb, and some of the capillaries on exposed sections of the skin may burst.
Sounds like fun.
We will have about fifteen seconds of useful consciousness, then about ten seconds of extreme disorientation, then we pass out.
Okay. Once the air is evacuated, one of us is going to need to get to that panel to repressurise the bay.
We're ready. Are you okay?
The field strength is down to twenty percent. We cannot run the risk of staying here any longer.
O'BRIEN:We're in no danger until it drops below fifteen percent. We can afford to wait and see if anyone in Engineering notices those monitors.
Have you made preparations to separate the Saucer section?
Yes, sir. We're in stand by mode for docking latches.
O'BRIEN:Ensign there's a thermal inversion in the power coupling!
Quick, cross-connect to the transfer coil. That was close.
What happened?
Exactly what I said might happen. The power coupling overheated and the entire containment field almost collapsed. O'Brien's fixed it temporarily, but this could happen again at any moment, and next time we might not be able to stop it. You can't let wishful thinking guide your decision, Counsellor. It's time to leave.
We will separate the ship when I decide that it's time, and not before. Is that clear, Ensign?
Yes. Perfectly.
Okay, try it.
Very good, Commander. You have established a connection. I can now raise the door.
There's no power on this entire deck, yet somehow these monitors are working.
The power reaching those monitors has been diverted from the Bridge, sir.
But why? Unless there's something they want us  something they need us to see. Wait a minute. Data, the containment field strength is down to eighteen percent. Can you stabilise it?
No, sir. I do not have access to the containment field. You will have to establish a new link. Locate the ODN conduit, sir.
Got it.
Yes, sir. You must now change the input matrix in my secondary optical port and then connect the ODN conduit.
That is not the correct port, sir.
Sorry.
You must hurry, Commander. The containment field has dropped to sixteen percent.
I'm trying. You need a bigger head.
The field continues to drop, sir. Collapse is imminent.
Try it now.
I have a connection, sir. I am now stabilising the containment field.
O'BRIEN:Sir, the field strength is stabilising. Eighteen percent, twenty, twenty five.
I guess they got our message. I was wrong, Counsellor.
You could have easily been right.
Congratulations. You are fully dilated to ten centimetres. You may now give birth.
That's what I've been doing.
Bearing down is the next stage. It should start at full dilation. Why has it not begun?
I don't know. I don't think it's up to me. It happens when it happens.
The computer simulation was not like this. That delivery was very orderly.
Well, I'm sorry!
Did you feel an uncontrollable urge to push?
Good. You are bearing down. Now you must push with each contraction and I must urge you gently but firmly to push harder. Push, Keiko. Push hard. Push, Keiko. Push. Push.
I am pushing!
The baby is emerging head first. One more contraction.
Okay.
That's good. Push. Push. Hard. I have the baby. I will smack the child to induce breathing.
Now I will cut the umbilical cord. Blanket. I believe she looks like Chief O'Brien.
Hello. You were wonderful, Worf. I couldn't have done it without you. Hello.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are en route to Starbase sixty seven, to undergo repairs. Life aboard the Enterprise is slowly returning to normal.
Now just wait here.
You just can't stay away from the big chair, can you?
I don't think I'm cut out to be Captain. First officer, maybe. I understand there aren't many qualifications.
Captain Picard to the Bridge, please.
Hello. It's good to see you again. What brings you to the Bridge?
In appreciation for the way you helped us get out of the turboshaft, and the way you helped us not be scared, we want to present to you this commemorative plaque. Give it to him.
Thank you. Thank you very much.
I made the back piece.
And a wonderful job you did of it, too. Well, later this afternoon, we're going to finish the tour I promised you, starting with the battle bridge. I'll see you at fourteen hundred hours. You have the Bridge, Number One.
RIKER + MARISSA:Aye, sir.
Jake! Jake! Jake, wait a second. How're you doing?
I'm fine. Really.
Jake, I'm sorry.
Acting Ensign Crusher, report to transporter room eight.
It's not your fault.
Yeah, I know. I wish both of us were going.
I don't know. Only thirty two points.
Mister Crusher, respond.
I'm on my way, Doctor. I've got to go.
I know. Hey, Wes. Do well for both of us, okay?
All right.
Captain's log, stardate 41416.2. We're orbiting Relva Seven, where Wesley Crusher is about to be tested for entrance into Starfleet Academy. And to my great surprise, I have just learned that my old friend Admiral Gregory Quinn is on Relva Seven, and has requested to be beamed aboard the Enterprise immediately.
Welcome aboard, Admiral.
Thank you. Captain Jean Luc Picard, Lieutenant Commander Dexter Remmick.
Sir.
Allow me to introduce my staff. First Officer William Riker, Chief Medical Officer Beverly Crusher, Chief of Security, Natasha Yar. Well, what can we do for you?
I need to speak with you.
Certainly. This way. Number One?
Alone.
Is this a personal matter?
Official business.
Well then my First Officer
Alone, Captain.
Commander Remmick is with the Inspector General's office.
Oh?
He'll be conducting a full investigation of the Enterprise.
What are you looking for?
I have reason to believe there may be something very wrong on this ship.
Tell me what you suspect.
It's inappropriate to discuss it at this time. Mister Remmick, Starfleet is counting on you. You will find out what is wrong on this ship.
Yes, sir. Nothing and no one will stand in my way.
And you, Captain, are ordered to cooperate in every way necessary with this investigation. Is that clear?
Yes, sir.
Mister Remmick, unless there are any further questions.
No questions, sir.
Get on with your duties.
Yes, sir.
We've known one another for years. Tell me what you believe is wrong.
Captain, it is vitally important that my orders be followed exactly. I'll be staying on the ship.
As you wish, Admiral.
What is it?
What?
The unit you just put down. Don't worry. I won't tell anyone.
It's a flux coordinating sensor.
I'm Oliana Mirren, one of the other finalists. You must be Wesley Crusher.
Yeah. Do you know me?
I heard there was a very smart, very young man who'd be tough competition.
Well, you wouldn't be here
I weren't smart. I know. But there's a lot more to it than just that. You're lucky. You've had practical experience aboard the Enterprise.
T'SHANIK:Oliana.  T'Shanik of Vulcana Regar.
Wesley Crusher of the Enterprise.
T'SHANIK:You do not look as if you meet the age requirements.
Uh, I'll be sixteen next month.
Happy birthday.
Excuse me.  I'm Wesley Crusher.
Mordock.
Mordock? The Mordock? The Benzite who constructed the Mordock Strategy? I thought you already were in the Academy.
No. Only a hopeful, like you.
Finalists, please take your seats I'm Tac Officer Chang. Welcome. You are here because you are all top candidates. Although only one student will be chosen for the Academy, you have shown from the preliminary testing that any of you could easily qualify. This may be the most difficult, exhausting experience of your life, and the most exciting challenge. Expect the unexpected. May you all do your best.
May I help you, Mister Remmick?
Keep on doing whatever it is you're doing, Commander Data.
There's nothing much to see here, Commander. We're in a standard orbit, and the station has to be manned even if it's just routine.
Something I can help you with, Mister Remmick?
When I'm ready, Mister Riker, I'll want to speak with you. Privately.
Commander, just having that guy around makes me feel guilty. What's he after, anyway?
I don't know, Geordi, but I'm going to find out. Right now.
Come.
Captain, may I speak frankly?
Always, Number One.
As First Officer, I should be informed. I should know everything that you know.
That's right, you should.
Then what's this about? Remmick is going to turn this ship upside down.
That's his job.
And my job is to see that this ship runs smoothly.
Which you do very well.
Sir, am I under investigation?
I don't know.
And if you did?
I couldn't tell you.
I don't understand, sir. This is extremely frustrating.
No less so for me. But I promised cooperation, and that's what we shall give.
Sir.
I want some answers from you now, Commander Riker.
Later.
You were ordered to cooperate
Not now.  When it doesn't interfere with my duties, Remmick.
Last question on the hyperspace physics test. If the matter and antimatter tanks on a Galaxy class starship are nine tenths depleted, calculate the intermix ratio necessary to reach a starbase a hundred light years away at warp factor eight. Begin.
Time elapsed. You now have one hour free before the next test.
I must admit, Wesley, you have a very fast mind.
Once as I realised it was a trick question, there was only one answer.
Yes, there is only one ratio with matter antimatter. One to one.
You don't know how lucky you are. I can't imagine what it would be like to have things come so easily. I have to push every step of the way.
Oh, no, Oliana, it doesn't come that easily. I have to study all the time.
It's a good thing you're cute, Wesley, or you could really be obnoxious. See you later.
Did you hear what she said, Mordock? She said I was cute.
Is that good, Wesley?
Yes! I think.
I think I should apologise, Captain.
No need, Number One. Mister Remmick's presence is unnerving, to say the least.
Are you available now, Mister Riker? Or do you still have duties to perform?
I'm available, Mister Remmick.
Any problem with using your Ready room, Captain?
No, Mister Remmick. Be my guest.
If you prefer to stand, fine, Mister Riker. It won't have an effect on the length of my inquiry.  Now, there are several seeming discrepancies in the Captain's log. Let's go over them one by one, shall we?
The Captain's log?
Yes. To the best of your knowledge, has the Captain ever falsified a log?
Have you discussed this with him?
Right now, I'm asking you.
If you want to discuss anything about Captain Picard, you bring him in here and ask him face to face.
You are required to answer my questions, Mister Riker, unless you're trying to cover something up! Now, there are several discrepancies in the Captain's log. Shall we go over them one by one?
Proceed.
So, you are saying Captain Picard had no control over this vessel. He handed it over to Kosinski, who took the entire crew to the edge of the universe.
No, sir. That's not what I'm saying. Now, Kosinski was sent by Starfleet to improve our warp drive system. Captain Picard was ordered to take him aboard.
According to his own logs, his Bridge crew didn't think highly of Mister Kosinski's theories, yet the Captain allowed him to access to the engines anyway. Is that true, La Forge?
Not exactly, sir.
One way or the other, La Forge, Picard lost control of this ship. Is that true?
Yes, but that's not how it happened.
So, the answer is yes.
Do you believe the captain is emotionally and psychologically fit for command of this starship? There is nothing in his history or his personality that would suggest mental lapses?
Nothing.
Not even the Ferengi incident with his old ship, the Stargazer?
He was being controlled by a mind altering machine, Commander. Without his knowledge.
I would call that a mental lapse.
Ensign, what are you doing on the holodeck? I thought you were still on Relva Seven.
I'm finished testing for the day.
I've disturbed you. I'll leave.
Wait. I thought I wanted to be alone, but I guess I don't.
How is the testing?
Okay. So far. It's not the ones that I've studied for that I'm worried about. It's the psych test. Facing my deepest fear and living through it. I'm trying to figure out what images to bring up.
Why?
I guess I want to scare myself. What do you think? Bulgallian rats? Lightning storms?
Do those things frighten you?
Sort of, I guess.
The psych test is no more or less important than the rest of the process.
That's what they said, but I can't stop thinking about it.
Thinking about what you can't control only wastes your energy and creates its own enemy.
How can they know what my deepest fear is when I don't?
By analysing your psychological profile. They were very accurate about everyone I tested with. Including myself.
You? I thought there was nothing that could frighten a Klingon warrior.
Only fools have no fear.
I'm sorry, Lieutenant. I'm asking too many personal questions.
It is very difficult for me to depend on anyone for anything. But especially for my life.
But on the Enterprise you do that every day. Everyone depends on everyone else to protect them.
Yes.
So you overcame it?
No. It is still my enemy.
With this new extricator, sir, we can eliminate three more bulky machines from cargo space.
That's excellent, Number One.
Captain, there's an unauthorised entry in main Shuttlebay.
Unauthorised?
Who is it, Lieutenant?
Computer reads the ID number of Jake Kurland. Bridge to main Shuttlebay. Mister Kurland, this is Lieutenant Yar. Respond.
Isn't the area secured?
Not now, Remmick. He's going to take this out, Captain.
I'm locking off the bay launch doors, Captain.
Too late. He's using the flight emergency override
Smart kid.
Kid?
He's launching.
On viewer. lieutenant Yar, open channel. Enterprise to shuttlecraft. Mister Kurland, this is Captain Picard. Mister Kurland.
Captain, I'm going to Beltane Nine
To sign onto a freighter. Tell my father I'm sorry.
You can tell him yourself, in person. Bring that ship back at once.
No.
I can't face him. I'm leaving.
Captain, he's unbalanced the dilithium reaction.
I've lost power!
All he's got left are his manoeuvring jets, Captain.
At this trajectory, he'll enter the atmosphere and burn up at two hundred kilometres.
Probable impact?
Atmospheric entry seventy eight seconds.
Options?
Tractor beam?
Not possible. He's too far away for a positive lock.
He's out of transporter range.
Captain, you are completely responsible for that boy's life.
Mister Remmick, either get out of my way and keep quiet, or I will have you removed from the Bridge. Viewer on shuttle cockpit.
Visual on main viewer.
Mister Kurland.
I can't get the engine started. What am I going to do? I'm going to crash.
He needs another fifty seconds for the core to cool down before it can restart.
Stay calm, Jake. We'll get you back.
Please, help me!
Jake!
It's no use, Captain. I'm going to die out here.
He'll need another thirty seconds before he can restart.
Irrelevant, sir. Even if he restarts his engine now, he will not have enough thrust to escape impact.
Mister Kurland, you are not going to die out there. You are going to do exactly what I tell you. Now, take the nose of the shuttlecraft and aim it directly at Relva Seven.
Aim it at Relva? I can't do that. It's crazy.
Do it!
But I'll burn up!
Twenty eight seconds to impact.
Jake, listen very carefully. This is Captain Picard and I am giving you an order. Aim the shuttle at Relva!
Okay. It's done.
Good.
Now, monitor your speed exactly. When it hits point zero two zero, I want you to restart the engine
And when I tell you, pull up hard. JAKE Point zero two zero speed. Captain, I sure hope you're right.
You'll just have to trust me.
Point zero zero three.
Zero zero nine. Zero one two.
Six seconds to impact.
Hold on, Jake. It's going to be a little bumpy.
Zero one five.
Zero one nine.
Restart the engine, now! Pull up hard!
Yeah!
Incredible, Captain!
How did he do it? I thought
He built up enough speed and then bounced her off the atmosphere!
Mister Kurland, I assume you can manoeuvre it home?
Yes, sir.
Do it. Then report to Mister Riker.
Yes, sir!
Very original, Captain. But how did that child acquire access to a shuttlecraft?
Kurland is a highly qualified Enterprise Academy candidate, fully trained in many areas including shuttles.
And did this full training include discipline?
Mister Remmick, young men sometimes make rash choices. Which is why Mister Kurland will receive a strong refresher specifically in discipline
I'll note that in my report.
Full cooperation, Number One.
You. I have a package for Operations. Where is it?
End of the corridor, room on your right. One oh four.
Excuse me.
You blocked my path. you Bulgallian sludge rat!
I'm sorry, it was an honest mistake. I apologise.
Is there a problem here, gentlemen?
No, sir, I
How dare you! I am Rondon, you despicable Melanoid slimeworm! Liar!
Who do you think you're bullying? You bumped into me. It was your mistake. You were at fault. Do you want this to become violent?
Friend. I like you.
A very strange reaction.
Not really. When he raised his hand, I saw that it was webbed. The sign of a Zaldan.
But you became hostile.
Zaldans are infuriated by courtesy. They view it as a form of phony social behaviour, designed to cover true feelings.
Congratulations, Mister Crusher. You handled that particular incident very well.
Was this incident deliberate?
It's important to know how you candidates deal with other cultures, other species.
Then it was a test.
Yes. Not all tests are announced, or what they appear to be.
Zaldans have webbed fingers? I wouldn't have passed.
You're an android, correct?
Yes, sir.
And as an android, you are programmed to tell the entire truth?
Yes, sir.
There is a problem with this ship, Mister Data. It's in the records, somewhere. I need your help to find it.
All of the ship's records are available to you, sir.
This information is very cleverly hidden. Your Captain is not what he appears to be. Do not forget you have loyalty to Starfleet above all else.
Loyalty is not the issue, Commander. There is nothing wrong with Captain Picard or the ship's logs. Therefore there must be something wrong with your original assumption.
That is not acceptable, Mister Data.
Acceptable or not, sir, it is the truth.
Just how did this contaminant get aboard the ship?
By accident, sir.
Meaning Captain Picard has no standing procedure for this type of situation?
No. Meaning by accident, sir.
You don't like me very much, do you?
Is it required, sir?
How would you characterise your relationship with Captain Picard?
We're Starfleet officers who've known each other for many years.
Everything said here is confidential, Doctor. You can be completely open with me.
About what?
About how you feel serving with a man who is responsible for the death of your husband.
My personal feelings about Captain Picard are irrelevant to this investigation, and none of your business.
Then you confirm the accuracy of the log report. You violated the Prime Directive with the Edo. You deliberately interfered with their laws.
Yes. It's exactly as I explained it in the log records.
All to save Doctor Crusher's son?
A member of my crew was being held unjustly. I stand by my decision. Mister Remmick, you have talked to every member of this ship. I think you've had enough time to find out whatever it is you're looking for.
Are you afraid if I keep looking that I'll find you're guilty?
The only thing I'm guilty of is allowing this charade to go on so long.
Admiral, if it is me you're investigating, ask me directly what it is you want to know. And please tell me exactly what is going on.
I need a little more time, Jean-Luc.
How much time? I won't tolerate my crew being harassed any longer.
Remmick's full report is almost ready.
I want to be here when he presents it.
That has always been my intention. Commander Remmick, report to Admiral Quinn.
On my way, sir.
This has been a strain on our friendship.
I know. Believe me, Jean Luc, I regret that, but it has been necessary.
I can't get it.
Yes, you can. Don't fight it. Relax into it and let it come by itself.
No, it's going too fast. Wesley, I can't do it.
Yes you can. You've got your rotation factor. Just put in your vector coordinates.
Time elapsed.
Congratulations, Mordock. That was the second fastest time ever recorded on this test. You all did well.
No, it should not have been that way. Mister Crusher helped me.
Yes. I know. An interesting choice, Mister Crusher. Especially considering how close you and Mister Mordock are in overall score. You all have an hour to prepare for your last test.
The psych test, sir?
We prefer to think of it as a psychological evaluation based on reactions to various individual problems, but psych test will do.
Sir?
Please sit down, Mister Remmick. Proceed with your report.
Admiral, I've done my best to be thorough during this investigation.
Continue.
I couldn't find what you asked, sir. I spoke to officer after officer, at length. I pried into the ships log reports. And yet I could find nothing wrong. Except, perhaps, a casual familiarity among the Bridge crew, but mostly that comes from a sense of teamwork, and the feeling of family. I'm sorry, sir. I did my best.
Quite. You're dismissed, Commander.
Yes, sir. Captain Picard, my tour in the Inspector General's office will be up in six months. When I'm finished, this is where I'd like to serve, sir.
Don't judge the young man too harshly. He's a good officer.
It's not him I'm inclined to judge.
Don't judge me too harshly either, until I've finished. We had to be very sure of you. Some of us at Starfleet Command became suspicious of certain problems in the Federation.
What kind of problems?
Something or someone is trying to destroy the fabric of everything we've built up in the last two hundred years.
What's your evidence?
I can't go into that. There are too many people involved.
What do you want from me?
I don't know whether the threat comes from the inside or whether it's from outside. I need people I can trust in strong positions throughout the Federation.
You have my complete support. You know that.
That's not enough. I want to promote you to Admiral, and I want you to take over as Commandant of Starfleet Academy.
The Academy.
Yes.
The Academy?
I need you close.
Then there was never a problem with the Enterprise.
No, but I had to be sure you hadn't been co-opted.
Greg, this is politics, and I'm not good at politics. Surely there are others who are better suited.
All right. Even if I am wrong, and I hope I am, you're still the best man for the job.
I appreciate the value of what you're offering. It's not a decision I can make quickly.
I need an answer soon.
All right. You'll have it tonight, Admiral. Thank you.
Mister Mordock will be finished with his psych test momentarily.
Mordock? Are you all right?
I will be.
Mister Crusher. You're next. Good luck.
I'm here. I'm ready.  Maybe they forgot. Breathe. Got to remember to breathe.
Evacuate immediately. Sixty five seconds to seal off.
Somebody help! There's something's wrong in the Environmental lab!
Help!
Help! We're trapped. I can't move. Please, help me.
We're going to die in here!
The liquid hydrogen's going to blow! The shut off valve ruptured. Hurry up! My legs are crushed. You've got to help me!
Give me a hand with this!
MAN 2:We're going to die!
Help me!
MAN 2:I can't! It's too late!
Thirty seconds to seal off.
Come on!
If we don't get out of here fast, they'll seal us in to contain the explosion.
Come on, you're not hurt.
MAN 2:I can't go through that!
Yes, you can. You've got to.
Twenty seconds to seal off.
Come on! I can't carry you both! You're not hurt.
Ten seconds to seal off.
Come on!
MAN 2:It's too late.
I'm sorry.
Officer Chang! There's
Wesley! It's all right.
Thanks.
An excellent performance, Mister Crusher.
Performance? That was the test?
Yes.
A man could have died.
Theoretically, yes. You had to make a choice. And you did. There's no right or wrong about it. Your greatest fear has been that you couldn't make that decision.
Because of my father? Because Cap. Because someone made that choice, and my father died.
Sir?
Yes, Number One?
Mister Remmick has left the ship.
Yes. He found nothing wrong on the Enterprise. And you can inform the crew that Admiral Quinn is most impressed.
Thank you. They'll be pleased that. Can you explain now what he was after?
They were after me, Number One. They want me to take over as Commandant, Starfleet Academy.
Congratulations! What a wonderful choice, sir. You'll be able to shape the minds of the future leaders of Starfleet. You haven't decided what you're going to do.
Yes, I have, Number One. I've decided I'm going for a walk.
I'm proud of all of you. You've done a superb job. Each of you would make a fine Starfleet officer. It's unfair that only one candidate from Relva will attend the Academy this year, and a loss to the Federation if the rest of you do not return to test again. Mister Mordock will be the candidate. His results were slightly higher than Mister Crusher's. Congratulations, Mister Mordock. You're the first Benzite in Starfleet.
Thank you, sir, but it's not right. It shouldn't be me. Wesley lost points because he helped me. He should not be punished for his generosity.
He wasn't. He lost time, but it wasn't only that. Candidates, thank you. And good luck.
I am sorry, Wesley.
It's okay. You deserved to win. Besides, you would have done the same thing for me.
Yes. I believe I would.
T'SHANIK:Congratulations.
Well, personally, I hate losing. So you'd better be ready next year, Wesley. I won't be easy to beat.
Mister Kurland!
Yes, sir.
Are you feeling better?
Yes, sir, Look, I'm sorry I damaged the shuttle, Captain. But Mister Riker says I can work on fixing it as part of my discipline training.
Good idea. I hope you learned that running away solves nothing.
Yes, sir. And I am sorry I messed up.
At least you kept your wits about you out there. Don't forget that.
No, sir. And thank you. Thank you for saving my life.
That's my job, young man.
Yes, sir.
Mister Crusher? Why aren't you in your dress uniform for Admiral Quinn's farewell dinner?
I didn't think that would be appropriate.
Why not?
I failed, Captain. I didn't get into the Academy. I failed you and I failed the Enterprise.
Ridiculous. Did you do your best?
Yes.
When you test next year, and you will test next year, do you think your performance will improve?
Yes.
Good. The only person you're truly competing against, Wesley, is yourself.
Then you're not disappointed?
Wesley, you have to measure your successes and your failures within, not by anything I or anyone else might think. But, if it helps you to know this, I failed the first time. And you may not tell anyone!
You? You failed?
Yes. But not the second time. Now, you'll do me the courtesy of joining us at dinner. I have to disappoint an old friend.
Wish I could convince you to change your mind.
I'll serve you better here.
This is where you belong.
If you need me.
I've been playing politics too long. Perhaps I see conspiracies everywhere. Don't worry. Safe travels, my friend.
Set course to Algeron Four, Mister Crusher.
Course plotted and laid in, sir.
Then shall we continue with our mission?
Yes, sir.
Excellent. Mister Crusher, engage.
Come.
I thought you'd like to know the Council members have beamed aboard and been assigned their quarters.
Excellent.
Captain, it really is quite late.
Tell me, Counsellor, with regard to my lecture, what do you think would provide greater clarity? A chronological structure, or the division of each excavation's findings into various religious, sociological and environmental sub-groupings?
I thought you'd already decided on a chronological structure.
There is something to be said for a more scientific approach.
May I make a suggestion?
By all means.
Relax. You've written a brilliant speech.
It will need to be. Tomorrow I'll be addressing some of the greatest scientific minds in the Federation. Switzer, Klarc-Tarn-Droth, McFarland. Giants in the field of archaeology. Compared to them I'm just an enthusiastic amateur.
I doubt they see of you as an amateur. Not when it comes to Tagus Three.
Well, it's true, I have done my homework I have examined the findings of every archaeological expedition conducted on the planet surface.
It is unfortunate that the Taguans no longer allow outsiders to visit the ruins.
Indeed. Especially since we know so little about their origins. But I think that I have constructed some plausible theories of my own.
And I'm sure the council members will agree with you.
Your support is appreciated, Counsellor.
Now goodnight, Captain.
Bring back any memories?
Vash. How did you get in here?
I came in through the window.
I had no idea you were a member of the Archaeology Council. You are a member, aren't you?
More or less.
Why did you come to Tagus Three?
To see you, of course.
Is that the only reason?
Isn't it enough?
I wish I could believe you.
I really have missed you, Jean-Luc.
Excuse me.
I'm sorry I'm late. Oh. Excuse me. I didn't realise you had company.
That's all right. Er, allow me to introduce you. This is Beverly, Doctor Beverly, Doctor Beverly Crusher. This is Vash. She's a friend of mine from the Archaeology Council.
I didn't mean to interrupt. The Captain and I often share morning tea together.
Yes, I know. Jean-Luc has told me all about you.
Really? When was that?
On Risa, where we met.
I see. That must have been during your vacation last year.
No. Yes. Yes.
Well, I'm surprised he never mentioned you.
So am I. Doctor, are you busy?
Not at the moment.
I was wondering, I would love to see some more of this marvellous ship.
I would be delighted to show it to you.
I, er
That is, if it's all right with you, Jean-Luc.
Of course.
Don't worry, I promise to behave myself.
And this is Ten Forward, where the Council's welcoming reception will be held today.
Well, I can't think of a better location. Tell me, does Jean-Luc come here often?
Not often. The Captain is a very private man. Would you like something to drink?
Please.
Eternity never looked so lovely.
Excuse me?
I was referring to the view. Eternity never looked so lovely.
You must be Commander Riker.
I'm afraid you have me at a disadvantage.
I didn't mean to interrupt. I believe you were about to tell me that my eyes are as mysterious as the stars.
You're Betazoid.
Not at all. It's just that Jean-Luc does a very good imitation of you.
He does?
I see you two have met.
Not exactly.
This is Vash, a member of the Archaeology Council. And a friend of the Captain's.
So I've gathered.
They met during his visit to Risa.
On Risa? That vacation must have been better than he let on.
You mean he never mentioned me to you, either?
Doctor Crusher, please report to Sickbay.
I'm afraid I won't be able to finish our tour. But perhaps Commander Riker could take over for me.
It would be my pleasure.
This is the main Bridge, the command centre of the Enterprise and our last stop. Vash, Commander La Forge.
Vash.
Hello.
Commander Data.
Hello.
How do you do.
And this is Lieutenant Worf.
Hello.
Something wrong, Lieutenant?
I had not been informed that Council Members had been granted bridge clearance.
Well, I think we can make an exception in this case. Vash is a guest of the Captain.
Welcome aboard.
Thank you. Is this where Jean-Luc sits?
That's the big chair.
Well, I can see where being a starship Captain has its rewards.
I'm that glad you approve.
I suppose I'll go back to my room now and get ready for the reception.
By all means. Well, I suppose I'll see you then, then.
I look forward to it.
Fascinating woman.
I don't understand, I thought being the ship's Counsellor meant the Captain confided in you.
He does, when he thinks it's necessary.
And he never spoke to you about me?
Not that I recall.
Not even a hint?
You must understand, the Captain is a very
TROI + VASH:Private man.
I know. Excuse me?
Of course.
Nice legs. For a human.
Jean-Luc, we need to talk.
Excuse me.
The reception seems to be going well.
Forget the reception for a moment. Why have you never mentioned me to your friends?
What would you have me tell them?
Maybe that we met, for one thing. That we had an adventure together, some fun.
It wouldn't be possible.
Why not?
It would be inappropriate.
I wasn't expecting you to go into intimate details.
A Captain does not reveal his personal feelings with his crew.
Is that a Starfleet regulation, or did you just make that up yourself?
I'm sorry if you're upset.
And I'm sorry if my being here embarrasses you.
How was the reception?
Splendid.
Jean-Luc, it's wonderful to see you again. How about a big hug? Well don't just stand there, say something.
Get out of my chair.
"Oh, and I was hoping for something more along the lines of, welcome back, Q, it's a pleasure to see you again my old friend."""
We're not friends.
You wound me, mon capitaine.
There, perhaps now your manners will show some improvement.
What brings you here, Q? Have you been banished by the Continuum once again?
Oh, hardly. They're still apologising to me for the last time.
Then what is it you want?
Do I always have to have a reason to stop by? I was merely in the sector, I. You force a confession from me. The truth is, I have a debt to repay.
A debt?
To you. And it gnaws at me, and it interferes with each of my days.
I have no idea what you're talking about.
Without your assistance at our last encounter, I never would have survived. I would have taken my own life but for you.
We all make mistakes.
Your good deed made possible my reinstatement in the Continuum, and I resent owing you anything. So, I'm here to pay up. Tell me, what is it you wish and I'll be gone.
Just be gone. That'll do nicely.
No, no, no, no, no. It has to be something more, more constructive. That's my new word for the day.
Some other time, Q. Right now I have other matters to attend to.
Yes, your speech. I read it. It's dull, plodding, pedantic, much like yourself. I could help you with it.
No thank you.
You've never actually been to the ruins at Tagus Three, have you?
No. They were sealed off more than a century ago.
Well, that explains it, then. How can you write about something that you've never seen. I know, why don't I take you there?
Out of the question. That would mean breaking Taguan law.
Must you always be so ethical? I suppose we could travel back in time. You could see what Tagus was like two billion years ago. They really knew how to party back in those days.
My answer is still no. My lecture will have to stand on its own. Now, will you please leave my ship.
You are simply the most impossible person to buy a gift for.
Commander Riker, will you report to my Ready room?
Yes, Captain?
I've just been paid a visit from Q.
Q? Any idea what he's up to?
He wants to do something nice for me.
I'll alert the crew.
Captain.
Who's there?
It's me.
Who?
Jean-Luc.
Yes?
May I come in?
Let me try to explain. I am by no means embarrassed by your presence here. On the contrary.
What's this? A map of the ruins? I thought that I was the only reason you came to Tagus.
I never fooled you for a second. Still, you are the most important reason.
Am I?
That's the trouble with being such a well-known liar. Even when I'm telling the truth, no one believes me.
This equipment will have to be confiscated.
Is that necessary?
If the Taguans were to catch you down there.
Oh, come on. You gave me the same warning about Sarathong Five.
I remember.
Well, it didn't stop me from going there. I brought back some very impressive artefacts, too.
Which no doubt you sold for a very impressive profit.
That's what I do!
Not on board my ship. I will not allow it.
Let's get one thing straight, though, Picard. I cannot change who I am for you or anyone else.
Nor can I change who I am.
Then we have nothing more to say to one another.
So it would seem.
Sleeping alone?
I'm in no mood for your foolishness, Q.
I knew there was something different about you. You seem tense, preoccupied, somewhat smaller. At first I thought it was that horrible lecture of yours, but I was mistaken.
Whatever game you want to play will have to wait until tomorrow.
I had such high hopes for you, Picard. I thought you were a bit more evolved than the rest of your species. But now I realise you're just as weak as all the others. Still, it pains me to see the great Jean-Luc Picard brought down by a woman.
What woman?
Don't play coy with me, Captain. I witnessed your little spat with Vash. Nor will I soon forget the look of anguish on your face. The pain, the misery. If I didn't know better, I would have thought you were already married.
You must be very bored, Q. Your imagination is running away with you.
This human emotion, love, is a dangerous thing, Picard, and obviously you are ill-equipped to handle it. She's found a vulnerability in you. A vulnerability I've been looking for for years. If I had known sooner, I would have appeared as a female. Mark my words, Picard, this is your Achilles heel.
Believe what you wish.
Do you deny that you care for this woman? Believe me, I'd be doing you a big favour if I turned her into a Klabnian eel.
Stay away from her, Q.
I was just trying to help. My debt to you
Is hereby nullified. I don't want your help, your advice, your favours or for that matter, you. Do you understand? Once and for all!
You would have me stand idly by as she lead you to your destruction?
Yes!
As you wish.
Ladies and gentlemen, members of the Archaeology Council. Welcome. Mystery. It is the mystery of Tagus Three that brings us together today. It is a mystery that has invited more argument, more deduction, more speculation than the best works of fiction. And if you'll excuse the conceit, I want to tell you about my detective story. For several years now, I have been trying to unravel the secrets of Tagus Three.
Needless to say, I've not succeeded.
However, I have, I believe, turned up some new information, that, if nothing else, raises a whole new set of mysteries and I hope that we can discuss them here together.
There have been nine hundred and forty seven known archaeological excavations conducted on the planet's surface. Of those, some seventy four are generally believed to have revealed findings of major importance.
The earliest was some twenty two thousand years ago.
What the hell?
Q!
Is this Tagus Three?
I doubt there are many oak trees on Tagus. No, I think this is supposed to be Earth, somewhere round about the twelfth century. And this is England, or to be more precise, Sherwood Forest. Or at least Q's recreation of it.
That would explain these costumes.
Quite right, Number One. Or should I say, John Little.
Well, if he's Little John, that makes you
I know. Robin Hood.
Sir, I protest. I am not a merry man.
On the contrary, Lieutenant Worf. Your clothing identifies you with the character of Will Scarlett, just as Geordi's mandolin identifies him as Alan A-Dale
And you, Mister Data, bear a striking resemblance to Friar Tuck.
SIR GUY:I have you at last, Robin Hood.
Quick, into the forest. Mister Worf. That's an order.
SIR GUY:Enough, you fools. We'll never find them in the greenwood.
I've managed to stop the bleeding.
Q. It's about time you showed up.
I would prefer if you addressed me as His Honour the High Sheriff of Nottingham.
We will no longer share in this pointless fantasy of yours.
Fine. stay here and do nothing. By midday tomorrow, your crew will be safely aboard their ship. Of course, you will have to accept the consequences of your inaction.
Consequences?
What is the one thing that Robin Hood is most famous for?
He robs from the rich and gives to the poor.
Besides that.
Perhaps you are referring to the rescue of Maid Marian from Nottingham Castle?
Yes, Data. And it just so happens that Sir Guy of Gisbourne has decreed that Marian's head shall come off tomorrow at noon.
Vash.
It's your choice, Robin. You can either take your ease in this sylvan glade or risk your life to save the woman you care nothing about.
My feelings toward Vash are irrelevant. I would attempt to save any innocent life, as you well know.
Yes, but what about your merry men? Are you willing to jeopardise their lives as well? Is Vash's life worth more than Data's or Troi's or Worf's? You know, Worf, you'd make a perfect throw rug in Nottingham Castle.
Q, I ask you to put and end to this before someone gets hurt.
Oh, that's impossible. You see, I've given this fantasy as you call it, a life of its own. I have no more idea what's going to happen than you do. But of one thing I am absolutely sure. If you dare come to Nottingham Castle, blood will be spilt.
Oh, you'll wear yourself out with all that pacing, Milady.
I told you to stop calling me that. The name's Vash.
My poor lamb. You've got a brain sickness for sure. Can't I get you something to ease your suffering?
I could use a drink.
Well, I wasn't thinking of spirits, Milady, but I have some nice fresh leeches. To drain the fever.
Out. Get out.
Oh, her mind's in an awful turmoil, Sir Guy.
Who the hell are you?
Milady, everyone in Nottingham knows, Sir Guy of Gisbourne.
Sir Guy of what?
SIR GUY:Leave us.
SIR GUY:Do not mock me, Lady Marian. I'm prepared to offer you one last chance to change your mind. Will you marry me?
SIR GUY:I see. Then the execution will proceed as scheduled.
What execution?
SIR GUY:I warn you, Marian, this pathetic attempt at feigning madness will not save your life.
You mean I'm the one being executed? Sir Guy, wait a minute. Couldn't we talk this over? I admit, I haven't been myself lately. Maybe we've both been a bit hasty? Please?
Sorry.
Data, are you alright?
The arrow impacted just above my sixth intercostal support, penetrating my secondary subprocessor. Fortunately, none of my biofunctions seem affected. Do not be concerned, Counsellor. I believe your aim is improving.
We've got to get out of here, Captain.
Not we, Number One. I want you and the others to stay here until I return.
You're not going to try to save her yourself, sir?
This is not a mission. It's personal. It's between Q and myself. I don't want the rest of you involved.
Captain!
You have your orders, Commander. And I expect you to follow them.
A touch sharper, shall we?
Such benevolence, Sir Guy. Allowing the condemned prisoner fresh air?
SIR GUY:You're mistaken, Sheriff. Maid Marian has promised to be my wife.
What? But that's impossible?
Not at all. Though I admit a maiden seldom has the opportunity to win herself such a noble husband.
SIR GUY:A toast. To the most beautiful bride-to-be in the whole of England.
Don't drink that! It could be poison.
SIR GUY:Have you taken leave of your senses?
A foul scheme of Robin Hood's. She's in league with him still, I'll warrant.
Robin Hood? Oh, Robin Hood. Oh, well, that was over long ago.
All of Nottingham knows you're still in love with him.
That's a lie. He bewitched me. He put me under some evil spell.
SIR GUY:I suspected as much. You can add sorcery to the list of charges against that rogue.
Sir Guy, if anyone's been bewitched here, it's you.
SIR GUY:Silence. Any more impudence and it'll be your head on the block. Guard, escort the Lady Marian to her chamber.
But I'd much rather stay with you.
SIR GUY:Of course you would, my child. But I have important business to attend to.
SIR GUY:Lovely creature.
Intriguing.
One step closer and I'll scream!
Vash, damn it, it's me!
Jean-Luc! Oh, am I glad to see you. You wouldn't believe what I've been going through. One minute I'm on the Enterprise, the next thing I know I'm here in Nottingham. First, they're going to chop my head off, now I'm supposed to marry someone named Sir Guy, and everyone insists on calling me Marian.
Yes, I know.
You do? But how? You're Robin Hood!
My staff and I were brought here by an old adversary of mine named Q, and I'll tell you the rest of that once we're safe. Come, we don't have much time.
And the others are outside?
They're waiting for us back at Sherwood Forest.
You mean you came here alone?
That's right, now come on.
What kind of plan is that?
It's an excellent one if you'll just hurry up.
You do realise our lives are at stake here.
Only too well.
And this is the best strategy you could come up with? One man against an entire castle.
You have a better one?
How about this? You go, I'll stay here.
And do what?
Marry Sir Guy if I have to.
Well that's brilliant.
If there's a way to escape, I'll find it, eventually. With my head still attached.
You really believe I would leave you here?
I can take care of myself.
You are the most stubborn woman I ever knew.
Hey!
SIR GUY:There'll be no escape for you this time, Robin Hood.
You stay behind me.
You should have left while you had the chance.
SIR GUY:Well done, my dear.
Consider it my wedding gift to you, darling.
Congratulations, Sir Guy. I see you've snared the jackal.
SIR GUY:It's Marian who deserves the credit. Took him with his own sword.
You sent for me, Milady?
I want you to take this letter to Robin's men.
You want me to go to Sherwood Forest at this time of night?
You'll leave immediately.
But it's dark. I'll get lost. Besides, it's not safe. What with all them hedge robbers and worse lurking about.
Please, this is urgent.
If you ask me, you'd be better off with Sir Guy. He's got a future. Why, you'll be living in London afore you know it.
But you must go, otherwise they'll kill him.
Out.
How dare you barge in here like this
I've come to apologise for my harsh words. I had no idea that you were so ruthless.
That's most gracious of you.
I admit I was surprised, but no more surprised than Jean-Luc.
You're Q.
Yes. And you are a very interesting woman. What is this?
Give me that.
A letter to Riker. Quick, Come to Castle. Save the Captain. Why, this is wonderful. What marvellous duplicity. You certainly fooled Sir Guy, and me as well. I think you're worth further study.
Am I?
Yes, but unfortunately we just don't have the time. Guards! Take this traitor away. It appears there's going to be a double execution.
This whole thing is your fault.
My fault?
Yes, your fault.
If you hadn't grabbed my sword we'd be back in Sherwood by now.
I grabbed your sword to prevent you from being killed.
Oh, really? Not as a wedding present for Sir Guy?
You know I had no intention of going through with that.
Do I? You should never have interfered.
You're the one interfering.
I was just trying to rescue you.
Well next time don't bother.
Don't you worry. I won't.
Don't the two of you ever stop arguing? Now, tell me, Robin, as you stand here facing the termination of your insect existence, do you see what brought you to this end? Was she worth it?
Can we just get this over with.
Are you implying that I'm not worth it?
Q, your game was for my benefit. She is innocent in all of this.
She is many things, none of them innocent.
Let her go.
Jean-Luc, you do care.
A gallant gesture, Robin, but a futile one. Farewell. I hope the two of you are happy together.
SIR GUY:You have been found guilty of outlawry and high treason. Do you have anything to say before sentence is carried out?
I.
SIR GUY:Prepare them for the block.
Off with their heads.
There are too many of them.
Data, we need a diversion, now.
SIR GUY:Guards! Take Marian to the tower.
SIR GUY:I'll have you know I'm the greatest swordsman in all of Nottingham.
Very impressive. There's something you should know.
SIR GUY:And what would that be?
I'm not from Nottingham.
Jean-Luc.
It's over, Q! Get us out of here.
My compliments, Picard. I doubt Robin Hood himself could have done much better.
If you have hurt any of my people
Sadly enough, they're all fine, but my point is they could have been killed, and so might have you. All for the love of a maid. My debt to you, Picard, is paid. If you've learned how weak and vulnerable you really are, if you finally see how love has brought out the worst in you
Nonsense. You're absolutely wrong. It's brought out the best in him. His nobility, courage, self-sacrifice, tenderness.
Oh, you're good. You're really good.
Enough of this.
Indeed.
Everybody here?
Where's Vash?
Computer, locate Council Member Vash.
Council Member Vash is not aboard the Enterprise.
Hello, Jean-Luc.
Well, this is a relief. I thought that perhaps Q had found
Well he had some things to discuss with me.
Indeed? Surprised he's not busy gloating over his victory.
He was right about one thing, you know. As ridiculous as it was, his game did prove that you still care.
I may not show my feelings to my crew, but I do have them.
I'm going to miss you, Jean-Luc.
So, where are you off to now?
I haven't made up my mind.
After all, she has the entire universe to choose from.
Meet my new partner.
Him?
Why not?
I'll tell you why not.
Now, Jean-Luc, let's not be unkind.
He's devious, and amoral, and unreliable, and irresponsible, and, and definitely not to be trusted.
Remind you of someone you know?
As a matter of fact, it does.
We're going to have fun. I'm going to take her places no human has ever seen.
Who can resist an offer like that?
As payment in full for your debt to me, you will guarantee her safety.
She will not be harmed, Jean-Luc. I promise you that. Well, are you going to kiss her goodbye? All right.
Well? Aren't you?
Oh, I'm sorry, I forgot my hat.
Goodbye, Jean-Luc.
Enter.
Am I intruding?
No, sir. My apologies, Captain. I can be back in uniform
No, that won't be necessary, Mister Worf. I'm not here as your captain. I'm here as the man who stood with you before the High Council. Your cha'DIch. We will arrive at your home world in less than a day.
It is not time yet.
That doesn't sound like the man who came to me a year ago fiercely determined to return home and to clear his father's name or die trying. Isn't it time to confront the Council? To regain your family name? Let the truth be known?
I have been told that patience is sometimes a more effective weapon than the sword.
Patience is a human virtue, one which I am glad to see you've taken to heart. But doesn't this situation require a more Klingon response? Your discommendation is a facade to protect less honourable men. It is a lie. Lies must be challenged.
I have grown weary of bearing this dishonour.
Riker to Picard.
Go ahead, Number One.
We've been intercepted by the Klingon vessel Bortas.
They claim to be our escort.
No escort was scheduled.
The Bortas is standing by, Captain.
On screen. Gowron. This is an unexpected pleasure.
I must speak with you, Picard. We will have to move quickly if we are to be successful.
Successful?
Yes. In preventing a Klingon civil war.
The family of Duras is massing support. They have many allies on the Council.
Duras died in disgrace. By Klingon tradition, his family should share that disgrace.
Their corruption has poisoned the Empire. Honour will soon have no meaning.
And who speaks for his family now?
Lursa and B'Etor, the sisters of Duras.
And they would claim the leadership of the Council?
Women may not serve on the Council.
Then how
I don't know. But they are plotting something. They have secured the loyalty of at least three fleet commanders. Lursa and B'Etor are feared, and fear is power.
I do not see what I can do to assist.
You were first chosen as Arbiter of Succession because no Klingon could be trusted. You accepted this duty and you must see it through to the end. You must ensure my installation.
That is beyond my purview.
You will not support me?
I will not step outside the traditional role of the Arbiter.
And if they attempt to block my installation?
Then I can only assure you that I will deal with any challenge according to Klingon law.
I fear that will not be enough.
Mister Worf, would you escort our guest to the transporter room?
Begin monitoring Romulan activity along the Neutral Zone, Mister Data. Have the outpost stations send us their tactical reports.
Aye, sir.
The Duras family are preparing to move against Gowron.
Backed by Romulans?
I don't know. But there is too much history between the Duras and the Romulans to discount the possibility.
Dismissed.
I would speak with you.
I do not hear the words of traitors.
I am not a traitor.
You admitted your guilt before the Council.
I accepted discommendation to protect the Empire.
Protect it? How?
It was Duras' father who betrayed our people to the Romulans at Khitomer, not mine.
Duras? There is proof of this?
There is.
Why would you accept dishonour to protect Duras?
His family was too powerful. To expose him would have split the Empire. Instead, the Council chose to blame my father.
The Council knew?
I believe you to be a man of honour, Gowron. I ask you, restore my family name.
Worf, you killed Duras. I consider that no small favour. But what you ask is impossible.
But after your installation
The grasp of Duras reaches out from the grave. Much of the Council is still loyal to his family. I must have the Council's support to survive. I cannot expose their treachery. You chose to accept this disgrace for the good of the Empire. Now you must live with your decision, like a Klingon.
Guinan?
It's a little quiet down in Ten Forward, so I thought I'd get off a little target practice. Do you mind if I join you?
You? Practise?
I like to keep my eye sharp.
I practice at level fourteen.
Guess I could come down to that level for a while. Begin programme.
You know, I had a bet with the Captain that I could make you laugh before you became Lieutenant Commander.
Not a good bet today.
I've seen you laugh. I like it.
Klingons do not laugh.
Oh yes they do. Absolutely they do. You don't. But I've heard some Klingon belly laughs that would curl your hair.
Your son laughs. He's a Klingon.
He is a child and part human.
That's right. And you're not, you're full Klingon except you don't laugh.
I do not laugh because I do not feel like laughing.
Other Klingons feel like laughing. What does that say about you?
Perhaps it says that I do not feel like other Klingons.
Programme complete.
Good game. Don't feel bad. I was doing this long before you were born. So how is he? Your son.
He is having difficulty adjusting to life on Earth.
I can see where it might be hard for the little guy. Living with humans, being Klingon. Could be very confusing.
It will not be easy for him.
No, it won't. But at some point he's going to want to know what it's like to really be a Klingon. Just as you're learning.
Come.
Captain, I request a leave of absence.
Mister Worf, request granted.
Thank you, sir.
Lieutenant. Qapla!
And good luck.
Lieutenant Worf, personal log, stardate 44996.1. I have located the Klingon ship on which my brother Kurn serves as captain, and have arranged to join him.
It has been too long, my brother.
Too long. We have much to discuss. I have asked Gowron to restore our family honour. He has refused.
Gowron will not live to see the day he leads the Council.
What do you mean?
He stands alone, surrounded by his enemies. Lursa and B'Etor will have him killed. And if they don't, I will.
You will?
Gowron is weak. The family of Duras must never be allowed to lead the Council. Our leaders have failed us. They no longer deserve our loyalty. It is time to sweep away the old Council and put a new one in its place.
How can this be done?
I already have the support of four squadron commanders in key strategic sectors. When the time comes, they will follow me. Join us, Worf, and we will usher in a new era and regain our family name.
No.
What?
Gowron has completed the Rite of Succession. It is our duty to support him.
Gowron spits in your face when you ask him to give back what is rightfully ours and you would support him?
We cannot regain honour by acting dishonourably.
I will not support Gowron.
I am the elder brother, Kurn. I speak for our family. We will back Gowron. But not now. Not yet. We will wait until he feels the grasp of his enemies around his throat. Then we will offer him our support. And the price will be the restoration of our family name.
It will be difficult to convince my allies to back Gowron. But I will try. I must go to the Mempa sector to meet with the other squadron commanders.
Contact me when you have gained their support. Then I will be ready for Gowron.
Captain's log, stardate 44996.8. My role as Arbiter of Succession has again brought me to the Great Hall of the Klingon High Council.
K'TAL:naDev ghoS!
K'TAL:Have you reached a decision regarding the succession of power?
Qaja plu d'itch jung. La woq you ghir klas qimha. Gowron. Doj hon. Doj hon.
K'TAL:Gowron, son of M'Rel, hakt'em. The Arbiter confirms that you have completed the Rite of Succession. Your enemies have been destroyed. You stand alone. Do you wish to claim leadership of the Council?
I wish it.
K'TAL:Are there no other challengers?
There is one. I will challenge him.
An arrogant child!
K'TAL:Who are you?
I am Toral, son of Duras.
Duras had no son.
B'ETOR:But he did, Gowron.
So, this is your doing, Lursa.
We wish to address the Council.
K'TAL:Lursa, B'Etor, come forward.
Members of the High Council, it is a day of great rejoicing for the family of Duras and the Klingon Empire. We have discovered that our brother did indeed have a son and heir.
This is outrageous. Duras had no mate. Where did you find him, Lursa? In a harlot's bedchamber?
I will personally cut your tongue out, Yintagh!
Impudent wretch.
B'ETOR:A simple genetic scan will prove his bloodline is valid.
The illegitimate son of Duras cannot rule the High Council.
K'TAL:The Arbiter will consider his validity. Len'mat.
Our allies on the Council backed Toral's claim. It's in Picard's hands, now.
Excellent. Everything is proceeding as scheduled.
Why not just kill Picard?
B'ETOR:Fool! Do we want the Federation as our enemy?
No.
At least, not yet. But when the time is right we will deal with the Federation and Captain Picard.
I have met with the other squadron commanders here. Three will join us, one will not. That gives us enough strength to control seven key sectors.
Do you know the strength of our enemies?
They have at least seven squadrons, but most of the fleet has not decided which banner to follow.
Gowron is nearly out of options. Soon he will have no choice
I will return soon to the home world. We shall meet then.
Do you also require the original logs recorded during the attack, Lieutenant?
Everything we have on the Khitomer massacre.
We can provide you with our analysis of the communications between the Khitomer outpost and the Romulan ships. However, for a complete record you will have to contact Starbase twenty four
Mister Worf. Have you cancelled your leave?
No, sir.
Lieutenant, would you join me in my Ready room?
Mister Worf, you're using our files on the Khitomer massacre as evidence against Duras' father?
Yes, sir.
Do you not see an inherent conflict of interest here?
Sir, those Federation records will help me prove that my father was falsely accused of treason.
You are using your position as a Starfleet officer to affect political change on your planet. There could not be a worse compromise of our fundamental principles.
Do not tie my hands now. I must be able to prove my father's innocence. Those Federation records can do that.
Mister Worf. Here I am lecturing you on a conflict of interest while I'm desperately trying to avoid one of my own. Do you think I wish to allow the Duras family to solidify their hold on the Council? Do you think I cannot see for myself the implications for the Federation? Good Lord, Duras tried to have me killed! All of my instincts, my training, my very being as a Starfleet officer are at odds with my responsibilities as Arbiter of the Klingon High Council. We walk the same tightrope between two worlds, you and I. We must try our very best to keep those two worlds separate, or we shall certainly fall.
Yes, sir.
I will make the Khitomer massacre files available to anyone who wants them. To the High Council, to the Duras family, to you. Anyone.
Thank you, sir.
Mister Worf, this is as far as I can go.
Riker to Picard.
Yes, Number One.
There's a message coming in for you from the surface. It's coded personal.
Send it through.
B'ETOR:Captain, welcome. Please, come in. Be seated.
Something to drink, Captain? Tea. Earl Grey, perhaps?
Thank you.
B'ETOR:You come alone, and unarmed
Nothing would be served by killing the Arbiter before his decision.
B'ETOR:Nevertheless, a brave act, Captain.
B'Etor.
Your invitation was unexpected.
B'ETOR:We should have extended it much sooner.
We don't want you to judge us by your experience with our brother.
B'ETOR:Duras was a fool.
He deserved to die.
B'ETOR:Forget him. We have.
We do not wish to be your enemy.
B'ETOR:Quite the opposite.
That pleases me.
Have you made your decision regarding Toral's challenge?
I am pursuing it with due vigilance.
B'ETOR:Allow me to heat your tea.
Toral has the bloodline to lead the Empire into the next century. He has the support of the people.
Then it remains to see if he has the support of the law.
B'ETOR:But he must. Surely, you can see that.
I'll tell you what I see. If I find Toral's challenge valid, the two of you will very quickly gain control of the Council and Gowron will be found dead shortly thereafter. If I reject Toral's claim, you will accuse me of serving Federation interests. It will serve as a rallying cry to declare war and overthrow Gowron.
You see very clearly, Captain. But one thing is missing. If you rule against us and we are victorious in a war against Gowron.
B'ETOR:Which we would be>
It will mean the end of the alliance with the Federation.
B'ETOR:And we would hate to see that happen as much as you would.
This is not a threat, Captain. Just an unfortunate truth.
B'ETOR:So why be our enemy, when you can be our friend?
You have manipulated the circumstances with the skill of a Romulan. My decision will be announced at high sun tomorrow. Excellent tea. Good day, ladies.
K'TAL:What is your decision?
K'Tal, this Council knows the law of heredity well. G'now juk Hol pajhard. A son shall share in the honours or crimes of his father. Toral is Duras' son. That has been established by the genetic scan. But with due respect to the traditions and laws of this High Council, there is no basis for accepting a petition for leadership from a boy who has fought no battles, shed no blood for his people, or earned no honour for himself. One day, perhaps he shall. But not now. Duras is dead. His claim to the leadership died with him. Gowron shall lead the Council.
The Arbiter has ruled. There are no more challengers.
Does the Federation dictate Klingon destiny or do we? Follow me and I will show you honour.
Follow him and you reject all Klingon law.
Can you not see what you are doing? Are you blind to what they represent? Then go. Your blood will paint the way to the future.
Your message said it was urgent. What do you want?
Your forces are weak, Gowron. You need help to fight the family of Duras.
From one dishonoured Klingon.
I offer you four Klingon squadrons.
Why would they follow you, a Starfleet officer?
They are pledged to support my brother, Kurn.
Kurn is your brother?
Yes. His true bloodlines were hidden to protect him.
Kurn will follow me? He has opposed me in the past.
I am the elder brother. He will do as I say.
What is it you want in return?
You know my price.
The return of your honour. For the support of four squadrons? No, that will not be enough. The Duras family controls most of the fleet. We must have Federation help.
They will not intervene.
Perhaps not yet, but Starfleet Command will listen to Picard and Picard listens to you.
I can ask nothing more of him in this matter.
What?
My duty as a Starfleet officer
You come to me and demand the restoration of your family honour and now you hide behind human excuses? What are you, Worf? Do you tremble and quake with fear at the approach of combat, hoping to talk your way out of a fight like a human? Or do you hear the cry of the warrior calling you to battle, calling you to glory like a Klingon?
Status!
Aft shields down.
Warp coils damaged.
Red alert.
A second ship has joined the attack on the Bortas.
It's begun.
Send an emergency signal to any loyal ships!
Impulse engines not responding!
Engage emergency override!
Override engaged. Disruptors still not responding.
The Bortas has lost her port shields, sir. It is unlikely they will withstand another hit at that quarter. Their primary life support has failed, sir.
The Bortas has put out a general distress call.
Ensign Riol, plot a course to take us safely away from the combat area. Half impulse.
Captain, the Bortas is Gowron's ship. If he's the legitimate leader of the Empire, shouldn't we help him?
If we go to the aid of the Bortas, we'll be dragging the Federation into a Klingon civil war.
What about Worf?
Ensign, engage.
Port shields are still down.
Disruptors online.
Lock on target.
No. Don't you see? Their sensors will detect the weapons lock. If they think we're helpless, they will try to board the ship. I can aim and fire disruptors manually when they drop their shields.
GhoS.
Thirty five thousand kellicams. Twenty thousand kellicams. Now within transporter range.
SuH.
They're dropping their shields.
BaH!
Firing on second target.
They were able to raise the shields in time. Minor damage only.
Disruptors offline.
All power to shields.
Shields failing!
Incoming message.
On viewer.
This is Captain Kurn of the Hegh'ta. We come to defend the Empire and to follow the banner of Gowron.
The enemy has sustained major damage to its life support systems They have disengaged.
You have done well, Commander Kurn. Lursa and B'Etor have moved more quickly than I anticipated. We shall not underestimate them again. Meet us at the Great Hall.
Advise the Enterprise that their delegation is welcome to attend my installation as leader.
Captain's log, stardate 44998.3. With new-found support, Gowron has chosen to proceed with the installation ceremony. The Enterprise has returned so that I may perform my final duty as Arbiter of Succession.
K'TAL:Receive now the loyalty of the Council and of the Empire.
Qapla!
naDev ghoS.
You both fought as warriors. You have proved your hearts are Klingon.
I return your family honour. I give you back that which was wrongfully taken from you. Let your name be spoken once again. You are Worf, son of Mogh.
The Duras family is gathering a large force near Beta Thoridar. As per the terms of the Treaty of Alliance, I now formally request your assistance in fighting these enemies of the Empire.
These enemies are Klingons.
By right and tradition, I am the sole leader. All who oppose me are traitors.
I understand your position, but I', sure you're aware that the Federation cannot interfere in what is, by definition, an internal Klingon affair.
You arbitrated the Rite of Succession. You are already involved.
My duties in that regard are finished.
Captain, we must intervene. The Duras family is corrupt and hungry for power with no sense of honour or loyalty. They represent a grave threat to the security of the Federation. Captain, you and I know that they have conspired with Romulans in the past. If they should be victors in this war, they will surely form a new Klingon-Romulan alliance. That would represent a fundamental shift of power in this quadrant. Starfleet must support Gowron. It is in the interests of both the Federation and the Empire. I beg you, support us in our cause.
Mister Worf, I don't have to lecture you on the principle of non interference. As Starfleet officers, we have all sworn an oath to uphold that principle whatever our personal feelings. I'm sorry. I must refuse your request.
Mister Worf. I'm afraid I must recall you to duty. The Enterprise will be leaving this sector immediately.
Captain, I respectfully request that I be allowed to take an extended leave of absence.
Mister Worf, your responsibilities as a Starfleet officer are incompatible with remaining on board a Klingon ship during a time of war.
Captain.
I order you to return to duty at once.
Then I resign my commission as a Starfleet officer.
I will await you aboard the Bortas.
Enter.
Am I intruding?
No, sir.
I understand that you'll be serving on board the Bortas.
As weapons officer.
Your tactical knowledge and experience will serve them well.
Thank you, sir.
Mister Worf, are you certain that this is the right decision?
I was rescued from Khitomer by humans. Raised and loved by human parents. I've spent most of my life around humans, fought beside them. But I was born a Klingon. My heart is of that world. I do hear the cry of the warrior. I belong with my people.
Being the only Klingon ever to serve in Starfleet gave you a singular distinction, but I felt that what was unique about you was your humanity, compassion, generosity, fairness. You took the best qualities of humanity and made them part of you. The result was a man who I was proud to call one of my officers. I'll have your belongings transported to the Bortas.
Thank you, sir.
Attention on deck.
Permission to leave the ship, sir?
Permission granted. Qapla'
Goodbye.
Dismissed.
Picard has rejected Gowron's plea for help. The Enterprise has left orbit.
Coward! He didn't have the courage to face us. The Federation is
Celebrate later, Toral. We should not discount Jean Luc Picard yet. He is human, and humans have a way of showing up when you least expect them.
Mister Data?
No changes, Commander. I can detect no abnormalities in the star's radiant energy.
Prepare two class one probes.
Probes ready, Captain.
Initiate launch sequence.
Captain, Klingon attack cruiser de-cloaking, bearing zero one zero mark two three seven.
Belay that order, Mister Data.
Did Starfleet mention any Klingon ships in this sector?
On screen.
We are being hailed.
All stop, Mister Crusher.
Aye, sir. All stop.
Open a channel.
K'EHLEYR:Hello, Captain Picard.
Ambassador K'Ehleyr. This is an unexpected pleasure.
K'EHLEYR:It's good to see you again, Captain. Lieutenant Worf.
How may we be of assistance, Ambassador?
K'EHLEYR:There is an urgent matter we must discuss, Captain. Permission to come aboard?
Granted.
Lieutenant, please receive our guest.
Captain, I must request permission to send another officer.
May I know your reason?
My dishonour among Klingons may offend Ambassador K'Ehleyr.
Lieutenant, you are a member of this crew, and you will not go into hiding whenever a Klingon ship uncloaks.
I withdraw my request, sir.
I just received coordinates, sir. Ready to transport two from the Klingon vessel.
Two?
Yes, sir.
Energise.
K'EHLEYR:I hope he'll be all right. Alexander hasn't had much contact with other children.
K'EHLEYR:Not even a bite on the cheek for old time's sake?
Perhaps you're not aware of my dishonour. I have accepted discommendation.
K'EHLEYR:I've heard. So now what? I have to perform some ridiculous ritual to talk to you?
You may not respect our traditions, but I do.
K'EHLEYR:Sorry. I just thought you might want to talk. A few minutes ago, you looked like someone with a question to ask.
Must I ask the question?
K'EHLEYR:Yes, you must.
K'EHLEYR:What should I tell Alexander? That he has no father?
K'EHLEYR:The Klingon Empire is at a critical juncture. We may be facing civil war.
War over what?
K'EHLEYR:The usual excuses. Tradition, duty, honour.
The word excuses implies ulterior motives for a conflict.
K'EHLEYR:I won't bore you with the intricacies of Klingon politics. Basically, two factions are trying to seize power.
Do you believe there is a threat to the Federation in this struggle?
K'EHLEYR:Klingon wars seldom remain confined to the Empire. Sooner or later they'll drag in the neighbouring star systems, then the Tholians, the Ferengi. The Federation won't be able to stay out of it for long. This has been coming for some time. Only K'mpec, the head of the Council, has been able to maintain the peace.
Now something has changed that.
K'EHLEYR:Correct. K'mpec is dying. He is aboard the cruiser. He has come specifically to meet with you, Captain. Alone.
K'MPEC:It's about time you arrived, Picard. Sit.
K'MPEC:I need your help.
If the Enterprise medical facility can do anything to help.
K'MPEC:Too late. For some months I have been poisoned with small doses of Veridium six. The wine. There is no cure.
What do you want of me?
K'MPEC:After I die, you will act in my name to arbitrate the struggle for power.
I will?
K'MPEC:No one on the Council can be trusted, and I have my reasons for wanting an outsider.
K'mpec, you cannot possibly be serious. A Federation officer has no business in
K'MPEC:Nonsense. You are an accomplished mediator. This is no different than any other dispute requiring your services.
On the contrary, I think this is very different. And I must respectfully decline.
K'MPEC:If you refuse the dying request of the Klingon Supreme Commander it will be a insult by the Federation to all Klingons. Besides, I've already sent the order to the leaders of the two opposing factions. They're on their way.
You had no right to involve me without my permission.
K'MPEC:If I'd asked, you would have said no.
This is not a case of simple mediation. You are asking me to choose the next leader of the Klingon Empire.
K'MPEC:No. By tradition, the two strongest challengers fight for the right of succession. As mediator, only you can designate those challengers.
But you have just said there are only two challengers arriving. What is the point?
K'MPEC:I want you to discover which one of them has killed me. Gowron or Duras. Yes, Duras. I thought you would find that interesting.
Interesting? You could say that, since he tried to have me killed, and conspired to strip Worf of his good name.
K'MPEC:And I approved. All for the glory of the Empire. That should be my epitaph. Find the assassin. The Klingon who kills without showing his face has no honour. He must not lead the Empire. Such a man would be capable of anything. Even war with the Federation.
Very well. I accept.
Captain's log, supplemental. K'mpec, who ruled the Klingon Empire longer than anyone in history, is dead. We await the arrival of Duras and Gowron, rivals for the leadership of the High Council.
There is no honour in attacking the weak.
I would have won.
No. You must earn victory.
Where are the other Klingons?
There are no others on board.
Why?
The Federation and the Klingon Empire were enemies for many years. No other Klingons have asked to serve in Starfleet.
Why?
A warrior does not ask so many questions.
I don't want to be a warrior.
K'EHLEYR:Hello! Well, you're back early.
He made me leave.
K'EHLEYR:Maybe you should go to your room and play.
K'EHLEYR:Is he under arrest?
He knows nothing of our ways!
K'EHLEYR:Our ways? You mean Klingon ways, don't you?
He is Klingon!
K'EHLEYR:He is also my son and I am half-human. He will find his own ways. Why the sudden concern? You won't even acknowledge that he's yours.
Why did you not tell me?
K'EHLEYR:What would you have done? That's right. You would have insisted that we take the oath, just as tradition would demand.
You should not have kept this from me.
K'EHLEYR:Well, now you know.
I cannot acknowledge my relationship to the boy. It would only harm him.
K'EHLEYR:Because you were dishonoured?
As my son, he would also bear my disgrace, as would his children.
K'EHLEYR:Why did you accept discommendation from the High Council?
My father was accused of collaborating with the Romulans at Khitomer.
K'EHLEYR:I know. And I also know that you challenged it.
Yes at first. Ultimately I withdrew my challenge.
K'EHLEYR:But why, Worf? I can't believe you'd just give up. What really happened?
Lieutenant Worf, Ambassador K'Ehleyr, report to the Bridge.
On our way, Commander.
Klingon vessels Vorn and Buruk holding stations at thirteen kilometres.
Open a channel, Mister Data.
Channel is open, sir. Vorn responding to hail.
On screen.
Let's get this over with, Picard.
In good time, Duras.
Even in death, K'mpec makes foolish decisions. You should not be involved in this, human.
The Sonchi ceremony will take place in one hour aboard K'mpec's ship.
One hour? What is the delay?
There is no delay. It is the time I have chosen.
Exactly one hour, Picard. Do not be late.
Keep that pahtk away from the ceremony, Picard. He has no place on a Klingon ship.
Picard out.
Contact Gowron's ship. Tell him to meet us aboard K'mpec's vessel. Ambassador, meet me in Transporter room six in an hour. We will begin the ceremony a little late. Mister Worf.
Worf, the next few days will be difficult for you
You have made it clear that I am to perform my regular duties, sir.
I want you to know that I am aware of your discomfort.
Thank you, sir.
Ambassador K'Ehleyr will be preparing me for my role in the rite of succession.
Permission to speak freely, sir?
Granted.
Duras must not be allowed to lead the council.
He has a legal claim, Mister Worf. Your personal feelings toward him
It is not personal, sir. His father betrayed my people to the Romulans. Duras is a traitor.
Klingon tradition may hold the son responsible for his father's sin. I cannot, Worf. Treason was his father's crime. Duras' crime was to lay that blame on your father. I will not forget that. But you should not forget that you chose to accept the consequences of that lie.
To preserve the Empire.
The issue now is whether or not he killed K'mpec.
Sir?
He was murdered. Poisoned.
A Klingon would not use poison. His murder would have no honour.
K'mpec believed that it was either Duras or Gowron.
Well, I know little of Gowron. Only that he is an outsider who has often challenged the Council. But Duras? I know him. His heart is not Klingon.
K'EHLEYR:That's Gowron.
I hope this will be brief.
K'EHLEYR:It will be just long enough to prove that K'mpec is dead.
Qab jIH nagil
Qab jIH nagil!
Qab jiH nagil!
K'EHLEYR:Sonchi.
Now, complete the Rite of Succession. It's obvious who the two challengers are.
We will proceed according to the traditions and the precedents set down in Klingon law.
What do you know of Klingon law, human?
We will reconvene on the Enterprise, wherein
No! Finish it here, now!
I have not received your report on the explosion.
K'EHLEYR:Two Klingons killed. A few minor injuries. Were you concerned about me?
As Head of Security, it is my duty to be concerned.
K'EHLEYR:Is that it? Just official concern for my well being?
You know my feelings.
K'EHLEYR:Maybe I've forgotten.
You were right. I would have insisted we take the oath. But not just because of tradition.
K'EHLEYR:I thought about telling you. Wanted to tell you. But I wasn't ready. When I left, you said you'd never be complete without me. It took some time but, I came to realise I need you too. You're part of me, Worf.
jIH dok.
K'EHLEYR:maj dok.
No, I cannot allow you to suffer my humiliation.
K'EHLEYR:There would be no suffering I don't care what other Klingons think of you.
But what of the boy? He may want to live in the Empire someday. He would be an outcast. Another traitor from a family of traitors.
K'EHLEYR:Family of traitors. I don't believe that for a minute.
Respect my wishes in this matter. I cannot take the oath with you. Nor can I claim your son.
K'EHLEYR:If you cannot be his father, at least be his friend.
We haven't completed our analysis of the bomb debris. Doctor Crusher is still studying the remains of the two men killed in the explosion. We need more time.
K'EHLEYR:Duras and Gowron will be here in a few minutes. I don't think you can delay this meeting again.
Is there some way of stretching out the formalities once they arrive?
K'EHLEYR:In the modern Rite of Succession, only a brief proclamation that two challengers have been chosen is necessary.
You said modern rite. How was the ritual performed in the past?
K'EHLEYR:The old forms dictated that the challengers perform the ja'chuq. It's a long, involved ceremony where the challengers list the battles they've won, the prizes they've taken, the idea being to prove their worthiness to lead the Council.
Can the old form still be used?
K'EHLEYR:It's up to you. You can use whatever form you want.
Thank you.
K'EHLEYR:Captain, what do you know about Worf's discommendation? My interest is personal. I understand that you were there. You stood by him before the Council. I'd like to know what happened.
I'm sorry, I can't discuss it.
The Council must have a leader now! Complete the rite so I can kill this ha'DIbah.
You will die slowly, Duras.
You have already proved you don't have the courage to face me. Perhaps you should plant another bomb!
mev yap! Sit down. We will begin the ja'chuq.
What?
This woman has been giving you bad advice, Picard. The ja'chuq is obsolete.
It is my choice to respect the ancient rituals. Each of you will have to prove your worthiness to lead the High Council.
That will take hours.
K'EHLEYR:Or days, depending on your cooperation.
What is this?
A bat'leth. It belonged to my father. It has been in our family for ten generations.
Let me hold it.
No, no, no. Do not think of it as a weapon. Make it part of your hand. Part of your arm. Make it part of you.
K'EHLEYR:The next meeting is in three hours.
I would speak with you alone, Ambassador.
K'EHLEYR:I'm honoured.
Picard is prolonging the ja'chuq. Why?
K'EHLEYR:He has sufficient reason to proceed carefully.
He relies on you for his knowledge of Klingon law.
K'EHLEYR:Yes.
Then he values your advice. You could quicken the pace.
K'EHLEYR:Possibly. Why should I?
Your position is unique. Have you never wondered about serving the Klingon Empire?
K'EHLEYR:I serve in my own way.
As a Federation Ambassador. A few rewards, but little glory.
K'EHLEYR:What do you want?
What do you want? Command of a ship? A seat on the Council? There are many opportunities for you in the Empire.
K'EHLEYR:Opportunities that will present themselves only if you come to power. You talk like a Ferengi.
K'mpec was also stubborn. He too refused to listen. Now, he's gone. You need not make the same mistake.
K'EHLEYR:K'mpec was old and weak. I am not.
We've completed our analysis of the bomb debris, Commander.
The explosive was a triceron derivative.
And the entire device couldn't have been more than three cubic millimetres in size.
It could have been hidden anywhere in that room.
There's one more thing. The bomb had a molecular-decay detonator.
Only one race uses that device, sir.
The Romulans.
How could the Romulans plant a bomb on board a Klingon attack cruiser?
It would be impossible.
K'EHLEYR:Not if the Romulans had help from one of the Klingons.
Klingons and Romulans working together? They've been blood enemies for seventy five years.
Perhaps Duras or Gowron wishes to improve that relationship.
A new Klingon alliance with the Romulans?
If true, it would represent a fundamental shift of power in the quadrant.
Indeed. It would put the Federation in a very difficult position.
Duras or Gowron?
K'EHLEYR:Gowron came to me alone. He wanted me to speed up the ja'chuq. Offered me a seat on the Council if I'd help him.
That doesn't suggest a Romulan connection?
K'EHLEYR:He also implied I'd end up like K'mpec if I didn't cooperate.
Captain, I disagree. It must be Duras.
K'EHLEYR:Why?
We have had prior dealings with Duras that show him to be untrustworthy.
K'EHLEYR:Can you be more specific?
No. Mister Worf, we have a conspiracy on our hands that could be a direct threat to the security of the Federation.
Yes, sir.
As Chief Security Officer, you will accompany me to the next transition proceeding.
Captain, they will be incensed. My presence will be disruptive.
Yes, it will.
K'EHLEYR:Computer, list stardates of the last Enterprise mission to the Klingon home planet.
Stardates 43685 through 43689.
K'EHLEYR:How many ship's logs during that period?
Forty three officer's logs. Ten personal logs.
K'EHLEYR:Is there a personal log for Lieutenant Worf?
Affirmative. Access is restricted.
K'EHLEYR:Eliminate all personal logs. List the remaining forty three in chronological order. We'll just take them one at a time.
jIH DoQ batlh!
Both your claims have been properly made and recorded. We are ready for the final phase of the ja'chuq. There will be a recess while I review your petitions. I'm sure you're as concerned as I am about the explosion aboard K'mpec's vessel. I assume that you are both continuing your investigations?
The investigations are complete. They revealed nothing of any importance.
Now that's very surprising. Our analysis turned up some startling results.  Will you join us, Lieutenant?
What is this?
He has no place here, Picard!
I will not sit at the same table with that!
It is my prerogative to investigate anything that may be relevant to the Rite of Succession. Lieutenant Worf is my Chief Security Officer. His presence is required.
We will not proceed.
If you wish to withdraw from the ja'chuq, that is your option. Proceed, Mister Worf.
What did your investigations reveal about the explosion?
It was a bomb.
And was your analysis just as insightful?
It was a common explosive.
What type?
Triceron.
What about the detonator?
This is pointless! The findings were inconclusive.
Fortunately, our investigation was more thorough. The bomb used a molecular-decay detonator.
What?
A Romulan device.
I will return to my ship to confirm these conclusions myself.
As will I.
Mister Worf, please be sure to send a complete record of our findings to both vessels and to the High Council.
Aye, sir.
That will be all.
K'EHLEYR:Computer, interlock with the Klingon Imperial Information Net.
Interlock established.
K'EHLEYR:Federation Ambassador K'Ehleyr requesting diplomatic access to High Council record. Security code pah doQ cha!
Proceed.
K'EHLEYR:Computer, display summary of the most recent High Council inquiry regarding Khitomer massacre.
Access denied. Restricted materials, du ko cha clearance only.
K'EHLEYR:By whose order?
Council member Duras.
K'EHLEYR:Access biographical files. Subject name, Councillor Duras.
Advise my counsellors on the Vorn to convene. There is much to discuss.
Look.
What is this?
Priority message to you from the home planet. It seems Ambassador K'Ehleyr is looking into things she should not be.
Distract the guard for me.
Yes, sir.
Sir. Excuse me, sir. You cannot leave your quarters without an escort.
K'EHLEYR:Come.
I have been informed of your attempt to access restricted Council records.
K'EHLEYR:I've been investigating what happened at Khitomer. Not at all an easy task, considering that most of the records are sealed.
Worf's father was a traitor.
K'EHLEYR:No, the evidence was altered to make it appear that way. I found it interesting to read that your father was also at Khitomer and you are the one who sealed the records.
You would dare to insult my father's name?
K'EHLEYR:Don't play the wounded Klingon for me, Duras. You don't do it very well. What happened in that Council Chamber? How did you get Worf to take the blame for you?
Do not pursue this matter further.
K'EHLEYR:The son betrays his people to the Romulans just as his father did, Duras?
One of the Klingons who died in the explosion was with Duras, the other was with Gowron. I've been examining the bodies, trying to get a clue to where the bomb was hidden. There's always a pattern in the lacerations and tissue damage. It would normally give a clear indication as to the direction, distance, force of impact.
Normally?
In this case, the pattern was virtually impossible to detect. I couldn't understand it until I looked at the dynoscans. This wound is different from all of the others. It was made from the inside out. The bomb was implanted in one of their forearms.
It's considered an honourable way for a Klingon to die, a suicide that takes an enemy with it. Which one of them was it?
Duras' man.
When we have more time I will take you to the holodeck and demonstrate in more detail
Medical emergency, deck eight, room one four two!
Gowron?
K'EHLEYR:No.
Duras!
K'EHLEYR:Alexander.
K'Ehleyr. K'Ehleyr!
You have never seen death. Then look. And always remember.
Stay with the doctor.
Worf, when did you
Multiple stab wounds to the chest and abdomen. Too much trauma to the internal organs. There wasn't time enough to take her into stasis.
Where's Worf?
I don't know. He disappeared just after I arrived.
Riker to Lieutenant Worf. Computer, locate Lieutenant Worf.
Lieutenant Worf is not aboard the Enterprise.
Where is he?
Lieutenant Worf transported to the Klingon ship Vorn at seventeen thirty hours.
On my way.
Duras.
What is that doing here?
He has claimed the right of vengeance.
You have no rights here, traitor!
K'Ehleyr was my mate.
If Lieutenant Worf resists, sir?
He's coming back with us one way or another. Set phasers on maximum stun.
I'm the only one, Worf, the only one who can prove your innocence. Kill me and you're a traitor for ever.
Then that is how it shall be.
Worf!
Mister Worf, your service aboard the Enterprise has been exemplary. Until now.
Sir, I have acted within the boundaries of Klingon law and tradition.
The High Council would seem to agree. They consider the matter closed. I don't. Mister Worf, the Enterprise crew currently includes representatives from thirteen planets. They each have their individual beliefs and values and I respect them all. But they have all chosen to serve Starfleet. If anyone cannot perform his or her duty because of the demands of their society, they should resign. Do you wish to resign?
No, sir.
I had hoped you would not throw away a promising career. I understand your loss, We all admired K'Ehleyr. A reprimand will appear on your record. Dismissed. Mister Worf, isn't it time for the truth about your father's innocence to be told? After all, you only accepted this dishonour to protect the name of Duras and hold the Empire together. Now that he has died in disgrace, what is gained by further silence?
Each member of the Klingon High Council has shared in that lie. They will not be so willing to admit their own dishonour. But the day will come when my brother and I will convince them to speak the truth.
My parents, my human parents, will meet us at Starbase seventy three. They will care for you.
Why can't I stay with you?
You deserve a home, a family. They can provide that I cannot. I miss her too.
Are you my father?
Yes. I am your father.
Intense magnetic fields have a disruptive effect on electrical systems. Therefore we can expect communications interruptions, as well as potential temporary loss of other systems. As a precaution, we are now going to Yellow Alert. Stay sharp, everyone.
Attention all decks. Yellow Alert.
Engineering, this is Lieutenant Commander Data. Bring all systems online and direct full power to the shields.
All sections secure, sir.
Lieutenant La Forge?
Course is set, Captain.
Half impulse.
Aye, sir, one half impulse.
On main viewer. Mask out the photosphere. Magnify. Quadrant one seven, magnification factor twelve.
I've never seen anything like this before. The violence of these eruptions is awesome.
Captain, I'm reading an unusual number of sunspots and eruptive prominences, sir. The magnetic field is extremely irregular.
Captain, deflectors are being hit by a huge burst of X-rays.
Wow! Look. Captain, my console seems to be overloading.
The X-ray burst is disrupting systems, Captain. I'm adjusting deflectors to compensate.
Engineering, increase power to forward shields.
Forward deflectors online, sir.
Status report.
All systems operational, sir.
Captain, the level of tension on the ship is mounting.
Understandable. Mister Data?
If we are to investigate, sir, we must get closer.
Mister La Forge, move us in closer. This is the Captain. We will be pushing the shields to the limit, but we are getting a splendid view of this phenomenon.
Captain, I have intercepted what appears to be a distress signal.
Let me hear it.
T'JON:This is T'Jon. I am on the Ornaran freighter . We have a serious problem here. Can't seem to fix it. We need help.
The transmission is coming from a freighter in orbit around the fourth planet in the system. However, the receiving station is on the third planet.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open.
Unidentified freighter, this is the USS Enterprise. May we be of assistance?
T'JON:Whoever you are, yes! I'm having trouble navigating. We can't maintain a steady course. Please help us if you can.
Can't you enhance the frequency?
Too much interference.
Set course to intersect with the freighter. Warp two.
Aye, sir.
Maintain Yellow Alert.
T'JON:I can't control the helm any longer. I'm losing orbit. We're heading into the atmosphere. Please, do something. We're going to burn up. We haven't much time.
It is a freighter, very old.
Captain, our sensors are being severely affected by the sun flares.
Helm, take us in as close as possible to the freighter's orbit.
Moving in, sir.
There are six life forms aboard the freighter, sir.
Captain, the freighter's orbit is decaying.
How long before it loses integrity?
A matter of minutes.
Unidentified freighter, this is the USS Enterprise.
T'JON:Enterprise, this is the Ornaran freighter Sanction.
Put this on the main viewer.
The visual transmission is still breaking up.
Freighter Sanction, this is the Enterprise. What is your situation?
Not so good. Helm isn't working right. What is the problem?
This is the Enterprise. With all this interference it is difficult to copy your transmission. If you all talk at once it is almost impossible. Now, please say again. What is your situation?
T'JON:I am T'Jon, Captain of the Sanction.
At last. How can we help?
T'JON:We have lost, I don't know, something. I am no longer able to maintain this orbit, nor am I able to use the main thrusters. It's all, you know, dead, I guess. It's all shut down?
Well, that is a little vague. What is the computer analysis?
T'JON:Well, the computer's not working very well.
Data, can you tap into their computer and clarify the situation?
I will attempt it, sir.
Captain, the tractor beam is available, if you want it.
At least we can pull them out of orbit before they enter the atmosphere.
Freighter, we're going to lock on the tractor beam and pull you out of orbit.
T'JON:Hey, that's, that's great.
Captain, the freighter's orbit continues to deteriorate.
The solar flares are interfering with the tractor beam, Captain. I can't lock on.
Captain T'Jon, we are unable to attach our tractor beam because of the intense solar activity.
T'JON:I understand. Thanks for trying.
Sir, I have determined what is malfunctioning on the freighter.
Captain, we have analysed your problem.
T'JON:Great.
Data.
Your ship's design uses an electromagnetic coil to constrict the exhaust flow. That coil is misaligned.
T'JON:Really?
Do you have the necessary tools to realign the coil?
T'JON:I don't think so.
I believe, Captain, we can provide them with a temporary substitute. Our ship's stores contain a coil of the proper type.
Can we beam one over?
Yes.
Captain, we're beaming over a replacement coil.
T'JON:That's great. And that'll fix us up?
Yes, once it's installed.
T'JON:Right. And how do we do that?
What is the matter with these people? How can he be Captain of that vessel and not understand its simplest function?
Captain, how long have you been in command of this freighter?
T'JON:Seven years. This is my twenty-sixth voyage to Brekka.
And you don't know how to align a control coil?
T'JON:It's never come up.
Can anyone else over there do it?
T'JON:Hold on. I'll ask. Sorry. Nobody here knows anything about it.
I'd better get over with a team.
Captain, I strongly recommend against anyone from this ship beaming over. The solar interference is too great.
The freighter has entered the planet's atmosphere. Disintegration is imminent.
We're running out of options.
Let's get them off there. T'Jon, stand by to beam over.
T'JON:If you think that's best.
Unless you have any other options, yes, I think that's best.
T'JON:Whatever you say.
I can't maintain a positive lock.
Unusual E-M burst, sir. Readings off scale.
Freighter Sanction, this is the Enterprise. We're having difficulty getting a fix.
Have them go to their own transporter room. It will be tricky, but perhaps I can link the two transporters in series and get them over with the increased power.
It's worth a try. Captain T'Jon go to your transporter room. Contact me from there.
T'JON:Right, Enterprise. It's right next door. But if you can't get us with your transporter, what makes you think ours will do the job?
I'm going to interconnect them.
T'JON:I didn't know you could do that.
Hurry! We're running out of time.
T'JON:We're on our way.
I don't think they're going to make it.
Captain T'Jon doesn't sound like he cares one way or the other.
Worf, how much time do we have?
One minute, twenty eight seconds.
Captain T'Jon, are you there?
T'JON:We're in the transporter room.
Great. Activate your transporter. Set coordinates nine seven zero three mark two six eight.
T'JON:Did you say two eight six or eight eight six.
Mark two six eight!
T'JON:Got it.
Sir, the hull temperature of the freighter is passing three thousand degrees.
What's the hold up, Number One?
We're establishing the link right now.
T'JON:We're ready.
Then all six of you, get on the transporter platform. On my signal, energise. I've got their initial transporter signal. Interlock complete. Energise on my mark. Four, three, two, one, energise.
Number One, did you get them off?
No, sir. They stayed in the freighter
But they beamed over their cargo.
Cargo? Are those people crazy? What could possibly be so important?
Sir, the freighter is disintegrating.
Their lives are in danger and they're beaming over cargo? Number One, I don't understand these people.
Captain, the freighter's hull temperature is approaching critical.
Unbelievable.
We're losing the freighter. Got to beam those people over now.
Clear the cargo. Beam it to a hold.
Aye, sir.
Freighter Sanction, this is the Enterprise, Get to your transporter pad and. No, forget about that. Lock on to any life form you can find and get them over now.
Trying, sir.
The freighter is going down.
Transporter Room. You're out of time.
Reading six life forms, but I can't get a solid lock.
We have no choice. Energise. I thought you said there were six. Where are the other two?
The lock didn't hold.
Re-establish.
It's too late.
Number One?
Two are lost, sir. But we saved four. I'm Commander William Riker of the USS Enterprise. I'm sorry we were unable to rescue the other two. We did everything we could. If you had come instead of sending your cargo, you all would have made it.
T'JON:The cargo. Where is it?
You did save it, didn't you?
Yes, we did. It's in one of our cargo holds. You act like it's more important than your comrades.
T'JON:The cargo. May we see it?
Follow me.
T'JON:Thank you. Thank you. We thought we had lost it.
Careful with your choice of words, T'Jon. It's ours, not yours.
T'JON:We paid a fair price for it!
You offered a fair price. We have not received it.
You accepted our goods in trade!
Then where are they? Tell me.
T'JON:That's not our problem.
No more than the barrel is your property. It's as simple as this. The goods were never delivered. They were destroyed with your ship.
Hence the deal was incomplete. Hence possession of the felicium remains ours.
We need it.
Commander, I request you transport my associate and myself down to Brekka, with our merchandise.
T'JON:Yes, get them out of here. But the barrel stays.
There's no reasoning with you.
Langor, you expect too much from them. You always have, and you've always been disappointed. You didn't pay for it, therefore it's not yours.
T'JON:Damn you, Sobi.
Stop this. Now!
Security to cargo bay eleven.
Behave yourselves, gentlemen.
Escort our visitors to the observation lounge.
A natural electrical charge?
Formidable.
Yes, and a difficult weapon to confiscate.
I have never seen humanoids with that power.
Neither have I. I wonder how it evolved?
I wonder if the strong magnetic field of their sun might have something to do with it.
Could be. I wonder how much power our guests can produce?
Or if they need to recharge?
That's an interesting ability. The question is, how do I defend against it?
You think our visitors pose a threat?
I don't know. But if they do, I'd better be ready for it.
Precisely, Lieutenant.
T'JON:We have to resolve this soon. There isn't much time.
What can you offer?
T'JON:Everything we had went down with the Sanction.
Then it's going to be difficult to accommodate you.
Solar flares are increasing in magnitude, Captain. Shields are shaky, but they're holding.
Maintain.
How are our rather quarrelsome guests?
They're waiting for you in the observation lounge, sir.
Data, what information can you give us about the inhabitants of this system?
Not very much, sir. The only recorded contact with the Delos system was over two hundred years ago. A scout ship reported two inhabited planets, one of which was on the verge of acquiring space travel.
Odd that in two centuries neither civilisation advanced much further.
Sir, I find it strange that none of our visitors feels much remorse about the two freighter passengers who perished. Yet that barrel of cargo is a source of great anxiety to them.
Yes. Let's pay a call, get some answers. Number One, Mister Data. Mister La Forge, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Captain, may I present Sobi and Langor from the planet Brekka, and T'Jon and Romas from Ornara.
I am sorry we couldn't save your ship.
T'JON:Tell me, you could have repaired it.
Oh, yes.
T'JON:We have only two left. Neither works properly. They are critical to our survival. Will you fix them?
Mister Data?
Our computer has downloaded the specifications for the magnetic coils the freighters depend on. Assuming the malfunction is similar, suitable replacements can be fabricated.
Instruct Engineering to proceed.
Aye, sir.
T'JON:Now, as for our cargo.
Our cargo, Captain.
Wrong, Sobi.
My First Officer has said that ownership of this cargo is in dispute, but this question must be settled by whatever legal mechanism exists between your societies.
T'JON:Captain, you don't understand. This is a matter of life and death.
Why is that? What is this cargo?
T'JON:Medicine.
Indeed?
Our planet is in desperate need, Captain. We have people suffering from a lethal plague.
T'JON:The cargo you have impounded is the only hope of life for our people.
Is that so?
Yes.
You must think us heartless brutes, Captain, but look at our side of it. The plant which yields the medicine felicium grows only in remote areas of Brekka.
It must be painstakingly cultivated, harvested, purified. A complex and expensive process.
That single shipment of felicium represents an enormous investment. We can't just give it away.
T'JON:We paid for it. We are asking only for what is ours.
That is your viewpoint. Ours, of course, differs.
You are going to hold to that position?
I am constrained to abide by the terms of our agreement.
Then you condemn us to death!
T'JON:Romas.
You disgust me! If you could see the suffering the plague has caused. Well, you are going to, when you see what it does to us.
Romas, are you and T'Jon carrying this plague?
Yes. Every Ornaran does.
Then you may have brought it aboard this ship. Was there a medical scan when they transported?
Unverified. The solar flares could have caused a malfunction in the biofilter.
Med Alert. Medical emergency. Doctor Crusher to the observation lounge at once.
You find us well, I trust?
As far as I can tell. Your physiology is somewhat different than I've ever encountered, but I detect no dangerous virus or bacteria.
I assure you we're in perfect health.
T'JON:But we are not. We need our medicine.
Our medicine.
T'JON:We paid for it. It's ours now.
Enough!
Of course. You are right, Doctor. Could we leave now?
I see no reason why not. Escort them to their quarters.
Doctor.
Captain, could I speak with you please? In private.
Not right now. Captain.
What have you learned?
The Brekkians show no sign of infection. The Ornarans show all the symptoms of a disease but I can't find a cause.
Perhaps it was filtered out by the transporter when they were beamed aboard?
There's no record of it. Then again, the solar flare activity might have caused a malfunction in the biofilters or their monitors.
Are they going to die?
I need to check further, but my instinct says no.
Do you think we are in danger from this plague?
Again, I need more time.
There are some missing pieces to this puzzle.
What's missing is a little compassion.
Are we losing our professional detachment, Doctor?
Perhaps. But Captain, I must tell you, I'm developing a very active dislike for these Brekkians.
Understandable.
T'JON:Captain, you must give us back our cargo.
I can't do that.
T'JON:Why? It belongs to us.
The Brekkians claim it belongs to them.
They lie.
That may be so, but it's not my decision.
We need some now. Now! I don't care if it's your decision. Get us some.
T'JON:Captain, what is happening to us, is happening to thousands more on Ornara. Please understand the magnitude of the problem.
Your people don't need it. The Brekkians don't need it. Our people do.
T'JON:If you don't give it to us, you will be a party to murder, not only of us, but of an entire civilisation. I'm sorry, I do not mean to insult you. I'm feeling very shaky.
We cannot hold out much longer.
They believe it will help them. That in itself might control their symptoms.
I'll talk with the Brekkians.
T'JON:Thank you, Captain. We appreciate anything you can do.
May I say, Captain, how impressed we are with your ship and all its facilities.
Thank you.
And its crew. Everyone is so efficient and professional.
I am glad you are comfortable. I've come to seek your agreement to an Ornaran request.
We cannot agree
Wait. Let the Captain speak. We want to be reasonable.
The two Ornarans are really quite ill and insisting that they need felicium.
That is not surprising.
Would you object to giving them enough for their own immediate needs?
Captain, we Brekkians are in business. We are not in the habit of giving away what has not been paid for.
You would see them die rather than share the medicine?
We want to be fair, Captain. We agree to permitting them two dosages for immediate use.
No charge.
I'll let my Medical Officer handle it.
